I thought Zuckerburg was in Palo Alto...Depends on the club, I'm sure.Exactly how sexy *is* fuck?You might cross post in /r/sportster. I'm willing to bet someone there has had a similar problem. Mine works fine. A Springer is a type of forks. A sprung Bates style solo seat, on the other hand, might be what you're talking about. You left out "Fox News claims this is all part of atheist war on white Christians."That's a croc, Greg. Just sitting down to dinner 4 nights a week may be a nice Ozzy and Harriet life, but trying to blame people who may be working two jobs, are stuck with whatever swing shift job they might have, or who have a teenaged kid who refuses to participate in family gatherings, is just bullshit. Suggesting that this is either a) a solution, or b) somehow the secret that's lacking in nutjob mass killers, seriously misses the reality of most peoples' lives. It took something like 20,000 to get to the top of my front page. Seriously, reddit. What the fuck?Oops, it's back down to number three behind "TIL Shaquille O'Neill is a sworn  police officer" and "Saudi Arabia insists UN keeps LBGT rights out of its development goals".... with 23,467 comments. Well said. The 1/101 route is about 95% wide open two-lane. When you get to the cities and towns on the way, it's stop lights and traffic, but that's just a small piece of the trip.

I-395 is a lot of 4 lane interstate. If you want something more intimate, I'd recommend an alternate route- 199 to 101 in southern Oregon, to CA20 south of Willits, CA, then across to CA49 and south to CA140 and take a jaunt through Yosemite on your way back up to 395 and the high desert back south. But they're cops. They wouldn't lie, kill anyone without cause, cover things up, etc. Would they?It's a gorgeous ride. When you get to us 50 on 49 it slows way the hell down for about 30 miles but it's absolutely gorgeous.Powdercoat.I think he knows what he's doing. He owns a bike shop.Get the Dyna. Coolant? :-) Have a lawyer call Harley Finance. If you call yourself, record the conversation (and if your state requires it, tell them you're recording). But I'd have a lawyer make the call.Or are you saying you want a bike, just not that one? You have to take the tack that they had no business accepting your forged signature, but that might put your wife in legal hot water.In the tattoo world, we have a phrase "unicorns farting rainbows" to describe every unicorn with rainbow tattoo from the 90s. This is just the natural extension of that I guess. :-)Maybe you could put some fringe on there. That might work as well as a fairing. Or maybe some skulls.People like that are already irrational. She's convinced herself that you have an obligation to buy her spawn things and that she has a right to be upset if you don't. Explaining things logically isn't going to make a difference.No, they didn't. Some FEW places the deforestation has been abated by PAYING people to not cut illegally, mostly with the help of Scandinavian countries footing the bill. These are rubber COATED metal bullets when fired from a 12ga. https://electronicintifada.net/content/misleading-terminology-rubber-bullets/4000 http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/health/2003999.stmThat's definitely illegal in the US. Companies do it all the time, but it's definitely against the law.Mostly this is due to conditions of liability insurance.The one time something like this happened to me, my response was "I made an investment of a $20 copay plus the cost of my health insurance in never having the added expense of children (vasectomy). Why should your shitty life and financial choices have any bearing on my return on investment?" The response? Crickets....First skill to add is sixth sense. As soon as that lights up, start moving. It's a 3 second delay between being spotted and your "you're detected" warning going off. More than enough time for a competent arty player who's preaimed to get a round off. Watch SirHavoc's "WoT Uni" videos on YouTube about passive scouting, active scouting, and light tanks. Preventive care. Saves insurance companies bank on pre-natal, OBGYN, and post natal/pediatric care. "You DICK. How can you sleep at night?!?!" Or something to that effect. Wow. I'm willing to bet your oil pump got a chunk of piston in it, seized and sheared the drive gear teeth. Teeth getting in the cam gears will shear the pinion shaft key. That'll do it all. Drop the oil pump into a CLEAN pan and look closely.   Do it in a CLEAN pan so you can see ANY bits that fall out of there and whether or not they're part of an oil pump impeller. 

I've never seen an oil pump drive gear that bad unless something seized the oil pump. The oil pump drive gear on the pinion shaft is hammered worse than any I've ever seen except one. Its teeth got in the cam gears and probably sheared the pinion gear key once the cams stopped turning and that's what bent everything, because the pistons were still going up and down.ake sure the pinion shaft isnt damaged. 

At this point, I'd probably pull the motor apart to make sure there isn't part of the old piston in an oil galley somewhere, waiting to do it all over again. Check every oil passage. The service manual has a color coded map of oil passages. Make sure they're ALL free of debris. If you're lucky, it was just one piece, but there's so much damage that id be worried about where the cam gear teeth and oil pump gear teeth went. 

It may be time to find a motor on ebay. Might be cheaper.And remember, you can find a complete bike for $3000. Don't spend too much money on this. I think he knows. :)Because you didn't use LocTite on the license plate bolts?If it pisses them off, they know you're there. That's a plus. "Whoops, this gallery appears to be empty". 

Bummer about the crash. The knee injury was either a footpeg, shifter, or footpeg bolt.  

Any idea how you hit the curb? That's not a particularly high speed (50mph for you 'Muricans reading this) and that bike can easily take a curve as tight as a "35mph curve" at 50mph. 

And I'm pretty sure the insurance will total it with this dollar amount. Typically it's 50-70% of replacement cost, depending on the insurance company. Yeah, that's a total in almost any country. Get the Dyna. :-) Look at the "Buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar. You can find a low-miles like-new Dyna from 2008-2009 for about $6,000-6,500. 96" 6 speed bike. Isle of Man is a closed course TT race. :) Live and learn. Or you can just be the gangsta you always dreamed of being and fold that plate frame in so it's not obvious and ride anyway. I mean, how often is there a cop right behind you, anyway? You can always leave it folded OUT and act surprised and say "Holy shit! Where'd my license plate go?!?!" if you do get pulled over...Ah. I suspect you did a couple things in the curve that contributed to this. Lots of people do. Hitting your brakes alone when you realize you're going to fast will sit you up and cause the bike to straighten out, which will do exactly this. Braking *with* counter-steering is the solution, and not counter-steering *farther* into a curve when the curve gets tighter will almost always lead to taking the turn wide. 

Either way, [this video, Twist of the Wrist II](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KVWLIfChUwg) contains *everything* you should know about cornering any motorcycle at any speed. It's 94 minutes long, cheezy as hell, but super informative and something *every single rider* should understand like the back of their hands to avoid doing things like this in the future. I'm willing to bet that you won't be 20 minutes into this video before the light-bulb goes off and you understand exactly what went wrong, even if you don't know why right now. You'll also know how to avoid it in the future.

Way too many "experienced" riders don't understand why their bikes actually turn in a corner, and how to increase your chances of surviving unexpected things in a corner. This video will teach you (and them) that. I was fortunate enough to have real instruction long before the internet or YouTube existed. Way too many people get on bikes figuring "I'll figure it out as I go", and folks who try things this way end up in far more "single-vehicle wrecks" than those who understand the fundamentals of motorcycle function that are available to everyone if they know where to look. 

Good luck on healing. Don't get a trailer. Get another bike, but do so with the *knowledge* that you can handle any situation the bike is capable of handling. Good luck man. Depending on how thick the washer is, you might even double up on the spring washer, keeping the old one there, too. You did a great job of [making that unclear](http://rationalwiki.org/wiki/Poe's_Law). On January 28, 1986, shuttle flight number STS-51L of the [Space Shuttle Challenger blew up 73 seconds into its flight](http://www.space.com/18084-space-shuttle-challenger.html), killing all seven on board, including a high-school teacher from New Hampshire, Christa McAuliffe.  And even then flying it was described by *many* people as "flying a brick". Those wings provided lift, but it was minimal compared to the weight of the shuttle itself. Yup. I ride like an asshole, but there's so many citizens riding Harleys these days that the cops rarely look at me.It sounds like he's worried about his perception of how he'd be judged by people like him (which makes him really insecure, certain of things he doesn't know anything about, and kinda petty). Are you asking him to watch this with his friends around? Is he Mr. Right or Mr. Right Now, because you should ask "is he really someone the world needs more of?"

Or not. He just sounds like he has preconceptions that have nothing to do with reality. I think just about ever time I've been camping since the early 80s has been while *riding* the bike.No sweat. I don't worry about downvotes. People seem to think the internet and reddit in particular are some kind of online popularity contest. I'm just here for the coffee and donuts. :-)Good luck with the rust. Sad what salt on the roads can do to a car. 

But hey, nothing like a front wheel drive care that gets 14mpg! :)Those are the El Dorado/Toronado wheels because both cars are front wheel drive and this is how GM decided to create enough room to tuck the wheels inside the fender wells while providing room for disc brakes.

But yeah, they're ugly. When they have the full hubcap on there, it looks a lot better. Looks like an *armored* Unimog! Love the drivetrain engineering on these. Don't enjoy *working* on it, just the way it's designed. Those pods can be anything from an ambulance to an office to a mobile C&amp;C center to fire control for arty or AA radar systems. Truck mounted Conex boxes are ubiquitous on the modern battlefield for all these things.It's the crankcase breather hose. When the pistons come down, the volume of the crankcase gets smaller, and the air needs to go somewhere. Normally, it's routed to the air cleaner, and the oil-mist filled air is sent into the combustion cycle. But if you route it under the motor, pointing at the ground, it'll exhaust under the bike and do no harm... unless you have an oil pump failure, at which time it'll start puking motor oil under the bike.

What's vitally important is buying or finding online a .pdf of the *Harley* service manual, which could answer any questions of this nature in the future. Don't bother with the Haynes or Clymer manuals. Get the factory manual. /r/sportster might even have a link to a .pdf file over there. 

Good luck. You're on a roll with the coolant stuff lately, aintcha? :)If your life is so sad, if you're so affected by the choices of strangers that you are *ashamed* to own a Harley because people share a different viewpoint that doesn't hurt anyone (except overly sensitive people who are easily shamed by the behavior of others), I suggest you seek professional help. And if you live rurally, loud pipes keep deer the hell away from the road if they can hear you coming a mile away. I spent 20 years living rurally in California and the ONLY time I ever saw deer on my bike was when I had quiet mufflers on there to get a ticket signed off. They can hear you coming and get the hell out of the road, long before you get there when you have loud pipes.

Besides, even if you live in the city, all you need to do is compare the behavior of drivers in front of and beside you when you are splitting lanes, and you'll KNOW they make a difference. Quite pipes splitting lanes and NO ONE gets out of your way or makes sure to give you room. Loud pipes splitting lanes and sometimes two or three cars ahead will be pulling to the side of the lane. New cars are so well insulated that it takes LOUD pipes for most people to have a clue there's anyone else on the road but them. Add texting, GPS, children, and so on to the mix, and you need all the help getting their attention you can get (which is why people blacking out their bikes baffles me- we're hard enough to see as it is). You acting like a 12 year old doesn't make it unTrue. Bravo. Just as folks talking about how "guys are this way", even discussing "girls who make the first move" as a single type of person is going to be so far off base most of the time as to be nothing more than a stereotype. 

Gals who make the first move are just as likely to be like you as they are to be just frustrated that many guys have absolutely no "game" at all. 

We live in an era where even suggesting an interest in a young lady can get a guy pigeonholed as a creep as often as it will get him reciprocation. Ladies who are willing to make a first move are generally viewed as a breath of fresh air, although they are clearly no single type of gal and no single type of move.Again with the broad brush. "Game" can be as simple as being sharp enough to read signals accurately and responding in kind, and it can be over the top "dude, whatch me get this Betty to go home with me in less than ten minute" douchebaggery. Most of my lady friends WANT a guy to have "game" (read "perceptive sexual confidence"), but not be douchebags bros. We'd like to think so, but words like "roofies" and phrases like "date rape" put the lie to that statement without even discussing pushy guys.Are you talking about a switch at the handlebars, or taking your hand off the bar every time you want to use a turn signal? That switch isn't going to fit anywhere on your handlebars.I have two friends who are college administrators and it's kids born afte 1990, not 2000. They BOTH refer to incoming freshmen as "teacups" - they're really pretty, but they break at the slightest touch. No coping mechanism, never had anything bad happen in their lives, never had to deal with disappointment, and when they can't get a class they want, get a bad grade, have a guy or gal break their heart, or pick up an STD, it's the end of their universe and they often contemplate suicide. 

Fucking parents need to teach their kids that life does NOT always go your way, that shit happens and you get up and go on, and that you're just not a special snowflake, period.No sweat. While I was in fact pointing out that the group is larger than "after 2000", "after 1990" actually includes "after 2000", so you're still correct.

That said, I'm not talking about everyone or all people, just that there's a preponderance of young adults, particularly from middle class and upper middle class families, who are unprepared for dealing with life's problems that can't be solved by writing a check.You are not alone. It's True in many places where parents keep their kids from ever having anything bad happen to themI owned a 1970 Eldorado that was a northeast US rustbucket that got 14mpg, and that was BEFORE unleaded gas and crippling smog bolt-ons. I know the facts of which I speak. :-)Sure. I was smiling when I wrote my initial comment, hence the smiley face. If it came off differently, please refer to the aforementioned smiley face. :-)But... but it's STREAMLINED! That's gotta count for something. :-)Nope. But the solid tires gotta go. Maybe put some GM Rally wheels on there with center caps and beauty rings. Surprise? Check.

Shame? Check.

Czech? Check. I was thinking almost exactly this. Well, more "I doubt most people realize how well the airbags and knee barriers in that car did their jobs." 

I wonder sometimes how much the relative safety of modern vehicles contributes to the amazing stupidity of many drivers. No, I don't think people are thinking about airbags when they drive like this, but most people under 50 have never seen a driver and passenger *turned into a ball of jello under the dashboard*. 

Cars today have lower dashboard knee impact barriers (that panel under the steering column and below the glove box that's designed to keep you from sliding under the steering wheel and around the pedals). There's also collapsible steering columns. These things mean that when people get in a wreck, they and the people who know them and about the wreck, don't have many horror stories on their mind about how bad things can be... unless someone wasn't wearing a seat belt. 

But even then, the knee barrier, steering columns, and air bags make a *huge* difference in collision injuries. Prior to the 1980s, cars made by most manufacturers worldwide didn't have any of these (not counting Mercedes and Volvo), and as a former tow truck driver, I can attest to the ease with which a 150lbs of human can be mashed into a ball around the brake pedal, even while wearing a lap belt. Happens like this- chest hits steering wheel as lower body keeps moving, folding the bottom of the wheel up as the driver slides out from under the lap belt and under the dashboard at whatever speed the car was going when it hit whatever it hit. 

Yeah, I wasn't a tow truck driver for more than a year. Too many fucked up situations like this. Most drivers I knew well drank a lot as a result. Watch the next video on Ru-ChP. I'm guessing there was a car hitting that tractor trailer head on, but there wasn't much left after the smoke cleared. What's striking is how the car with the cam was just slowly doing its best to make it around the truck to go about its day, without stopping to see if they could help. Thanks. Damn. There's no driver's compartment. Texting? Drunk? 1000 km stretch in the steppes where people fall asleep all the time? Yeah, it's a pretty accurate term. And I am NOT surprised at the idiotic logic that gal offered in complaining to the dean. The number of times I hear people anywhere and everywhere saying "but he did..." or "but she didn't...." about what*ever*, when the issue is THEIR behavior, never ends. Sad. Your mom gets major props. No. You have a passion.Dudes like that are just as fucked up as a chick pulling the baby trap. Maybe more, since he's not the one to have his body trashed, and you can bet he would have found a reason to bail and stick you with a kid. FUCK people like this. I bet he thought it was funny, too, when you caught him.You are correct. I didn't.The problem with that is when the tire blows at 60mph, and the customer wrecks the car, injuring three people and leaving a ten year old kid a paraplegic, guess who gets sued for returning an unsuspecting customer's car to the street with an unsafe tire?A person's "right" to not be bothered? Really? A right? Look, I'm the first one to look at a bike with straight pipes and say "that sounds like shit, and by the way, the bike runs worse", but if you're someone who feels like your rights have been violated by something as harmless loud noise, your cardiologist is gonna get rich off of you. What a prick. Fucking morons who pull shit like that should be locked up and have their cellmate attempt to impregnate *them*. :)

Yeah, nobody *wants* an abortion for the hell of it, but fortunately, it's still a woman's right... and still available in most places. 

But back to the fucking moron who fucked with your pills. Since he clearly doesn't have a fucking clue, he also obviously doesn't get that this is proof that the world does NOT need him breeding and creating more people like him. At least you were paying attention and not just blindly saying "honey, can you hand me my daily pill? They're over in my purse". But fuuuuck, that would have been fucked up. You'll have a blast on the Low Rider, but not the 883. That would be a nightmare for me. The 883 isn't a "little underpowered" when you're riding with a passenger on the freeway, it's way underpowered, and it's geared for city riding, not freeway touring. Get the Low Rider, no question, but at your height make absolutely sure the bike you're renting has *mid* controls and not forward controls. Depending on who is doing the rentals, they may be either new bikes or trade-ins, and if it's a trade-in bike, there's no guarantee that the previous owner didn't switch to forward controls. An email to the place you're renting from can save you a lot of grief.That's a fucking pulse jet on a bicycle!The guy builds pulse jets in his garage from scrap parts. "... so they are *reasonably* safe" FTFYHuh. "Nam" Vietnam involvement for US soldiers 1955-1975 (1965-1973 for significant numbers), "Guadalcanal" 1943 when 1st Inf. Div. took over for the Marines. So, either you're in your 60s, and he was a *really* old 1st Sgt. when you you knew him, or.....They don't take a ton of force to set off. The average MBT doesn't put that much weight over a 6" circle. Something like 250-400lbs depending on the vehicle. 160lb human with 80lbs of gear stepping on one foot at a time, 240lbs. Wanna bet your life that it won't set it off?When I was a young Marine, I ended up at 1st FSSG (Fleet Service Support Group) at Camp Pendleton for a couple weeks when I was between duty stations. While there, I got my "white license" (US Govt issued military driver's license) for just about anything the Marines had with a steering wheel, from Dodge pickups, 16 ton capacity fork lifts and Gamma Goats (look it up) to 5-ton tractor trailers, and was asked if I wanted my "ammo endorsement" to go with my license. Sounded like no big deal, until I asked what that would "qualify" me to drive. At the time, it included everything cases of .223 NATO ammo to 155mm WP artillery shells, claymores, C4, anti-tank and anti-personnel mines, and so on. As a 19 year old, I was sharp enough to realize that 'qualify' meant 'guess who's going to get stuck with this duty when there's no one else available' and I think I made the right choice to say "not really". No, it's not. The ONLY people who say that have never spent much time in urban traffic with loud pipes, or on rural roads with loud pipes. Yeah, Willie Peter is fucked up. More information would be helpful. What KIND of work, and why are you procrastinating?It would help if there was more information in op's question.Not if they're not paying the bills. If you live in someone else's house, you follow their rules or find another place live. Same is True when you're older. Liability insurance riders generally don't make allowances for such things. There's another '48 Pan, a '66 Shovel, a '73 Ironhead drag bike (77" stroker) and a '39 ULH 80" Flathead that's not on the flair, but alas, I only own the '08 Road King and the '85 FXRP today. I certainly wish both Shovels and Pans and the Flattie were still in the garage. Broke my back in 2002 and sold everything because I thought I would never ride again (hit a pothole on a rigid Pan at 80mph, herniating 4 discs and breaking 2 vertebrae). Only missed 5 years of riding and 4 years of work and after a year back at work I walked into the Harley dealer, pointed at the Road King and said "I'll take that one". That was the first bike I ever bought running and new. Only the '39 was running when I bought it in '82, and it was the proverbial baling wire and chewing gum "ratty old bike". 

[Here's both '48s, and the '66 and the '69](http://imgur.com/a/iDQqS)I have zero knowledge of Triumph post 1965. /r/motorcycles will be the place to ask thatRoad King is the touring frame. The Softail is a specific Harley product line with a different frame. If you mean "the first with rear suspension", both the '66 and the '69 had swingarm and shocks in the back. The '39 and both '48s were rigid frames. No rear suspension except the rear tire with about 15lbs of pressure in it instead of 35.Rotax makes one helluva motor. Eric Buell Racing Had the 160hp motor in their last bike before bankruptcy.And. Aside from insurance conditions, they can still sue and cost you legal fees even if you win. Much smarter to just say no.Good. As fucked up as it may be, with assholes like this, I hope his cellmate showed him what it was like to be on the receiving end of an assault... or six.NIVEN's *Protector* explains how humans came to earth. This story is the foundation for the human population in the *Ringworld* series.

Roger Zelazny's short story *A Rose fo Ecclesiastes* has a twist on this idea, also. Amazing writing. Absolutely beautiful story, poetic prose, and a heart wrenching finale. I heartily recommend ANY of his work. 
I stand corrected. If you want to take that to its logical conclusion, back in the 1960s and 70s, ecologists were talking about noise pollution and even light pollution as well as toxics harming natural ecosystems. Highway noise, trucking noises, city noises, the lights from a town or city, all affect the critters living in their own world. I would think you'd support the Luddite view of getting rid of all technology, since it's fucking rude to the deer and the racoons and the salamanders and the birds. Sounds absurd huh? Not really. On a theoretical level, I actually agree with that, but since I live in the real world, where 7 BILLION people are making noise and dumping shit  into the oceans and rivers, and making it so natural systems no longer function as they have for 13 billion years, I've accepted that I'm a consumer, a polluter, and a noise maker. The choice then becomes "what's the point?" For me, the point is that loud pipes make me that much more noticeable and since I'm tired of dodging assholes in cars, then it's justified.  

But ALL that aside, if you've never ridden a bike with loud pipes (and again, I think straight pipes are stupid, but that doesn't mean I think they should be silent), having spent any kind of considerable time on a bike with quiet pipes, the difference in how people driving cars and trucks behave around you is astounding. The ONLY difference being loud pipes, it's the difference between people being utterly oblivious to the presence of a motorcycle until they've changed lanes into it, or rear ended it while texting, driving under the influence of children, and so on.

Come to think of it, by your logic, I have a right to be able to ride without anyone on the road being distracted ever. I think we should take distracted drivers out and shoot them. It would be so much safer for the rest of us.  Nah, it's just that they're more afraid of the meth-head and her screaming kids  throwing rocks at them and chasing them with baseball bats for fun- who are are *behind it*- than they are afraid of the loud motorcycle. :) 

Source: I've been to Indiana. I was led to believe that Indiana is Latin for "dirty snow", and that Terra Haute is Latin, too- Terra = earth, Haute = smells bad. Yup. JFK was Pres when I was born. Hail, ancient one. :-) Yeah, worked a tattoo convention in Indianapolis about 15 years ago. First time ever tattooing an otherwise normal, functioning, good lookin young lady who kept scratching her head... and then I saw the lice knits all over her hairline. Had to disinfect the entire booth, including things we don't need to disinfect, like books, backpacks, boxes of supplies under the table, etc. But at least it's east to buy machine guns there.Try asking at /r/sportster My ex has a saying she liked to use having worked in retail for 7 years "if it wasn't for sliding glass doors, people would starve to death". This is just the automotive version of that reality.Most semi-literate people tend to write with phonetic speech as their choice of words, never once thinking about what they're actually saying. Idiots not having a clue of the difference between a possessive pronoun "your" and a contraction between a pronoun and a verb "you're" because all they ever know themselves saying is the phonetic "your" without thinking about it, or those saying "could of" because the contraction "could've" is how we speak, and being semi-literate, they think they're saying "could of" instead of what they actually mean to say "Could have" contracted to "Could've". It's lazy as hell, and way too many people do it, and when you call them on it they usually don't have a clue what you're talking about. In that case, most people are semi-literate at best. I just.... um... wow. You win the internet today. Don't forget "pull the battery" if you're gonna hang it upside down. :)And I'm suggesting that things like "thinking" are absent to a large degree, or he(?) would've used the word "have" or the contraction I just used. :-)No guarantee that customer supplied replacement battery will be maintenance free. There's some cheap bastards out there. Why not rent one of the touring bikes?It does matter, since here in the US people have been able to walk into a dealership and ride their 2016 bikes home same day for over a month. They've been delivering them for a while now. EVERY PART OF YOUR QUESTION HAS RELEVANCE TO YOUR LOCATION. Get over yourself. Well, it hasn't been mentioned, so Kenneth Brannagh's "Hamlet", just about everyone was amazing, since it was a cast of the Royal Shakespeare Company... and then there was Jack Lemmon, shouting in a monotone because he didn't understand a word of the dialogue he was delivering. Sad, because Jack had decades as an amazing actor. I don't know that they came off of any HD. They're just bags. And don't worry about being a leather worker, because it looks like those bags are vinyl, rather than leather. Look closely at the edge of each piece of "leather" and you'll see that there's a fabric backside. That said, if you really want to re-do these, rather than just spend $100 or so for a new set, you'll need studs with prongs long enough to get through the thickest parts and then fold over to secure the stud to the lid of the bag. How are the old studs secured? I suspect they're mounted to the top piece of fabric, rather than all the way through the sub-structure. You'll need to make new holes for the studs if this is the case. Either way, it's a royal pain in the ass and unless your time is only worth a few bucks/hour, you might be better off just painting them black or buying new bags. 

Better yet, just throw them on the bike. Nice restoration. From Moscow to the eastern tip of Siberia is over 6000km, most of it through desolate forest on long, boring two-lane highways, with hundreds of miles between small towns. Add alcohol and fatigue, and you get.... "Russian roadcams!"When you say "black community", do you mean middle class black neighborhoods in the northeast, ghetto neighborhoods in any big city, dirt-poor sharecroppers in the deep south, middle-class south-central Los Angeles, inner city midwest, Texas cotton country? There are so many different sets of circumstances that could be called "a black community" in the US before the mid-50s as to make this question near impossible to answer, I would think. There were middle-class black neighborhoods in most large northeast cities, but racism was just as present, if quieter, in the northeast (edit: and midwest) as blacks began buying homes and building real communities at the turn of the century. By the 1940s, real neighborhoods were springing up, but not without problems http://www.press.uchicago.edu/Misc/Chicago/896412.html. 

Los Angeles was another matter entirely. During WWII, many southern and midwestern black families moved to Los Angeles, San Francisco, and Oakland for jobs in the war industry at ports, shipping companies, and in southern California, GM, Lockheed, North American Aviation, Grumman, and others. The pay was better than they'd received elsewhere and many were able to purchase homes and send their kids to college. After the war, mass unemployment as war industries closed down for considerably smaller civilian production of automobiles and aircraft, we began to see the poverty and decline of these communities. http://www.inmotionaame.org/migrations/topic.cfm;jsessionid=f8303335831444239949126?migration=6&amp;topic=9&amp;bhcp=1

Edit: I know this doesn't answer to OP's question, but does address the comment "I would like to learn about....". Sorry if it's off base. "Harley bags" haven't been leather since the 1950s, except for those on bikes like the Heritage Softail and the Road King Classic. Most of the bags like that you'll see are either aftermarket or HD branded "put em on any bike" bags. Vinyl replaces leather due to cost and even *who* is buying them, since leather doesn't hold its shape as well, unless it's got a hard ABS plastic skeleton, and requires maintenance the vinyl bags don't. Most Harley buyers these days just want to put gas in their bikes and ride, occasionally taking the bike to the dealer for scheduled maintenance. Leather bags require attention to avoid mildew and when they lose their shape, they lose their appeal. /u/harleydoctor? This sounds like something you'd know. Today, folks in white neighborhoods would just think she was the nanny. Wouldn't work. :)&gt;(p.s. I have the factory service manual and cannot find a mention of this fitting anywhere)

That's because it's not a stock fitting. The stock front brake line is a one-piece from handlebar to caliper. 

Was the clear fluid really oily, or very thin? Motor oil would have color to it and be oily as hell. Brake fluid will feel weird on the fingertips after it's dried. No reason mot to. Reliable tractor chassis, great engine, and LOTS of spare parts floating around after the war.That's a "milled billet" distribution block, just like the ones Arlen Ness used to sell. Don't just tighten it, unless a TINY bit of tightening solves this. If it's leaking between the fitting and the rigid line, you may need to reflare the brake line, as vibration can cause cracks over the years (means cutting 1/4" off the rigid line and using a flaring too to put a new flare on it). If so, make sure the fitting is free of rust or other crud before you reinstall the line with teflon tape on the threads. If it's leaking from the threads, remove the fitting, apply teflon tape, and reinstall. Then bleed the brakes (vacuum bleeder costs about $20 at the auto parts store). Use only the appropriate brake fluid (DOT 3/4 or DOT 5, depending on the year).During the civil rights movement, we saw the rise of Black Identity and the Black Power movement, as well as Islam becoming more common in African American populations and feeding this movement, particularly in large cities in the northeast and midwest. Malcom X, born Malcolm Little, changed his name to X because Little was, as he said, "a white slave-owner's name", and during reconstruction, slaves who had only a first name, took the last names of the slaver who owned them, because not having a last name in the US made you a non-person for all intents and purposes with government agencies. During the rise of Black Identity in the 50s and 60s, there was a movement away from European surnames that had been assigned/taken/borrowed from plantation owners and towards Arabic, Bantu, Zulu, Swahili, and other Afrocentric names.

In Louisiana, there was a large free black and creole population long before the Civil War, and many of them had French surnames and first names, too, as it had been a French territory prior to the Louisiana Purchase. A large number of free blacks with French names moved into the rest of the country in the 100 years after the Civil War, taking their names with them, which also fed this trend away from Anglo/Germanic names.

The WHY is much more complex than this. Here's a great research paper called "Naming and Linguistic Africanisms in African
American Culture" from Lupenga Mphande at the Ohio State University on this exact subject. 

http://www.lingref.com/cpp/acal/35/paper1301.pdfIt's called "the lemming train", and it happens WAY too often. If you have a headset and CALMLY point out that you're ass is hanging out alone, usually one or two folks will turn around.

I read a discussion that suggested, and I agree, if you're out there alone, there's no reason to die for bunch of lemmings and to turn around and head with the lemming train. Your team will still lose but you may get some damage and kills in the mean time, instead of dying quickly and the team losing anyway.To avoid looking like a poser, don't pose. Don't *try* to look like something you're not. No one gives a shit if you wear black leather, but if you try to look like you're IN a club, or try to act the way you *think* MC bikers act (rather than just being yourself and not trying to impress anyone or begging to be included), you'll be getting attention you don't want. If someone is in a club, if you have a *reason* to talk to them, talk to them, just like any other human being, and just like any other human, don't mind other peoples' business- don't pirate someone else's conversation, as it were. Just be you, not who you or anyone else *thinks* you should be. 

Ride safe. You shouldn't have any problem. This is fucking priceless. You left out "when you see someone wearing a famous MC's patch, call him 'brother' every third word out of your mouth". Wait, what? We're allowed to have fun here? Don't you remember Dean Wormer from Animal House?!?! "NO MORE FUN OF ANY KIND!!!"He's already got kids, or am misreading things?Buy a tiny bottle of Testors model paint enamel and a tiny brush. No need to mask anything. That sucks. Info about where/when it was stolen would help.Damn. Love my E75. 34 shots, 17 pens, 2600 damage. Gonna have to pick your shots a bit better, or stop shooting at hull down IS-7s :-). 17 penetrating shots but only did 2600 damage? Did you switch to HE after bouncing more than a dozen shots or something? I would expect much more damage with the AP.Stock gun?Not if you have the right tools. There are MANY how-to videos on youtube, and the correct tools aren't going to cost you more than $30. Get the correct bleeder wrench at an auto-parts store (do NOT use vise grips or an adjustable crescent wrench), and a vacuum bleeder, or even just a two+ foot length of bleeder hose at the same store. 

Shouldn't take more than about 10 minutes. Do NOT forget to get your front master cylinder level before opening the lid. Turn your bars and even loosen the master cylinder clamp on the bars if need be to get the reservoir level. Spilled brake fluid can quickly destroy paint on engines, frames, tanks, and so on. Exhaust leak. Did you do the pipes yourself? Did someone else? Was the backfiring happening before the new pipes, or just after? Exhaust leaks are simple to create, and require doing things exactly right to eliminate. More info please?How were the studs fucked up? I always put high-temp Never-Seez on my exhaust studs. Even then, I managed to twist one off on the Road King last July using the torque wrench to put the exhaust back on after replacing the speed sensor. I RIDE FAST ALL THE TIME ON MY BADASS HARVEY FERGUSUN! DAMN, I RIDE SO FAST THE WORLD HAS RED-SHIFTED, AND THAT MAKES ME A BADASS MUTHERFUCKER!!!

How's that?Well, at least he bounced all day off you, too. 11K damage blocked. I don't think I've seen that number in my 2 years and 5K games, ever. Not in my E100, not in my Jaegeroo, not in my IS-6 or IS-3, and not in the T29 or T32, which I love fighting hull-down. Did you pull any trouble codes from the speedo?Wonder if it's a battery hog because it's got your mic on transmitting conversations.Then you take it back and say "you sold me a bike that backfires. Get it right" politely, of course.That's a Harley XA, 180\u00b0 horizontal twin, shaft drive, 750cc bike from early WWII prototype contract competition for duty in the north African desert. There's a few of them floating around, but this one is in pristine museum condition. The government eventually went with the WLA 45\u00b0 twin. Read [this]( https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/2f0hrb/my_thoughts_about_engine_rpm_and_how_lugging_your) and all the comments. You're shifting way too early. Your motor can safely spin 5000+ rpms and at 70 in 6th you're not even at 3000 rpm and barely into the power curve.When you make the online reservation, CALL the dealer and get confirmation of the reservation and the bike. The websitr isn't always accurate if bikes ger scheduled for service, repairs and sometimes inventory online isn't perfectly accurate. Take the road king WITH the windshield. The street glide has a 35lb fairing bolted to the forks and isn't quite as nimble as the RK.I *did* mention "switch the filter to miles instead of kilometers" or somesuch. At least I thought I did. 

But yeah, gearingcommander.com isn't *completely* accurate, because it doesn't account for power lost to wind resistance, but in the vacuum of space, the speeds would be pretty right on the money. I don't think ANYone has bothered inspecting a bike about exhaust mods... since the 1980s. Yeah, it's illegal, but I don't think I've seen more than a few new bike with stock exhaust in the last 3 years since that became law...Ask the dealer if they have a demo seat that's from an ultra classic you can put on the bike for the rental. Unless they have improved the stock seat since I bought mine in 07, only the ultra has a truly comfortable touring seat from the factory (their business model is to sell you a really pretty bike that needs more power and a more comfortable seat... and they'll be happy to take care of that at the dealer for a fee).So how interesting *is * fuck?Why do you think buying used doesn't offer much savings? Dealers routinely charge 20-40% MORE than private sellers for used bikes. *Read the wiki tab or the Buying a used Harley? link on the sidebar* All will be explained. IGNORE used bike prices on craigslist until you have. Those are ASKING prices, and those bikes will *never* sell if the seller doesn't drop the price considerably. They're tiny. I have a friend who's 5'4" who rides an Iron and she looks about the right size for the bike. Both of them are *tiny*. 

Look into the Dyna, but seriously, buy a "like new" low-miles used bike for thousands of dollars less than you'd pay for new. Get your own financing or Harley Finance can finance private sale used bike if they're new enough and pass inspection. 

Before you do that, however, read the "Buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar. It's also the wiki tab at the top of the browser page (if you're on  mobile, go to the top right corner and drop the menu, then "view in browser" or whatever language your phone app gives it). There are 2009-2010 Dynas with under 10K miles on them selling for $6000-7000 and bikes a couple years newer are selling for just a couple thousand dollars more. Buying new means a) YOU take the depreciation, b) you'll never get what you think it's worth when you want to sell it (not by a long shot- used Harley market is FLOODED).

But whether you buy new or used, provided you already have your motorcycle endorsement for your license, go down to the dealer and test ride a couple Dynas. You may find that even they feel too small for you. Take a Road King or a Road Glide for a ride too. Then, when you've fallen in love with a specific model, find a used one and ask that the dealer take a look at it before the sale. There's so many used Harleys on the market right now that most sellers will accommodate you. People SUCK. Go online and look at Vance &amp; Hines, Rinehart, Thunderheader, S&amp;S, D&amp;D, Bubb, Supertrapp, and others. Cycle Shack is probably the least expensive effective muffler pipes with reasonable performance, but only if you're too broke to get a premium, properly tuned exhaust from one of the others. Look at 2 into 1 pipes and dual muffler pipes. Sure thing. I *passed* on a 2009 Dyna with 6,000 miles on it in pristine, never-been-laid-over condition at $6600 in July. The asking prices are a bunch of delusional people looking at other peoples' delusional prices on Craigslist and thinking "that must be what my bike is worth. Besides, I spent $3,000 on chrome doodads and skulls and spikey stuff so the bike must be worth $3,000 *more* than those *other* bikes". They're delusional, like I said. EVERYONE does add-on mods to their bikes, but those are *personal taste* add-ons and don't add a dollar's value to a  bike unless they're *top shelf performance mods*. All other mods are "tough shit buddy, I don't *want* a bike covered in skulls, and will have to spend *extra* to replace all those parts if I buy this bike". 

Good luck. If you have questions about a bike's value, you can message me and I'll give you at least a ballpark. What metropolitan area are you in? Yes, but not "production" videos. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p_jMGbvb9uYhttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p_jMGbvb9uYHe's not alone. Sure, a lot of people have spent a *lot* of money to do big-wheel baggers, but I'll always see them as gimmicks like 30" apehangers or 6' sissy bars. I didn't even notice that! Interesting. They have to be fabbed, since I've never seen aftermarket mids for a bagger. Pegs instead of boards, yes, but those pedals are different, too. It's a production video. Willing to bet there were spotters keeping traffic out of the intersection. He's got seriously unresolved penis-size issues, obviously. And I'm willing to bet his wife or girlfriend left him for a guy with a Harley. Better yet, a GIRL with a Harley. Fucking moron. Too bad we live in a  world where you can't just put a gun in his mouth and prevent this kind of behavior in the future. Cars/vans/trucks are *deadly weapons* and anyone who misuses such things needs to be removed from the gene pool. There's a lot of good cops out there. We just never see them because the good ones don't fuck with people just for the hell of it. "Between San Diego and LA"? Oceandump? Poway? Escondido? Former Marine here. If you know how to look, there's a LOT of inexpensive Dynas out there, even though most of them are *listed* for more money than they're worth. NO REASON to pay $17,000 for a new Dyna when you can find one in like-new condition with super-low miles for *less than half the price of new!* For example, [this 2009 Dyna in Temecula with under 8K miles](http://sandiego.craigslist.org/csd/mcd/5245873333.html) is essentiall brand new, as far as function is concerned with an $8300 asking price. It's overpriced even then, and the bike has been listed for a couple weeks already without selling. It's only ever had two oil changes, and is probably still on its first set of tires (I'd get the dealer to replace them). I'm not partial to the forward controls on this bike, as they don't give as much control in corners as mid controls (unless you're over 6' with long legs, as I think you said you are), but I'm willing to bet you could get this bike for $7K cash. It's a car lot, and they probably took it on trade, if not consignment. To be clear, I am NOT saying "buy this bike", but just showing you that bikes with VERY low miles in like-new condition are out there for *less* than the price of a new 883 (which you'd hate in about 20 minutes). 

The age of the Craigslist ads is critical information, and taking your time and getting to know which bikes have been sitting for a month or more, even if they seller removes the old ad and creates a new one every now and then will give you a much better idea of what bikes are overpriced. Any bike that's been for sale for a month or more is more than $1000 overpriced, since the seller hasn't even gotten an offer close enough to accept. People just don't get that their bike isn't worth what they think it's worth. 

Harley sold almost 200,000 bikes in the US each of the last half dozen years. That's a *million* Harleys out there, and at least half of them are sold to people who "really want to *own* a Harley", but either never get into riding once they've bought it, get scared, have a wife who tells them "no", or just plain can't figure out how to enjoy themselves in life. With real incomes declining for most of the population, the bike in the garage  is at least a way to generate *some* cash. The used Harley market is *flooded*, and that makes it a buyer's market. At one point this summer, there were over 300 Sportsters for sale in the Dallas/Fort Worth area on the same day. Over 700 ads, actually, but I figure half of them were duplicate ads, and I'm being generous with the 300 number. Why on earth would anyone buy any buy the lowest priced "similar" bikes when they can have their pick of used bikes from sellers who need cash and haven't gotten an offer on the bike they've had for sale for a month or more?

Kelly Blue Book isn't the best place to figure out what a bike is worth. NADA's site, on the other hand, will give you a loose ballpark if you look at "low retail", and ignore options and add-ons, since NADA hasn't caught up with reality yet, and their value list is only going to be accurate for bikes for sale at a dealership. Private sale bike, no matter how many "extras" there are, rarely *sell* for a dime more than "low retail", and that's for bikes with under 15K miles, but people think their bike is a special snowflake and can't possibly be worth a dime less than "high retail", with all the extras and options figured in, and list their bikes for sale accordingly. Those bikes never sell. Longhairedcountryboy mentioned his Wide Glide for $5100. The seller had a $7500 price tag on it, even though it was a dozen years old. After sitting for sale without a single offer, the seller was *happy* to get $5100 for the bike. :)

There's nothing wrong with a bike with 30K miles, provided it's been properly maintained, but they just don't sell easily, since there's so many with under 10-15K out there for reasonable prices. That Dyna with 7K miles on it for an *asking* price of $8300 I linked to took me  2 minutes to find. Why on earth would a buyer pay the same for a bike with 30K miles on it? Oh, they're *listed* for reasonable prices, and again, there's nothing wrong with a 30K bike (if properly maintained), but it'll be way down the list of bikes to look at for the same price point. And remember, *cash is king*. 

Good luck. Oh, I'm sure *someone* makes them. I've just never seen them for sale is all. Ah. I guess I read that too fast. I agree with you. So does my Road King. :)I think you misunderstand peoples' views re: the FXD Dyna. Every single week you'll see me and other here (and I own an FXR) telling people to buy a Dyna. They're great bikes, and if yours is well-maintained and not horribly abused, it'll last 100K miles or more. What they aren't is an FXR. They *replaced* the FXR in Harley's inventory and are the best-selling Big Twin in HD's product line. They're versatile enough to be a grocery getter, heavy enough to be a touring bike, and light enough for around town and as a commuter, with saddlebag and windshield options/mods available. 

There's a shitload of used Dynas out there with very few miles on them, especially since the Sons of Anarchy outfreakage led something like half a million dudes to go out and buy a bike "just like the ones on the show" (Street Bob with T-bar handlebars and a Thunderheader). More than half the people who buy Harleys because they "really want a Harley" seem to never get into riding much, or become afraid, and for whatever reason certainly never get into the lifestyle, so there's a shitload of super low-miles, like-new Dynas (and other models) sitting in garages 5, 10, 15 years old, and with so many people selling these bikes, it's a buyer's market. You can find a 5 year old Dyna for half the cost of the same model new, with low-miles and even the mild performance mods that most people do to their bikes already done. If you're willing to buy 10 years old, you can get one for 1/3 the price of new. 

The FXR (1982-1994, plus 1999 and 2000 limited release models), is the bike that saved Harley in the 1980s, and was the first bike you could buy that you didn't need to be a mechanic to keep on the road (vibration means serious required maintenance to make sure things aren't falling off the bike). It's the first rubber mounted engine and transmission unit, best handling Big Twin Harley ever sold, and if you can find one in great shape, you can't go wrong with the Evolution motor, 5 speed tranny, and disc brake forks.

That said, there are used Dynas out there that are junk, and used FXRs that are junk, too. The FXR at 585lbs is 100lbs lighter than the Dyna, so therefor more nimble in the corners, accelerates faster given identical motors, and has a much more rigid frame construction than the FXD. Harley *replaced* the FXR with the FXD in 1994, primarily because frame construction costs on the FXR was high, and the FXD frame could be built entirely by robots (20th century manufacturing- nothing new). The FXD also eliminated the cost of a seat hinge, putting the oil tank access and battery box outboard of the frame. The FXR had the battery and oil tank access under the seat and required a seat hinge and if you replaced the stock seat, you needed to remove the rear seat bolt just to check your oil level. Both the FXR (1983-2000) and the FXD (1994-1998) came with the 80 inch Evolution motor, 5 speed transmission, rear belt drive, and a 39mm front fork with single or dual disc options (35mm on FXR until 1989, then 39mm through 2000, FXD had the 39mm fork from day one, except for the 49mm on the FXD model called the Fat Bob). The 1998 FXD to present came with the Twin Cam engine, in 88, 96, and 103 inch versions, with a 5 speed until 2006 and a 6 speed transmission from 2006 til present. 

The only serious difference is the weight, the frame design, and the availability of the two models. There are over a  *million* Dynas out there, and you can pick up a late 2000s FXDB or FXDC for under $7000, and early 2000s for $5000. If it's a 1990s bike and you're paying $5K, you're getting ripped off unless it's a brand new bike with very low miles on it. 

FXRs are in high demand among club guys and wannabe club guys, since the big boys in the 81 ride FXRs as their local bikes, and Road Glides as their touring bikes (drives Bay Area bike prices up for both models). The younger guys ride Dynas because they're cheap and reliable and can be hot-rodded easily without sacrificing reliability.

Shovelhead FXRs (1982-1983) can be found for $3500-4000, and 1983-1988 Evo FXRs that haven't had the transmission mainshaft upgrade or a 39mm fork installed can be had for $4000-4500 almost anywhere. 1989-1994 FXRs with the upgraded transmission and 39mm forks sell for anywhere from $4500 to $8500 here in California, with the high end being bikes with brand  new , big-inch engine builds and a Baker 6 speed transmission, beautiful paint, KrafTech or Chopper guys frames, mag wheels, and so on.

I own a 1985 FXRP (Police model, but never a cop bike- came from the dealer with footboards, windshield, and the word "Police" on the speedometer for $6800 brand new in late 1984- I didn't buy it new, but I have the original receipt from Bob Dron Harley in Oakland CA). It came with $22,000 in receipts from Arlen Ness for transmission upgrade, chrome and polishing on everything that could be removed from the bike and sent to the plate/polishing shop including the wheels, brake calipers, motor mounts, rocker boxes, swingarm, footboards, controls, and so on. Mods were an Andrews cam, S&amp;S carb, Thunderheader, Corbin seat, 12" internally wired ape hangers, a really ugly but expensive 1996 "custom" sea-foam green with hot pink pinstripe paint job ($4500 in 1996), and so on. Everything was polished or chrome except the frame, engine long block and the transmission case. 

The bike was built in 1996 as a show bike then parked in the guy's car collection in his climate controlled "barn" (he was a commercial building contractor- his barn was nicer than my house). It was rarely if ever ridden in those 20 years, so I've had to replace all the rubber oil seals that dried out and cracked in the 20 years since they were new. Other than that, it's a brand new bike with chrome and polishing (and labor) that would cost me about $35,000 today. I overpaid a bit at $7,000, primarily because any FXR I would have bought would have gotten the transmission upgrade (if it didn't have it already), FXRP footboards (I have a fucked up back and need the footboards for comfort), seat, bars, tires, carb, cam, exhaust, windshield and so on. I essentially bought a 30 year old $5000 bike with about $1500 in mods I would have needed to do, and another $20K in stuff I didn't need for another $2000. Finally got all the seals replaced and the brake calipers and master cylinders rebuilt (any bike that sits for 20 years is going to have rust and corrosion in the brake system) and have about $200 more than I paid for the bike in it. It's *quick*. Much quicker than my Road King will ever be at 800lbs, even with a hot rod motor. But a Dyna would be as quick, especially if it was a 96" or larger bike with cams, pipes, tuner, EFI, and headwork. 

My point in all this is that you can find a NICE Dyna or a NICE FXR for similar prices ($5K-8K), but the Dyna for that price is likely to be more reliable, have less wear and tear, and have more parts availability from Harley. FXRs are going to be in conditions from beat to shit to pristine, and you can't place a value based on year and model unless you've specifically looked at the individual bike in question, mainly because so many have been modded by top shelf shops, and an equal number neglected and wrenched on by broke-ass bikers who didn't know what they were doing. 

Here's a brief article on the [FXR](http://www.hotbikeweb.com/bikes/separating-men-boys-history-fxr), but [this forum discussion](http://www.cvoharley.com/smf/index.php?topic=25417.0) will tell you EVERYTHING you need to know about the various years and specific models and options from Harley, and goes deeply into the history of the FXR and all its advantages and shortcomings. 

People with FXRs LOVE them. People with Dynas LOVE them too... and many wish they had an FXR instead or as well. 

Edit: thanks for the gold.FXD (Dyna) is what OP is asking about, not the Softail. The FXR at 585lbs is almost 100lbs lighter than the FXDB at 672. Even the FXRT with touring package is only 635lbs, 40lbs lighter than the Dyna. I'm curious what it is about the wider tire that makes you want to put it on your Heritage. You need to worry about belt clearance as much as fender clearance. If you have less than 1/4" between the tire and the belt (or the belt guard), you'll have problems. It's because he had the big front wheel, obviously. I've always thought those bikes looked dangerous to ride. 

On a more serious note, what.... the.... fuck?!?! I'm guessing the previous vehicle/customer dumped a gallon of fuel on the ground. That, or he had a fuel-line failure, and needed gas because his bike was dumping it on the ground. Damn. That sucks. Any idea if the guy survived? He looked fully engulfed in flames from when the gas tank erupted, spitting burning fuel everywhere. I'm thinking the previous customer dumped a bunch of fuel on the ground. Just starting his bike back up would have done the same thing. Wow. 725lbs?!? My *Road King* is only 770 with the hard bags and windshield on. 800 with a full tank of gas and full oil reservoirs. The fully decked out FXRT with tour pack, leg fairings, stereo, passenger backrest, hard bags and mounting hardware, with the factory heavy-ass dual exhaust with heat shields, factory air cleaner, and footboards is only 654 without oil and gas, adding maybe 25lbs ready for the road. I'm guessing your buddy's girlfriend was standing on the scale. Even if the Ultima flywheels are heavy like the stock Harley wheels of old, and the Fat Bob rear wheel and tire weigh more than stock, and all those extras were made of lead it wouldn't account for 150lbs over the factory weight.  With the Heritage, I'd think going with wide "gangster" whitewalls would look better for a lot less money than trying to make a 150 or 160 fit on your bike. The Heritage looks great with wide whitewalls if you don't already have them on there.  I've got the 140 on my Road King ('08 takes the MU85-16B, which is the 140- MT90 is the 130) and it handles the 1200lbs of the bike, me, and a passenger just fine. But honestly, I can't even see my rear tire, except for the sidewall under the saddlebag. unless I look really hard. :)  

Got it. After reading your description of both your bikes, I realize that I am having a hard time going from my FXR back to the Road King I've put 60K happy hard miles on. It's not nearly as quick or as nimble as the FXR for daily commuting/lane splitting, and while it's comfy as hell, but the FXR is comfy too (once I put the stock pillow back on it and put the Corbin seat on the shelf) and it's a nimble little rocket ship compared to the RK. Who the fuck downvoted ythis comment?!?! The mid controls on a bagger are really rare and totally cool. I'm guessing some moron with forward controls on his 883 thinks just saying something nice about mids is somehow belittling his totally custom Drag Specialties bolt-on forward controls. Idjuts. Fucking Bartell's. Jeebus Kreist. I thought that poster was a joke the first time I saw it. I'm a capitalist and all for separating people from their money if you provide a decent value while fleecing them,  but.... DAMN. Has anyone seen one of these bikes on CL or eBay yet?There's nothing wrong with your stock tire though. Even if you could go with a really wide tire without mods, how much of the tire can you actually see?I asked him why, and his answer was about appearance only. Not much tire to see, so not sure how it would change the look on the bike, but oh well. :)I don't think it's any better or worse than it was a year ago. Sure, there's the same questions about long trips, same "Should I buy an 883 Sportster? By the way, I'm 6'5" with long legs" posts, same "I put on different handlebars, pipes and an air cleaner and now my bike is really custom" photos. But there's still the occasional gem, and some groovy people. Fewer white supremacists, more club discussions. Good mods, decent duscussions. That's a very astute, very accurate take on the Dyna. Honestly though, the Dyna performs better than the needs of 95% of those who would ever ride one. Harley introduced the Shovel then Evo FXR with almost 7" of ground clearance and within three years had lowered it and put forward controls on it because Harley buyers didn't *want* a bike that could handle the hills as well as the competition. By the way, lowering the FXR is something I see as a crime, but that's neither here nor there.

It's sad what happened to the FXR and you'd think with all the awareness of the model that Harley would introduce a Twin Cam FXR as its own product line. Wishful thinking, I know, and there's more than a few FXR-TCs out there as special construction bikes. I just wish the factory would build one. You in the Bay Area?  Frame design accounts for most of it, since fender rails, battery box, oil tank, and everything else that needs to be bolted to the frame is different.It's funny that you mention the exposed rear frame member. When the FXR was relatively new, I was a young biker fresh out of the Marines, being "raised" in the outlaw scene by a bunch of guys who had survived the club wars of the 60s and 70s. Every time the FXR came up in conversation, or when we were at the dealer for this part or whatever, *someone* would make a comment about the frame design, saying "looks too much like a Jap bike" or "looks like a Honda", and not as a positive thing. Within 5 years the whole attitude had changed, but that's one of the reasons the FXR didn't sell very well. The Softail Custom, on the other hand, looked like so many rigid frame "California bobbers", yet offered "some" suspension in the back and sold like hotcakes despite handling like a truck and not being particularly comfortable on longer rides. Read the article I linked to from [HotBike](http://www.hotbikeweb.com/bikes/separating-men-boys-history-fxr). Buell designed the frame. Lemming trains happen on the NA servers, too. Just not quite as often, and folks who aren't in platoons occasionally have mics. My only bitch is that people who are platooned generally are in party chat and can't communicate as "part of the team". Makes shit frustrating when arty is platooned and you can only use the bump prompt, which every noob uses on every tank in their gunsights. The best deals are from friends, since dispensaries charge much more than street prices in Humboldt. Hell, in 8 years in Arcata I don't think I paid for pot once. Too many friends growing willing to toss an ounce here and there. Just about EVERYBODY I know in Arcata who smokes has a 215 card. There's no "going out of your way" about it.Thanks. Sucks that people would steal shit off your bike. Shit like that happens WAY too often. Liced on a dirt goat trail kinda road for two years.... riding a rigid Panhead. Keeping shit clean was impossible. I'd leave 20 minutes early every yhree or four days and hit the coin car wash.  Sucked.Yeah, the Nova story was a disappointment. That Porsche V4 would have been something else. At least we got the fairing and bags for the FXRT  from it. 

Not holding my breath about tge factory doibg anything different. I'm only 53 years old and expect I'll build or buy an FXRTC some day. Just wish I could walk into the dealer and but one. Wasn't being condescending. This is one reason I left Humboldt: too many people *looking* for something to get offended about.&gt;People just don't have enough to talk about

Sure they do, especially in Arcata: hot yoga,  the "energy" inherent in inanimate objects, the healing power of crystals, manifesting whatever, herbal cleanses, organic vegan friendly tattoos, pretending to love everything and everyone, this week's topic in gender studies, how to keep your dreadlocks from molding, how to manage squirrel infestations in your dreadlocks, and so on. :-)&gt;I've had that happen

Man, this happens once a day here in the SF Bay Area. Too many people texting, fucking with their GPS, driving under the influence of children, and so on. The saying "99% don't see you, the other 1% are aiming" couldn't be more True.Funny becoming jazz like that. FZ  only me a politically informed, critically thinking cynic. Does that count?This is the MOTORBIKE builders sub. And that's NOT the world's first electric bike. I've seen it happen. Guessing it's an indy shop and some retard used tire irons with the wheel on the ground instead of a tire machine. Watch someone do this sometime. The wheel is sitting on the rotor and the moron is kneeling on on side of the wheel while trying to get the tire bead off the rim on the other side, bending the rotor and gouging the rim on the asphalt/concrete/gravel. The ONLY way to do thus is to put 2x4s under two sides of the rim anf get the rotor pff the ground. Part weight, but mostly frame design and WHERE the weight is. The FXR frame was designed by a racer named Eric Buell. And that disc golf should be an Olympic sport.Yup. Sometimes indy shops *aren't* a better value than the dealer. Breakout is a Softail, and that frame will NOT "do it all". They handle like a truck compared to the Dyna. Look at the specs for "lean angle" on Harley's website. The Dyna handles MUCH better and the Softail frame has *some* rear suspension, but not enough for touring/long distance riding on any but the nicest freeway surfaces.The Breakout has only 23.5\u00b0 of lean angle to either side, almost 10\u00b0 *less* than the Dyna.They were designed to *look* like the old rigid frame bikes so many bikers loved, yes still have *some* rear suspension. They were and are a compromise, and handling and comfort is what got compromised for appearance.Needin a new motor. Nothing wronG with the Evo or 5 speed enough to make the swap before I need to.It's in your owner's manual. V/IV, KV-1, and the Jumbo (M4A3E2). All have a high rate of fire, good armor for their tier, and can get out of trouble as quickly as they get into trouble. I still don't see why they'd claim "we didn't take the wheel off, so we're not replacing it". ANY responsible shop examines a bike when it  comes in to make sure everything works and note any damage *before* working on a bike. If they didn't say "hey, your rotor is bent" before changing the tire, how the hell do they claim it was already bent before they did the tire? If it's a single-fire coil, it's basically two coils so it doesn't matter which order they fire in as long as the right plug wire is going to cylinder firing at the top of the compression stroke. You wanna switch the coil wires? Switch the plug wires at the plugs. Have the dealer do the 1K service simply because if anything was not quite right in the build and setup, they'll catch it. After that, do the 5K yourself and save a couple hundred bucks. Your owner's manual describes the service schedule. $2100 for PRINTS!?!? Those are NOT original paintings. Read the "details". They're signed prints. Wait a year and buy them used on ebay for $100. Giclee prints are not "original artwork", and while they may be signed prints, (I'm a painter with a BA in Art, so I know a bit about this), they're only valuable if there's a serious demand. Since they're for sale on ebay, I can't believe the galleries have had much luck selling the originals to anyone except the factory. 

It's like Thomas Kincade prints for sale at the mall. They cost about $40 to make and frame and they're the Beanie Babies of art. These prints are of great original artwork, but they're not $2100 prints. Hell, you could probably find original artwork as good for the same or less. I know a couple people who had warranty issues they didn't even notice that were caught at the 1K service and corrected. For someone who isn't a competent Harley mechanic and doesn't know exactly what to look for, it's worth every dime, provided the dealer isn't a complete dumpster fire. They'd rather fix unnoticed warranty stuff than have it become expensive warranty repairs a month or three later.Might have something to do with the fact that he's super thin, as well as what footgear you're wearing, and the seat on your bike. All these things can make one riding position more or less comfortable. Never regretted a dime I've spent on RedWings. I have one pair right now that I got in the dent&amp;scratch department for $75, and I couldn't actually find the blemish that got them there. My last two pairs lasted 4-6 years of everyday use. Resoled them when needed, but never ever had a problem. Some of the best boots you can buy. The only other brand with as much longevity is Danner, but those can cost twice as much as RedWings. Cool. If there's ANYTHING that you think might not be right about the bike, bring it up when you check the bike in. Any rattles, any noises, anything loose, etc. Original artwork is a clever way of saying "I didn't copy this". It's a giclee PRINT of "original artwork". If it said "original oil painting" rather than "giclee print" that would be another matter entirely. Limited edition prints mean they made prints of an original painting, but someone else owns the painting.They're nice prints of nice paintings. I just don't think a print is $2100 worth of nice unless it comes with an 18 year old Russian hooker and a nice bottle of single malt scotch. For $2100 you could get him two weeks in Tahiti, airfare and hotel includedDavid Mann did every Easyrider Magazine centerfold for something like 20 years. All paintings. Iconic images. IF you can find an original painting, that would be great. If you can only find framed posters, that'll save you about $2000They're not even paintings. They're giclee prints of paintings, and don't have anywhere near the collectible value of an original painting. Call it "to Anchorage and back" and you're OK. There are folks who have tried the Dalton on touring bikes, but they never made it. The road is so fucked up (where it crosses streams it's under 18" of water at times) that I wouldn't do it without an adventure bike like the KTM 650 or BMW GS for that one, and only if I was in much better shape than I'd be in after a 5000 mile ride diagonally across North America. 

I did the Dalton in a 4WD Blazer 20 years ago and I have absolutely no desire to ever do it again on a Harley. Ever. No place to pull over for miles on end. No way to leave your bike in the road as truck traffic is constant both directions. If I was in Anchorage and had to take the Dalton, I'd be on a KTM or in a TerraCross or MRAP or some other purpose-built rough-country truck (yes, you heard it here, I'd rather ride a KTM on in northern Alaska than a Harley).

*If* your bike survives the trip, which it won't, your paint and chrome will be *destroyed* by the time you get back, and that's if you don't get in more trouble than that with mud filling the fins on your front cylinder and head and overheating things til you seize a piston. If you manage to make the trip without foot deep mud and water part of the way, there's nothing but rocks most of the whole way and a LOT of tractor trailer traffic from the oil fields kicking up rocks as you pass them going the other direction. Nothing like a 40mph tennis-ball sized rock in the hand/elbow/face/chest/knee to ruin your day. Besides, it's a 4 day *exhausting* round trip from Anchorage to Deadhorse and back on the *right* bike. Imagine doing it on an 800lb bike with street tires? No thank you. 

The ElectraGlide is so much heavier than the KTM 650 (like 350lbs heavier) and soft dirt roads, rocks, places where the road is underwater and stretches of mud 20 miles at a pop will be a huge problem, especially since packing spare knobbies isn't exactly an option on the EG. 

Ride your bike to Anchorage then rent an adventure bike for the Dalton (makes sure you've reserved it and packed adequate gear that can transfer to the adventure bike). 

[Read this, but pay particular attention to numbers 7 and 9](http://www.motoquest.com/blogs/does-and-donts-of-the-dalton-102)

If you do the south road, I-10 is kinda boring. Honestly, if you're up to it physically, and don't mind getting tires replaced on the way with each oil change, I'd take the Alaska trip, but I would make it to Anchorage instead of Prudhoe Bay.Call Nolan and ask them. Did you.... pull the codes from the speedo yet?Do it before your trip. If there's any warranty stuff they find during the service, it'll get handled before your trip.It's all a matter of percentages, that's all. Wanna TRY to make sure cars aren't gonna see you? Go ahead, black out a bike. That's all. Couldn't do it better on purpose.So don't read em. And Waco is relevant to ALL people on bikes, exactly because of how many people there were NOT in a "gang". Some posts are relevant, some aren't. The one way to be sure you don't have to be bothered by them is to not click on the links.We think y'll should read the sidebar about participating here as a human being if you're gonna treat us as a market. You've never been here before. You don't give a shit about us except as a potential source of income. You DIDN'T take 2 minutes to read the sub rules. Try it. Then you'll understand why I'm removing your commercial.Several things are True here- 1) it will be very expensive. 2) it will make the bike much faster 3) you will not see more than a dollar or three of the money you spend when it's time to sell the bike, as add-ons don't add value to a used bike. Your bike 5 years from now will be worth about half of what you paid for it and no add-ons will make it more valuable unless you're buying top-shelf performance parts. 4) you'd be better off putting that money into Russian hookers and automatic weapons, but it WILL make your bike a lot more fun. Cams are best utilized with head work and improved compression ratio. If you're gonna spend the money, that's the right way to do it. Purchase cams *based* on what your compression ratio is and what heads you buy or work you have done. Look at Branch-O'Keefe heads, Wood Performance cams and others. There are folks who specialize in Sportster performance products only, too. Really? He said that before I commented?That's nice. What does it have to do with my response? There was no qualification, no "here's why I'm asking". Just the normal "was he wearing a helmet" that ALWAYS gets asked any time someone on a Harley gets in a wreck. Maybe in your world this isn't part of a larger reality, but in the rest of the world, the FIRST question that gets asked, typically by folks bent on condemning the rider, is "were you wearing a helmet?"All other things aside, what do you want out of the difference? Better freeway performance? Quicker acceleration? Passenger riding? Touring? This is the result of intense lobbying to change definitions over the years. Just as the definition of "organic" food products changed when Walmart got into the organic food game about 5 years ago, "Made in America"  no longer means "hey, this product was made by American workers with American made parts". I'm pretty sure you're suggesting he might worry about cannibalism, but if your boyfriend is intimidated by that, you're gonna need a bigger bo.... I mean, you really need to have a chat with him about how totally fucking cool it is that his girlfriend is a smokin' hott gearhead and has a fucking awesome classic Buick! He can get out there and pass you wrenches and fetch you beverages, or he can go online and maybe find some testicles on sale at Amazon. :)&gt; Aren't Nailheads the prettiest?

Yes. Just... yes.You folks recruiting? Recent ER 1650, WN7 1530, WN8 1850. Cool. Don't know what the shakeup is, as I'm not a member of the sub and don't know what's been going on, but I'l be here. Lemme know?So instead of paying for Bulleitt Rye Whiskey, would other, less expensive brands would have the same thing in the bottle from MGP/LDI? If I can get the same product for less money, I'm gonna spend the less money.
Crown Royal is the "cognac" of Canadian whiskey. Great stuff.
Thanks. That's actually helpful. Bevmo has Dickel Rye for not a lot of $$ compared to the Bulleitt. Worth looking into for the price of a bottle at least. Thanks. I'll check it out.I suspected as much, but i'm gonna check out a couple of the other brands and see how they stack up.Bulleit *is* a decent 95% rye, and I never much liked Rye Whiskey until I tried Bulleit. Right about $30/750ml.Then let THEM find comfort that way. Sadly, all too often people will be so pushy about trying to explain "why " such things happen in terms of their religion that it can feel like they're all making it about trying desperately to justify their religion. 

Sorry, but if someone has something horrible happen like this, as I did decades ago when I lost an 8 month old child, patting you on the shoulder and saying bullshit like "God wanted it this way" or "the lord works in mysterious ways" becomes infuriating after a very short while. If they don't have anything to say or feel awkward saying "that sucks man. Sorry" then don't say it. 

But what happens is people end up going on and on about "God's mysterious ways" and how "this is all part of his plan" until you wanna punch someone, even knowing they mean well. Got to the point in less than a day that I had to forcibly restrain myself from yelling "Bullshit, let YOU losing someone be part of your god's plan. He can fuck off if this is his fucking plan" and split town with the wife for two weeks, immediately after the funeral JUST to get away fro people who insisted on telling us ad nauseum how "God needed him more than you did" or "it's better this way". Buncha shit.
But that's the thing- THEY don't think they're proselytizing. THEY think they're offering comfort and condolences. It's rarely more than empty platitudes, but it's still offensive and seems far more self-serving in comforting themselves than in offering real comfort. Seriously, our FRIENDS, real friends, didn't offer that bullshit, simply because our real friends knew we were both atheist and that it was likely to be unwelcome, even those friends of ours who weren't atheist (I've never been able to be friends with anyone who thinks what *they* believe is more important than what I believe, but I've always offered the same in return). It's always "loved ones" (meaning relatives and in-laws who don't *really* take the time to know you well or ignore you when you tell them you have no use for their religion) or "acquaintances". 

Both groups presume that you feel the same way they do about things, and instead of just saying "man, that sucks", which would have been both welcome and presumed to be honest, folks can't seem to refrain from packing in claiming to speak for their deity and that there was somehow supernatural sentience involved in the decision to kill an 8 month old child. It's *very* selfish on *their* part, from where I'm sitting, and intended to make THEM feel better, especially if I've already told everyone I don't share their views. Only one or two folks did their level best to try and use that horrid opportunity as somehow "proof" of their fucked up religious views, but we already knew those people were assholes and avoided them most of the time anyway. 

So yes, I can fault those who insist on making my loss about *their* religion. It's not some heinous crime on their part, but it does show a serious lack of critical thinking skills, something essential for genuinely offering comfort to someone, rather than empty platitudes.Same as here. Silverfox762Lexol.Is the exhaust stock?That's why the front brake is used for 2/3 of all breaking.Doesn't need to be the footboard area. Speed sensor? Exhaust and footboard comes off. Starter motor? Exhaust and footboard comes off. Cams? Exhaust and footboard comes off. Fancy foot pedal rubber? Maybe not. Air cleaner? Not likely. Not "1970s", 1970! Nice car.Then that's all gonna be on the dealer prep work. I wonder if the bikes show up with the boards installed or not. "From the inside we all know these songs were just *biographically or semi-biographically lyricized* note-delivery-devices"

FXFYAbsolutely. So relevant today. It's actually sad how prescient FZ was. His '88 tour warned the world what would happen when religious fanatics took over. Be a lobbyist. The 1970 Chevelle is the only year with painted sheet metal around two headlights. 71 got one large headlight. 69 had 2 with polished trim been bezels. :)I wonder if Florida has a history of people under 21 on bikes acting like complete assholes. If it's like anywhere else on earth.... probably. How much would a pristine, original condition 1975 Sportster cost? Rideable with low miles, that no one has modified much and maintained properly? There's maybe three on the planet that fit that description. Most have been "customized" until they're barely rideable or not rideable at all. Others have been so poorly maintained that things fell off and folks just removed stuff as it came loose. Then there's the people who have switched the frame for a rigid "chopper" look. 

If you're lucky, you'll find one in reasonable condition that someone hasn't butchered, but that's no longer original. One that can be *turned* into this, would probably cost you $2000-2500, but you'd spend almost that much returning it to original condition, and even then, the bike wouldn't be worth more than $3000. 

I have a different suggestion for you. Even though your dad talks about this bike and talks about how much he loved it, Ironhead Sportsters were, and are, *not* the bike people dream about... once they've owned an Ironhead Sportster. If you want to buy a Sportster, but don't want a nightmare, and want to save some money, look into a mid-2000s 1200C Sportster with a 4 gallon tank. They can be found for $3000-3500 anywhere in the US (ignore prices on craigslist- people are delusional). 

If you want to buy a Harley someone can ride anywhere, tour on, and get around town well on, look into a mid-2000s Dyna for $5000-6000. If you want a Harley that handles better than anything else Harley has built for the street, can handle touring, and is a great around town bike, look into a 1990-1994 FXR, FXRP, FXRS with under 40,000 miles on it and little or no modification. You can find one for $5000 in just about any state in the US (California for some reason has FXRs at a premium price), and the 1999 and 2000 models generally sell for $6000-6500 with low miles. 

Are you trying to gift your dad a bike or do you want one for you?

Looks like it. Oh, I'm sure, and it's Kin-tuckey, with the root word "kin"... as in "ah married mah kin", so there's bound to be a bunch of beat 1990ish Camaros running around. But the car is a $2500 car even in great shape, and the bike certainly isn't much more than a $2500 bike, so it'd be a great trade, if that's what he wants to do and can find someone to trade. I think the guy getting the bike would be getting a better deal though. &gt;I actually do live in south Florida where the roads are straight...

Well, there you have it.

It's funny, I've been looking at FXRs online, particularly on eBay and Craigslist for about 5 years now. Finally got one this year, but all that time I'd be looking, I'd see bikes in amazing condition and well-taken care of for reasonable prices, but there was something like 1/3 of them that when you look closely at the ad would say "lowered". For months I'd see these and think "Who the fuck lowers an FXR? It's the best handling bike Harleys ever sold for the street? Jeeesus." Then one day I was serious about maybe buying one, and shipping it became an issue, so I started paying attention to *where* a bike was being sold. In short order I'd see "lowered FXR" and look at the ad and "Oh, the bike is for sale in Miami/Fort Lauderdale/Boca/Pompano/etc. Nowhere to turn except into the parking lot." and being lowered was explained.  Where'd ya ride from? How long will you be staying? Are you looking for good motorcycle roads in the Bay Area or points north?Prolly just a moron.Don't worry. The first comment was ME asking if this was an ad or if OP was asking our opinion. Of course it's an ad, and there's very little chance OP is going to come back, so I'll give it a couple more days to see if OP bothers to return the courtesy of the answers  he's gotten, and then remove it. Yup. I'm willing to bet $3000 cash would get the seller salivating. Looks like an aftermarket seat with some strange bolty thingy mountie stuff strappy thing holding it on. 

I'm literate, can you tell?
Well, was it the battery? Did you have a heart attack when they told you what a new one would cost?You lost the liberal media guy when you used the word "cognitive". I really think the issue is going to boil down to dose. We did a LOT of dope back in those days, but most people I know did it at work to be productive, at home to be productive, and out and about to make the party be partyductive. Parties and the bar were basically just parties and the bar. People would pass a mirror around a party and you wouldn't know people were using other than the spotlight pupils on everyone... and that once chick in the corner who couldn't stop talking long enough to breathe. But that was about it. I was in Sibiu and Bucharest in July. LOVED it. I think the most expensive taxi ride I took was 1 Lei 50 to get across town in Sibiu, 4 Lei from my hotel to the airport in Bucharest. 

It was absolutely beautiful. Sibiu was built in the 1450s if I remember correctly, the architecture was pretty amazing to look at. I'm not sure i'd want to ever have to repair a roof, but hey, I don't live there.

My friend Ovidiu lives in a village outside of Sibiu. I was struck by how segregated even the villages are, with German, Romanian and Gypsy "neighborhoods", even though each one might be three blocks long. 

Definitely going back next July/August. My friend has an old WWII Molotov war bike with a sidecar I can ride while he rides his Softail. 

Traffic in Bucharest was a fucking nightmare anytime between 15 hours and 19 hours. 

What city are you in? I was in Sibiu Romania this summer. LOVED it. Bucharest traffic was a nightmare, and avoid it if you can. Everything is cheap, relative to the rest of Europe, but it's still an "emerging economy", with all the issues and growing pains you'll find there. 

Search for "Sibiu" in google images. The city is in the Carpathian mountains and was built in the 1450s. Romania has three main populations- Romanian, German/Saxon, and Gypsy. The Gypsies generally don't work (because no one will hire them and they get social welfare now that they're EU citizens), but they send their kids into town to beg. You apparently have to tell them "no" three times before they go away. By day three I would look at whatever kid had his hand out and say "no no no" and they'd turn around and walk away. No, I don't feel bad, because they aren't starving. 

If you are going to Romania next summer, let me know. I'll be there in Sibiu in late July probably. Your username is fucking priceless. He'd be thrilled with a late model Sportster, although if you pick up a Dyna, it won't be but about $2000 more for a decent used one. Late model Sportsters are everywhere for not much money. You can get a perfect 2004-2007 1200 for $3000-3500 and an 883 from the same era for $2750-$3000 if you're smar about it and don't believe the prices on craigslist. Don't be scared of the displacement. The engine design is totally different and size doesn't translate to power the way it does in overhead cam inline four cylinder motors like the inports. 

Read the "Buying a used Harley?" link in the sidebar or the wiki tab. You'll save a lot of.money.

If you haven't taken a rider safety class, get signed up mow. It'll save your life. People who haven't taken the class a something like four times more likely to get in a wreck in the first six months of riding.

Click on the link for "New riders and not so new riders" in the sidebar or, again, in the wiki tab, and spend all 94 minutes watching that film. It's the fundamentals of braking and turning that you never learned and knowing and practicing what's in that film will mot only save your life, but it will increase your riding enjoyment exponentially. I've been riding 33 years and I watch it once every year or so. It's really cheezy, but the info is rock solid. Watch it when you can do so without distractions. You never know which tidbit is going to be the magic difference between an amazing afternoon and a trip to the hospital.

When you go to buy a bike, run the ad past us and we'll pick it apart and tell you the questions to ask and point out things that it'll need or not need. And we'll tell you what a reasonable price might be.

If you can, take 280 south from SF to 85 south all the way back to 101, instead of 1 or 80/580 to I-5. Much nicer ride 75 miles south from SF than dealing with the bayside traffic on 101 or heading straight across to 5 or through Half Moon Bay. 

If you're taking 5 back south, do the 280/85/101 south then cut across 152 east in Morgan Hill to I-5 south.

If you're taking the coast, rather than taking Highway 1 all the way from SF, take 280/85/101 south then cut across 156 west to Watsonville and 1 south on the coast from there, thereby avoiding weekend traffic jams in Half Moon Bay and Santa Cruz. Hwy 1 is a parking lot most Sundays on that stretch, grom Devil's Slide to Santa Cruz. 101south to 156 west to 1 will still give you 400 miles of gorgeous coast highway, but won't start the day with parking lot traffic and besides, it's some gorgeous riding too..

Ride safe.Nah, it's not making you soft. It's letting you enjoy that much higher percentage of your riding time in comfort. You're a damned good rider after 40 years on that Ironhead, so enjoy it. You've earned it. :-) Congratulations! That 100th Anniversary model is a really pretty bike. I like lots of chrome because it makes you more visible to the idiots who are already not paying attention.

It looks really fucking clean, except for some dirt on that wonky missor. It looks like somebody has swapped on a set of drag bars so I'm guessing you can't see over your shoulders behind you. If you remove the nuts holding the mirrors in place and switch them to the opposite side and mount them with the mirror underneath the handlebars, you can see under your arms and see most cars behind you clearly. 

Don't forget to use blue loctite on the nuts when you put them back together. Use that stuff on every single nut and bolt you ever have a reason to remove and reinstall on your bike.

So you were patient and took your time and got the bike for a great price.. Glad we could help! We do try. :-)

How many miles are on it?I have Metzelers on both my Road King and my FXR. Great tires. I was going through Dunlops way too fast. Love the raised white letters. Very 1970s muscle car-ish.Is this a tem now for blacked out bikes or did I really miss the joke? If it's a new term, I like to keep up on this. Where ideas come from is something I'm deeply interested in.Yup, but my body is so fucked up that it's not gonna happen. I've ridden a couple sport bikes. A former friend owns a TL1000, which I really liked, and my nephew has a GXSR750, which didn't do anything for me except go fast. But it's not just about going fast. There's something else entirely that most people who've never owned a Harley miss about ANY askpect of why we ride these things when there's sooooo many bikes that are faster, handle better, and are even better suited for touring (Victory, Honda). 

My physical limitations leave me sitting upright. But  I love to ride *Harleys* and I love to ride *Harleys* hard and I'd love other uprights if they *felt* and sounded anything like a Harley. But without the common crankpin, air cooled, inefficient pushrod motors, they never will. 

By the way, an FXR handles as well as any Japanese upright did in the 80s. It's not a crotch rocket, but it will give a run to any of the uprights that were its market competitors in '82 when they were introduced. I'd only ridden one twice before I went looking for the one I eventually bought, and I was impressed, but I didn't truly realize how much it's a better design than anything Harley's ever sold. It is. Hands down. Once it's set up for the rider (bars, seat, pegs/boards/rear-sets) it's a fucking dream come True.

I have been riding Harleys since December 1982. I have loved most of every mile on those bikes, and I've owned close to a dozen (I think it's 9 now, if you include complete bikes that were in pieces with a title, 8 if you don't count that one, an XLCR which was Harley's cafe racer attempt in 1977). 

But it't that Harley Davidson feel, that *no other bike has* that I love, and within that context I ride the shit outta my bikes. I've ridden a few crotch rockets, and even considered buying a K12 BMW when I went back to riding after breaking my back. I didn't think my back could handle a Harley, but the Road King had air shocks and was fine on the back. But it was sterile. I felt like I was driving a 2 wheeled car.  

I'd love to hang off a bike, but I'm half crippled and live in physical pain 24/7, yet my love of riding has been present the whole time. If I could, I'd buy an EBR/Rotax bike and slam that bitch through the hills, even move back to Humbold to find 100 miles stretches of roads that don't have much traffic on them (Hwy299 from Arcata California to Redding California, and Hwy36 coming back from Redding- there's a famous "twisties next 141 miles" sign on google images. That's Hwy 3. That's probably the prettiest 300 miles of riding you can do while having a blast on a sport bike). 

As I get older, I love riding differently than I did when I was riding rigid frame Panheads and swingarm Shovels. Those bikes didn't handle well and I didn't try to make them, but I handled them to their limit, and could outride most other guys riding similar bikes. I doubt there are too many people who can push a Road King as hard as I do, but I know there are. 

But except for the TL1000, the sport bikes I've ridden are acceleration only to me- linear and lateral, but acceleration, and while that's neat stuff, and lots of people get off on it, it doesn't do much for me without the stuff that the Harley motor sends into the rider. I really liked the new EBR bikes, and dreamed about buying one someday (can you tell I like the Rotax engine?) before EBR folded, even though I could probably not sit on the damned thing for more than 15 minutes at a time.

So, unless they can cure arthritic spines and hips, I'm an upright seating position guy, but within that context I still occasionally have the Road King drifting through corners if I know them as well as you can know a corner, and I drag footboards while compression braking into and accelerating out of the rest. 

But yeah, I'd have a blast on a sport bike but the closest I'm gonna get is the FXR. This winter, paint. Next summer, proper front suspension (maybe off a GSXR or one like it).That's wonderful. Good to hear. Thank you for sharing that. Priceless. :)Just make sure it's got bars on it that will clear the sideview mirrors of cars. Sounds like the battery is dead or the battery terminals are loose. Did you leave the ignition switch on last night? If not, it may just have a battery that's seen the end of its life.

Go to the "Trouble Codes" link on the sidebar and follow the directions and see if the bike has thrown any codes. If it has, that's one place to start, but I suspect it's just got a 4 year old battery and the seller kept a trickle charger before selling it, rather than buying a new battery. 

Did you get it from a dealer? If so, call them and say "I bought this bike yesterday and today the battery is dead. Come pick it up and fix that shit. What kind of business are you running, anyway?"No, the run/off switch on the bars doesn't do anything unless there's juice coming through the ignition switch. Your bike has a switch on the dashboard that you can turn on, and that doesn't need a key for the bike to run. You need the key *fob* for the bike to *start*, but if you leave the switch in either accessory or on positions, it'll drain the battery overnight. I was getting about 6K from a rear on the Road King, and 10-12K on the front. Prolly should have been replaced at 8 or 9K, but I wear the outsides of the tire before the center of the tread, what with all the mountain riding I was doing- front tire was shaped like a V rather than a U by the time I replaced the front.

That was pretty consistent over 55K miles. Put the Metzelers on the RK early this year and have about 4K on the bike without the rear tire looking at all like it's going to need replacing any time soon. 

The FXR had brand new Metzelers on it when i picked it up in early August. I've put over 4K on it since and the tires still look brand new. I'll probably post something about how far I get on a rear tire on the RK in comparison, but I suspect it'll be a long while before I need to do a front on that bike. Yeah, 9,000 miles means it's only ever had 2 oil changes in its life! Brand new bike. Do the *complete* 10,000 mile service as soon as possible. Don't wait. It said for a long time, getting less than 800 miles/year on it. I'd do the fluid service immediately, and if you're going to do it yourself, follow the service schedule for 10,000 miles *to the letter*. There's no warranty, but some things get damaged with age, rather than mileage, and the inspection list will offer you an opportunity to look things over in a way you haven't yet. 

Ride safe! Welcome to the tribe. Looks like the XR750TT fender. Who makes it? That would be an awesome project if you can build a hot rod and get the suspension upgraded adequately to walk the walk that fairing would suggest. 

We'd love to see it when you're done. Sorry to hear about your Brother. Any of us who have been on the road a while have lost Brothers. It sucks, but it's righteous that you were able to ride his bike to his last rest. No doubt the bell did its job letting you know. 

My Brother Little Rich, who "raised me" in the bike world, was murdered by some douchebag he'd let sleep on his couch in the early 90s. About six months afterward, I was riding on Road 200 near Bass Lake, CA, with the ol' lady on the back. Just me and the ol' lady on a lazy ride through the hills, and me on the left side of the lane where I'd always ride when riding tandem with people. Well, every fucking time I'd start to lean into a curve, I'd glance slightly to my right to check and make sure my lane partner wasn't too close, and I'd swear I saw rich with his front wheel about where my rear wheel was, riding his Pan tandem in the lane out of the corner of my eye for just a split second. When I got home and told the ol lady about it, she pointed out that it was Rich's birthday. Trippy shit. 

&gt;  I'm just not too sure about the tradition being started as a prank or whatever. 

I'm not either. Didn't say it was as prank. I asked "Was it originally a joke?" because this is on hypothesis that's been offered to me in the past, but there's no evidence one way or the other and there's no way we'll ever know. 

But I've known bikers who would do shit like that, me and some of my Brothers for instance. There was a dude around back in the late 80s who had a really nice rigid Pan with a dual-disc wide glide front end on it, but he really liked the whole chopper look. Couldn't ride for shit, and didn't know shit about his bike. Bought it for cash and paid us to keep it running. He couldn't tell you whether it had an S&amp;S Super or the original Linkert on there, but he bought a Levi jacket and cut off the sleeves, and had brand new steel-toe boots. Called everyone "Bro" and "Brother" and talked about his "scooter". You know the type. Well we gave him a "no posers" sticker to put on his oil tank and it's probably still there today.

Keeping the rider awake is another thing I've been told. Included it as a question, too. I'd believe this if we weren't all running really loud exhausts and not wearing ear plugs for wind noise. If the bell was loud enough, it'd sound like something was rattling loose and keep you focused, I'm sure, but again "who knows?"

AS for the "doesn't work unless given to you by someone who loves you", I'm gonna hang that in the rest of the "who knows?" list. I'm sure that started with an MC somewhere, and spread. It's not like bikers haven't been known to make little shit up even when talking to their club Brothers. 

But yeah, I agree- I don't think it was a prank, but that's something someone suggested to me, and it's got as much evidence of being True as anything else. 

Ride safe. Yeah, slamming an 800lb touring bike through the hills with 275lb me and a 115lb gal on the back will beat the shit out of a tire. I'd change the rear before it got bald because 1200lbs on a bald tire is a great way to die if you hit a piece of muffler or other flotsam, especially in a turn. The front I'd change when it started tracking too much in rain grooves, because it meant the outside of the tread was worn away enough the the middle of the tread actually had angles in it where it transitioned to the outside of the tread. Makes for a noticeable feeling through the bars when the bike would lean into a turn.Huh. That would have to be a pretty fucking big bell for someone to hear it, say, inside noisy bar, or loud enough to wake you up inside the house, or wherever. Like I said, I'm sure there's many stories, some more likely than others.

Well as far as 1%ers never having bells, the only people I *knew* in the 80s were 1%ers, some more outlaw than others, but some of them had bells on their bikes, and this was before Harley's whole "boutique" business model in the late 80s. Harley dealers didn't sell them back then.So, you think the only 1%ers are in clubs?1%er means "outlaw", it doesn't mean "I'm in an MC". Never has. Some MCs are 1%er clubs, but the vast majority of 1%ers in the old days were unaffiliated bikers. I've never worn a patch and I lived a 1%er life for much of my adult life. I think "promote" would be more accurate than "could sell". :)

&gt;And yes, "murdered out" is what we call blacked out bikes. 

Good to know. I always thought of them as "invisible to cagers", but I guess "murdered out" works. Any idea where the term originated? Oops, one year off. My mistake. I did not know that. Thanks. If you were to post a thing about "check out my shop, this is what we build, and we als sell bikes for far lower prices than you a are used to seeing and by the way, here's photos of our bikes and here's one of the showroom with the bikes we have for sale. Call us or visit!" No one would be upset.:)Do you mean.... Kevlar?

And if so, are you talking about ballistic clothing? "Bullet resistant clothing" as it were, or "tougher than denim"?I'm curious about why they're so insistent that you only wash your jeans once every six months? WTF?!?Prolly. :-)I guess I just can't imagine denim or pants of any kind not being filthy after a week or two.Does the bike have complete service records? Look on our wiki tab and the first section is about what to look for on a bike with no service records. You can also click on the same link in the sidebar.A great tattoo huh? As in write Wall of Text" in a tattoo or something else? Then I'm guessing it came from a dealer. If so, I suspect they did the regular service on it, or have access to the records through their computer dealer network. 

Just make sure if the tires look new. If they look like they'll need replacing sooner rather than later, get them to put new tires on it. 

The V-Rod is basically a drag bike with a headlight and turn signals, as far as Harley's thinking was concerned. The motor is a horsepower monster. If your riding position is uncomfortable on your upper back, you might look into taller bars. Depending on which exhaust is on it, you may have problems with right turns dragging the pipe. If you do, there are different exhaust systems out there designed to get around this. 

Other than that, there's absolutely nothing wrong with a V-Rod. They're great bikes and probably the most popular Harley model in Europe, where people are used to bikes going fast, and most countries don't let you modify your bike to make it perform better, and pushrod motors like the Big Twin just don't meet the demands of those riders. The V-Rod does. HAH! She can read the DOT sticker on the back of my lid if she needs something to read. :)Huh. Crazy. I guess I'm just too much of a slob. I guess it depends on what you want from a jacket. Why do you want nylon? There's ZERO armor value in this jacket. If you want a textile jacket, look at Hein Gericke and others. They may dedicated textile jackets with armor values similar or better than leather. I used to like 'em dumb, but nowadays I want to talk to a girl after she's done wiping stuff off her face. She'll be able to read those three little letters in less than a minute, if I'm not mistaken. :)Well, if you want the jacket for when you're NOT riding, there's nothing wrong with it, I'm sure. Do the kickstart because you WANT to do the kickstart, not because of the rewards. 

But if you're looking for something more than a hoodie, and less than a leather jacket, try adding a leather road vest that's one or two sizes too big over the top of your hoodie. It'll provide you a degree of abrasion-resistant armor, and it cuts all the wind and much of the chill that a hoodie won't on the freeway. 

I'm not an ATGATT guy by any means, but for *comfort* and because there's so damned many assholes on the road, I wear *something* leather on my upper body when I ride... unless it's over 100F, then I switch to a large Levis cutoff vest, as it provides a tiny bit of abrasion resistance, and the cotton layer provides insulation against the sun. HAH! So *that's* there those fucking holes come from. Cool. Do NOT get into a $50-75 eBay vest. If you want to save some money, look at GOOD brand names *used* on eBay in your size. I've found Gericke leather jackets for under $100. If you don't worry about the price, look into things like 415 Clothing, Fox Creek Leather, and Just Leather in San Jose, CA for a heavy duty road vest. I like the Levis jacket cutoff pattern best. These brands are the best heavy road vests I and friends have ever owned. Also, River Road, First Leather, and others, sell nice, heavy vests, often with vents or perforations. You know, that would mesh perfectly with the story the old gray beard told me. If it was an old flyer who gave the bell to someone, it is very likely that this was because that is what they used when flying to keep their attention. 

That is the kind of corroboration that while not proof, is very useful in supporting anecdotal evidence.

Thank you for posting this. It lands that much more validity to the story I was told.Exactly.Another commenter posted something about his grandfather flying in Korea who used a bell to focus on long flights. Take a look. Sounds credible and fits perfectly with the greybeard's story and your thought about keeping a brother "focused", since that's exactly the word his grandfather used when describing the purpose of the bell. Crazy. Would still like to hear why you think 1%ers are only in MCs. 

By the way, I grew up in Philly in the 60s and early 70s and scrapple was one of my favorite breakfast foods.Prolly turkey road pizza by now, with tasty Chex Mix crumbles sprinkled liberally around for character. 

By the way, you should know that hoodie pockets don't work for shit on a bike. Don't use them to storke anything you want to keep. :)

&gt;You need to seriously start putting time aside (like 30 minutes) every day and just keep writing until you hit 60,000 words. Then slap a title on it. Then start sending out query letters.

I can't really see how it would be interesting to anyone much outside of those people who were there, and they were there and don't need to read the stories. Besides, I really can't name names for most of the stories, and there's little chance an editor wants to see "well, there was this one guy who I won't name" every third paragraph, and I'd still be breaking the cardinal rule of 1%ere life with most stories- "don't talk about shit". 

Also, there's absolutely zero photographs from my life at that time, since cameras meant "evidence" so almost no one, and I mean *no one* I knew bothered with cameras unless you were actually *in* a club and documenting parties and bike runs. Outsiders taking photos when club members were present would have a prospect in their face in less time than it takes to say "are you a fucking cop?!?!" 

But, I wonder if a blog about *useful* anecdotes and "riding and wrenching" tips isn't in order, what with so many people doing their own service and the whole vintage chopper/hipster thing. Now to figure out how to monetize a blog and get people to read it. Aging Rebel manages it for biker news, but he's got so many people he knows that he can get the straight dope from that it's a good source of inside info. Most of the guys I knew back then were 20 years older than me, and of the ones who are still alive I haven't spoken with any of them in almost 20 years.

Any ideas?If it's the grip binding on the bars, remove the throttle grip and apply a liberal amount of white lithium grease to the inside of the grip. Don't put it on the bar, because you'll end up greasing where the clamp needs to hold it to the bar. Just inside the grip where it slips over the bar. Since this is all you did differently, I suspect what grease is inside there is something that gums up in cold weather. Honestly... there's nothing really to let go, but you made comments suggesting no 1%er would have a bell on his bike and that 1%ers are only in MCs, which are both way off base. Not seeing them anywhere else only means you haven't seen them anywhere else. 

I wouldn't give a shit except that there's already so fucking much misinformation about 1%ers out there and it comes up occasionally in this sub, especially since there's idiots out there who think the Sons of Anarchy patch they bought on eBay will make little old ladies think they're dangerous. 

Besides, we're not the only two people reading these things, and your helpful input might allow someone else to recognize their misunderstanding of the topic. Hell, in recent years I've met people who *wear* a 1%er patch on their vest who have *no* clue what it means, and there are places where that can cause them real problems. Heh..... heh.... he said "sweaty balls".... heh.

I guess it's possible, but then again, I can't wear a white t-shirt without it being stained before breakfast. Maybe some people really can go six months without sweating, getting disrty, or being near someone's wet dog. This was posted here about three weeks ago.
:( Me too. I don't think I can ever have another. Missed a week's work when I put my last Rottie down. Well, it's $20 *now*, but who knows. I've found really nice leathers for dirt cheap for my lady friends. Nice brands with little or no wear, like Gericke and Vanson for under $100. One Gericke jacket I got for my last wife was $30 and was brand new. 

I agree. The "loved one" bit also makes credible sense for that bike of lore. Now let's see if we don't touch enough minds here that we can actually look back in 5 years and see that the "correct" origin story hasn't spread around considerably. Oh, I know there's a ton of "my life as a biker" books out there, but they're generally either cops who were undercover, 1%er patch holders who were in an MC for 30+ years, or unflattering expos\u00e9s by people with a hardon for MCs. 

Honestly, the problem becomes me running out of shit to talk about without being redundant. I have zero ability to fact check, and again, no photo references, and Americans, at least, can't read a book without pop-up pictures it seems. 

When I was asking "any ideas?" it was more about monetizing a blog and maybe what blog host (not blogspot, hopefully), and how to get people to read it. Any ideas? :):( At least you're responsible enough to not have your dog suffer when you don't have time. Good for you. Sorry you miss him. At least he's loved. I had a press credential for Outlaw Biker magazine in the 90s. Still trying to find a copy of the issue that has my last Pan in it titled "Harley's Harley". There's a blurb on the cover too. Don't remember the issue, but it was late 90s. Maybe '97 or '98. I know we talked about this before and you didn't have it. At least I think it was you. 

I wonder if anyone here would have a complete set, but I doubt it. Maybe one or two older guys, but who knows. Turns out I tossed all my old biker mags when I moved. At least they're not in the closet and they're not in the pile of boxes I still haven't unpacked yet, 30 months later. :)Huh. I wonder if the imgur account is somehow monetized, of if OP was drunk and didn't remember.  Doesn't look like it. There's usually a different shape to the stitching where the boobs go.If you're gonna replace the compensator bolt, go to Harley for the bolt. But it doesn't *really* need replacing. It's got built in thread-locker on it, but if you use *red* hi-strength LocTite on the old bolt, it'll work fine. Just make sure you torque it to the 160-170ft/lbs the book calls for (check your manual for exact torque specs).

But why do you need to pull the primary covers? Isn't the new forward setup (from the FXWG) just a bolt-on at the forward mounting points on the frame? I know the older police bikes had the shifter shaft housing on the front of the cover, but the new ones are different. You can buy a nice little [chrome cap that covers the shifter shaft](http://www.hdforums.com/forum/attachments/dyna-glide-models/69177d1253552425-forward-control-pics-on-superglide-need-a-part-003a.jpg) that comes out of the primary cover, and detach the shifter linkage and let the old shifter shaft just hang down behind the cover without any risk of damage. That way, if you sell the bike someday, all the original stuff for mids are there. I know. I have a friend who is fostering an older dane an she works too damned much. He'd been at the shelter for over a year, but she works too many hours I think for a dane (or any dog) living alone. If you weren't gonna be putting 20K on the bike in the next year, I'd say get the used Road Glide, but you'd have to find one with low miles that someone has already done bars and a bit of motor work too. You're gonna put a LOT of miles on that bike. And you'll have two bikes- a Road Glide for longer stuff, and a Dyna for local riding. Nothing like the extra weight and cargo space and other shit on the RG for being in the saddle all.... fucking... day. But again, low miles bike (under 30K) or you'll have 100K on your bike four or five years from now. 

But a newer Fat Bob with bags and a windshield WILL do the job, weighs less, and is easier to get into and out of smaller places and parking with a lot of bikes, too. But why not get a newer (but not new) Fat Bob with bags, a Danny Gray touring seat, and a windshield for those long-ass rides, and keep the SuperGlide for local daily riding. Either way, I'd recommend getting a set of mid pegs or a set of Dyna Defender (police model) footboards to go with the forward controls on the Fat Bob if you're gonna use it as your multi-purpose bike. I'd say get the Defender shifter setup, too, but I think the Defender still uses a boss cast into the front of the inner primary cover for the shifter linkage, rather than bolted up front for like the Fat Bob. But they sit as high as the pegs and are really really comfortable.

Hmmm..... What if you sell the SuperGlide and buy a Fat Bob AND a Road Glide? :)Yeah, replacing the outer primary isn't necessary unless you really really want the whole thing to look like it never had mids (you can get the cap powdercoated, or buy a little powdercoat kit and a toaster oven and do it in the back yard yourself). Leaving the old shifter shaft there will *increase* the number of potential buyers, because everything will be there without even having to take the primary cover off to switch it back to mids (keep *all* the old parts, by the way... every nut and bolt and the old shifter, since you're replacing it). Doing the swap and removing the shifter shaft and plugging the whole eliminates most anyone who wants mids from your potential buyers pool, since the whole primary would need to come off and that's an awful lot more work than unbolting the shifter assembly and linkage rod, putting the old shifter and footpeg on, and reinstalling the short shift linkage rod. It also does the same thing if you decide you hate the forwards and want to go back to mids. 

LocTite- the 262 is the way to go if you *do* take the primary apart. I use it on both the clutch hub nut and the compensator bolt/nut. When I used it on the clutch hub nut when I did the clutch on the FXR and that nut got *really warm* when I decided to pull the primary a month later and replace all the tranny seals. Really snug bind. Didn't damage threads, but it made me work to remove the nut. Good shit.

Oh yeah, and I no longer use 242 blue on my bikes. I use 243 blue, which is better for high temps and oil resistance. Great shit. Picked up a bottle from Amazon Prime for a few bucks and it's fucking awesome. Thicker than 242 and actually works a bit as a thread *sealer*, too. Nah, get the Road Glide and keep the SG, then once you know for certain the Road Glide is gonna handle the shit you're gonna put it through, sell the SG and pick up an FXR. You'll find a nice stock one (1989 and later) up there for 5,000ish tops, then spend another $1000 on seat, bars, and a Thunderheader, and you'll get to be cool like the rest of the kids with FXRs.

Shit, better yet, get an FXRT with bags and fairing instead of the Road Glide. 1990-1994 with under 30K miles shouldn't cost more than about $6k. Thanks for the heads up about the bells. Good to hear corroboration from someone who was there in the 60s. I'm sure there were multiple reasons today why anybody does anything, when enough time has passed and it's become part of a culture, but yeah, wind chimes have been around since people started stringing shells together and bells almost as long. Makes sense on the MC 1% thing and why someone would only think MCs wore 1%er patches or even identify as 1%ers. I've even heard people here mention places where certain clubs have a problem with people wearing cutoffs if they've not at least hanging around. Sounds crazy to me, but I haven't lived everywhere, and there's more weird shit out there than anyone can imagine.

As for Rich, that club name rings a bell, but I can't remember where else I would have heard it except from him or one or two other guys from the same era. He said it was "in the 60s" that the cop busted his vocal cord "busting up a club rumble". But I wouldn't be surprised. He was the "didn't talk to you if he didn't know you, and even then didn't say much" type of guy, and wasn't an easy guy to get along with for most. In fact, he split the Freedom Riders at some point after I started working at the shop.

Pretty sure he had his 44th birthday while I was working at the shop in '83 or '84 (was asked to draw a .44 caliber S&amp;W on a "happy birthday" banner), so he would have been in his mid 20s in 1966. He was about 5'8", 140.lbs. 

Sadly, he was murdered in the early 90s by some asshole he let sleep on his couch. I've heard two stories, one was that he came home and the guy had drank the 12 pack he'd had in the fridge and Rich blew his stack and the guy shot him because he was afraid he was going to get beat up, and the other was that the same guy had killed his dog and Rich went after him with a bat and the guy shot him then. The guy never got locked up, so I am inclined to believe the second story. 

But either way, he taught me more valuable lessons about life and more about 74s than anyone.  If you have positive memories of him, great, but I wouldn't be surprised if they were negative. He was like that.

I hadn't heard of the 243 either until I went to replace a bottle of 242 that had been knocked over unnotoced. Went on Amazon and there was the 243 staring me in the face. Read the description and ordered it immediately. Love the stuff. I'd recommend cinching down the pinch bolts then tightening the axle nut, *then* loosening the cinch bolts to let any flex in the for tube loose, *then* retighten the cinch bolts once any torsion is removed from the fork legs.

Also, get the *factory* service manual for anything you do to your bike. They're amazing and the same book the factory mechanics use. You can probably find a .pdf here through the sidebar. Don't bother with Clymer or Haynes, neither is as good as the Harley manual. I won't use anything else on my Road King or FXR. Pre-1980s manuals aren't very useful for much, but after the mid-80s, they're worth their weight in gold.  You'll be doing [motorcycle gymkhana(https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IBGwzK6Q1Gg) in no time! Awesome.I figure if that's what professional lumberjacks use to wrap "two man" saw blades, it'll work on crash bars, too. Damned near bulletproof stuff.The east bay ties in Rich neatly because he was from San Leandro/Hayward and his Freedom Riders patch was from the Hayward charter, rather than San Jose, which was closer. And yeah, he had a good ride. I could fill a book with the lessons he taught me about life, Brotherhood, riding, integrity and so on. Named my second Pan after his Pan "Ghost". 

About the cuts- I'm blown away that people would have such a hardon for total strangers that they'd pull a Levis cutoff because, wait, what?!? Sounds kinda overly self-important, but hey, I've seen some MCs where *every* guy had a "40 pound patch". Fortunately, living in CA clubs like that don't last too long. Besides, didn't everyone wear a denim or leather when you were down here, club or not? 

Western Washington, huh? Is this bleed over from Idaho, or just a local thing. I saw all kinds of weird shit at a bike night in the Coeur d'Alene area a couple years ago. When I moved back to the Bay Area in 2013, I was blasting south on 80 north of the Bay Bridge and saw a patch up ahead one lane over. As I got closer, wouldn't ya know it, it was a full 3 piece Sons of Anarchy patch, California rocker, MC, diamond patch and all on a proper road vest and a young guy riding a T-bar Dyna. Was NOT Halloween, nor was it one of the 81 guys in the Bay Area who were actors on the show. Just some poser who bought a bootleg SoA patch set on eBay (the FX channel apparently promised the 81 technical advisors and actors on the show that they wouldn't sell bottom rockers, MC patches or diamond patches with official show gear in return for their help making things as "real" as possible, but bootleg sellers don't give a shit). It was the first time I'd ever seen one since I'd spent the last 8 years mostly riding on the north coast and 199 and 299 between 101 and I-5. Since then we've had folks post pics here of clubs in Europe and Great Britain named Sons of Anarchy and just take the patch set completely from the internet. Crazy shit. This is how I know I'm getting old and the world will never be the same- I look around and think "these fucking kids don't know shit!" The grey hair coming in sorta helps, too.  

But yeah, in the last half dozen years we started seeing all kinds of rich kids in their brand new Frisco Leathers (from the old Frisco Choppers, now California Choppers) road vests over a blue hoodie, T-bar/quarter-fairing Dynas, wearing skid lids and white tennis shoes, just like the blonde kid on the show. No gloves, no chaps, just looking like they came right off the show or like their girlfriends bought them a full outfit at Frisco Choppers. I can't really imagine anyone here getting upset, since there's really no outlaw scene outside of the MCs (helmet law and 3-strikes law in the 90s kinda killed that completely). But *everyone* wore Levis and leather cutoffs back when I was heavy in the scene, and most without any kind of patch at all, unless it was a diamond patch or a 13 for the pot smokers.

I'm on my second road vest in 33 years and if someone tried to pull it here in California, I would be so fucking flabbergasted I'd probably laugh my ass off.

Well, thanks for trying. One day, I'll move again, pack the house, and find the box exactly where I thought it was but couldn't find it. Willing to bet the 9ers now trade for a tackle, guard, and/or center, then when Gabbert does so much better, they cut Kap. It sucks all the way around, because when Kap had a healthy, talented offensive line, his strengths and weaknesses weren't nearly as important. But if they fix the O-line *after* benching Kap, then keep Gabbert in when things get better, well...

Of course, the FO would have to be actively trying to fix the O-line for this to happen. FUCK THESE PEOPLE. What part of the world are these fucking assholes in? Jeezus, even here in the fucking overpriced San Francisco Bay Area, I don't hear shit like that. What... the... fuck?!? 

By the way, if you want to put an exhaust on there that *will* improve performance, and will still piss off these assholes, look into a 2 into 1 Vance &amp; Hines ProPipe... *without* the "quiet baffle". It's the loudest muffler pipe I've ever put on a motorcycle, and my Road King sets off car alarms when I'm putting past with next to zero throttle. The Thunderheader is as loud when the throttle is wide open and through the whole rpm range, but it's a lot quieter at idle and with light throttle. But... but.... your drone might have a camera and see their 50 year old, morbidly obese bodies in... less than flattering positions. "This is Shropshire" and we get the opening notes of Dueling Banjos from the film Deliverance. When he's welding all that shyte into the floor, we get what I think was the theme song for The A Team. Fucking priceless. I rarely laugh out loud at videos like this, but these guys really have their act together. Springer Softail. Locking bags aren't really an option unless OP wants to buy the stupid cable locks, but even then, all it takes is a good razor knife and they're open, right through the ABS skeleton. 

If you gotta park a bike outside, NEVER leave anything in the bags. You couldn't pay me to live in an apartment and park my bike outside, even if it had the quietest pipes going. Dew collecting at night with pit the chrome in two weeks, and if it's not parked under a carport, well....

The first thing Tuesday morning I'd insure the bike for full coverage, comp and collision and uninsured/underinsured motorist. Insure the bike for "market value", since for "replacement value" they look at the blue book, which is gonna be low. Market value means they look at online ads for similar bikes, and we all know people think the seat of their bike is stuffed with $100 bills. This only costs a few bucks/month more, and is worth every dime. If you've got an honest receipt for what you paid for the bike, that's a good start. But assholes have a habit of taking their unresolved penis-size issues out on other peoples' stuff. You don't want some rash cunt backing over your bike and driving off before your pager even goes off. Then there's the assholes who would steal another man's bike. They don't deserve to breathe the same air we do, but they exist and are a reality of life when you own a motorcycle.

Now that it's noon on Tuesday, get a nice fabric bike cover with a cable lock and asbestos fabric on the pipes area. Import bike shops are more likely to have nice covers for reasonable prices, and with all the metric clone cruisers out there, they'd definitely have one to fit your bike for under $100. It'll keep condensation off the bike and you won't come out one morning three weeks from now and wonder why all your chrome has the measles. Yes, I know you aren't one of those idiots who think vaccines cause the bubonic plague, but Harley chrome pits faster than a murder weapon tossed in a river. The cover won't stop someone with a knife, but assholes are generally lazy.

Now that you're insured and back from the bike shop with a nice cover and it's 2:30 Tuesday afternoon, go to www.padmapper.com, type in your zip code, then fill out the filters, checking the boxes for "homes", as well as "in-law units" and add the keyword "garage" and start looking for a house. Padmapper has EVERY rental unit that's listed anywhere online, craigslist, real estate offices who operate rentals as well as sell, rentals.com, homes.com, and whatthefuckever.com, and they work on a google map template and will show a pin for every listing that fits your criteria. This has little or nothing to do with listening to the assholes or them fucking with your bike, but instead doing what you can to avoid the nightmare of having your bike stolen. Even now that you've got full coverage on it, the crushing realization that your baby isn't where you parked it is something no proper sadist should have to experience.

I would not live in an apartment with underground parking, since I couldn't see the bike from my window and, well, people suck. Living in an apartment with your bike outside is just begging for heartache.

Good luck.
So, how does it feel when you grab that throttle at 3500rpm in 3rd gear getting on the freeway and you shift into fourth and look down and you're doing 90+ mph with two gears to go? Yeah, those dudes who talk endless shit about Harleys have NEVER ridden one. Congratulations. Welcome to the tribe.Pretty sure thats a proprietary plug for electric riding gear. If you trace it back into the bike is it a stand alone harness to the fuse box or battery, or is it part of a larger HD wire loom? There are a lot of 12 volt DC plugs that different companies use and this is one of them.

Once your new battery is in the bike, put a meter across this pins. Should read the same as your battery voltage.Get a 6 speed, EFI bike that's had cams and had work. My Road King hits 5th gear at 105 when it's wide openat redline and 6th at 115, but you know that. :-) For others reading this, read on...

Taller final drive ratio on the 6 speed bikes (wheel and tranny pulleys, not 6th  gear) than on 5 speed bikes, which is taller than 4 speed bikes. My FXR was turning 4150 rpm in 5th at 85 until I put a 65 tooth wheel pulley on there. Now 3600 @ 85mph eith 2000 rpm to go. My Pans and Shovels were turning over 4000 rpm at 70 with stock gearing. 

The stock transmission sprocket on a Pan or Shovel is either of 22 or 23 tooth, with the stock rear wheel sprocket on a drum brake wheel havin 51 teeth. Most people switched to a 24 or 25 tooth transmission sprocket to get more legs on the freeway, or put a bigger motor sprocket in their primary as it slows down engine speed for the same mainshaft speed in the tranny. With a 25 on the tranny however, you'd probably need to clearance the bearing support or inner primary because it's just too big.

One tooth bigger at the transmission is like two teeth smaller on the rear wheel. With a 24 tooth tranny sprocket and a  50 tooth rear wheel sprocket you'll be doing 100 instead of 70 (not that I was ever comfortable doing 100 on a Shovelhead or Panhead. 85-90 was more than fast enough considering the drum brakes on three of the four). :-)

By the way, *hey stranger*. How was your summer? Build anything interesting this summer? Did we ever see finished pics of that rigid monster with the 20" wide rear tire (yeah, I know, but it was BIG)?Read the "Buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar or go to the wiki tab at the top of the page. You'll see exactly how easy it is...I'm wondering /u/Generic_Cleric is either a minister, a woman, or both. The deadpan responses are looking too much like 'straight lines' and a setup for "I have tits" and dropping the mic. If it's indicative of being a member of the clergy, maybe there's other glaring road blocks you're putting up yourself.

But hey, if that's just a Dungeons and Dragons nickname, that could be the issue too. Are you spending too much of your free time playing Magic cards with your nerdy friends who haven't showered in three weeks? I work in a tattoo shop and get more action than I know what to do with from Silicon Valley professional women... and I'm a fat, crippled 53 year old heavily tattooed felon who uses four-letter punctuation in every sentence. So maybe it's the places you hang out or the things your project. Hoping gals are gonna flash you their tits at the PTA meeting and church rummage sale is probably not a high percentage bet. Moms at the "Your Daughter Thinks She's a Disney Princess And Won't Listen To You Unless You Call Her 'Your Highness'" intervention seminar aren't going to be putting themselves out in quite the same way. 

My advice? Start hanging out where young, attractive women hang out with an expectation of finding some kind of thrill- bars, tattoo shops, methadone clinics and that fraternity house famous for their Roofie KoolAid Cock-tales, and always have a 6 pack of Magnum condoms hanging out of your jacket pocket and leave a copy of 50 Shades of ~~Date Rape~~ Grey hanging out of your hip pocket. You'll get some attention.

But hey, you're *still* not gonna get any attention if they think "He's cute.. oh, wait, he's wearing a 'Han Shot First' t-shit." OK, since I offered *three* different possibilities, could you narrow it down just a wee bit? I have no desire for you to out yourself (unless you're a Catholic priest, then just publicly admit that you're gay and get fired so you can go be yourself for once in your life and find real happiness without living a lie), but now I'm really curious...

At least you use four-letter punctuation, so you're obviously a female Unitarian minister wearing a t-shirt that says 

"Obi-wan is my shepherd, I shall not want, 

He maketh me to fall down in green swamps, 

He leadeth me beside the still waters of Dagobah, 

He restoreth my Force, and leadeth me to the path of a little green midget who sounds like Kermit the Frog, 

Yea, tho I walk through the valley of the shadow of Tatooine, I shall fear no Dark Side, for Han art by my side".

*****
Ride safe. Praise be to Yoda. He is the One Jedi Master and Obi-wan is his prophet. There is no Yoda but Yoda. Yup. Having a thief steal your trash is always a good feeling. And giving a thief something *easy* to steal, so he'd feel a sense of accomplishment and completing his task *before* putting a hammer through your driver's window, is smart thinking. :)

When I lived in the Sierras and worked full-time in Fresno, it would be 105+F in the summer, 3 days out of 5 some years. I'd just leave the windows down, since my deductible was as much as the cost of replacing the window. Never leave anything of value inside, and don't spend money on any kind of decent stereo (which was funny because I was managing a high-end car audio installation as my day job- needed health insurance for the kids). Good to hear. Nothing like taking a stand. Most of those obnoxious assholes could prolly use a wake-up call. By the way, the cheapest price you'll find is [American Classic Motors on eBay](http://stores.ebay.com/AMERICAN-CLASSIC-MOTORS?_dmd=2&amp;_nkw=pro+pipe). I saved something like $250 on mine and it wasn't a second or a blem. Free 3 day shipping, too. 

But yeah, the ProPipe is fucking LOUD. The option of the "quiet baffle" is just that, an option, so make sure you gon't get that one by accident. Just get the regular ProPipe and you'll *still* wake those assholes up when you start your bike, and you'll set off their car alarms, but you'll be tempted to yell "You stupid cunt, I just spent $650 on a fucking muffler pipe, and you're still fucking complaining. Fuck off!"We've been through this before, and it's obvious you still haven't ever ridden a bike with loud exhaust to compare to how other people behave when you're riding a bike with quiet exhaust. We don't ride in a fucking desert, there are reflective surfaces EVERYWHERE and the sound coming out the back of the bike *precedes* the bike where it's going. It's also how you ride- if you never split lanes, and don't fucking ride faster than the little old lady who can't see over her fucking steering wheel, who cares, but for people who are riding a bit aggressively, and *especially* when splitting lanes, the *sound* of the bike is the *only* thing that gets people to look up from their cel phones when they're sitting in traffic and move the fuck over. 

When riding rurally, in 30 years I've only seen ONE FUCKING DEER when I have loud pipes on a bike. EVERY time I've had quiet pipes to get a ticket signed off, I'm dodging Bambi and his fucking friends every time I come around a corner. They can hear the bike coming a mile away and get the fuck out of the road.

And fuck what people think. They already have stupid fucking opinions and think assholes like Ben Carson are charismatic visionaries. FUCK THEIR AVERSION.

And last but not least, you *still* think we're talking about "straight pipes" when we talk about loud bikes. Properly built and tuned muffler pipes are still loud as hell and the bike DOES run better. 

So until you've actually ridden a bike with loud pipes in heavy traffic and actually compared how people act when changing lanes, pulling out of driveways, and making room when you're splitting lanes, you're just like the assholes who go on about apehangers being uncomfortable while never once having sat on a bike with them on there... or you'd know you were full of shit.No junkies at the methadone clinic? Damn, but "damaged goods" is so fucking hott sometimes, especially when they're from the right side of the tracks and will do *anything* that would give their mothers a heart attack. At least you said "no junkies... because I'm married". That gives me hope. &gt;;-]

I'm not really a big star wars fan either, but you gotta admit, The Yoda's Prayer (which I may have seen some version of 20 years ago, but wrote spontaneously half an hour ago), would work for a t-shirt. Took me a couple looks at google to figure out what planet the swamp was on, and how to spell Obi-wan, but hey, the story is pretty old-testament, so it wasn't hard to put together.

If I'm ever in need of a Mormon priest, I'll let you know. Until then, ride safe. Call your local BMW dealer. They have NICE covers. Whatever you do, get one with *asbestos fabric* where your exhaust goes on the right side of the bike. Most covers are plastic/nylon and will melt to your pipes if you put them on right after getting off the bike while the exhaust is hot. You're [D J Qualls](http://ia.media-imdb.com/images/M/MV5BMTgzNTE4NDA4OV5BMl5BanBnXkFtZTYwNTQyNjIz._V1_SX640_SY720_.jpg)? Damn, I loved you in Scrubs and The Man in the High Castle! Will you be back for Season 2?So what? When a motor only turns 5500rpm and doesn't ever *need* to lean over at 140mph *by design*, it doesn't matter what a sport bike will do in 1st gear. A Nissan GT-R can dust a new Camaro in the hills. But who the fuck cares? Not *buying* a Camaro if I want a car for the race track, and I'm not buying or building a Harley if I want to go down to Laguna Seca and drag my knee around the track all afternoon.  

Apples and Oranges. Why the fuck can't people get that when talking about what Harleys, they're not comparing it to an engineered Moto GP bike with a license plate and *it's not fucking relevant to bring it up... ever*?!?! But if you owned a Harley with a hot rod motor, you'd know that what I'm talking about, and it's not top speed or pure acceleration. I figured 20K minimum. This is why so many guys own Road Glides,.

Get the Road Glide (low miles) and once you're certain it's ready for the road, off the SG and pick up the FXRT. But go through it *completely*, even if it's in proper running order. Hell, put a TC96 motor and 6 speed out of a late 2000s Dyna in it! Only takes a bit of frame modification, and I'm absolutely certain your Brothers will have a guy who does this. If you can't find a Twin Cam FXR already set up, you can build it. Just buy an insurance wrecked 2007 or later Dyna and take everything off it.

A properly set up, completely gone through FXRT with the right seat, 39mm or larger forks (new Dyna forks are 49mm!) and an 18" rear wheel (10+lbs lighter than the 16") and a 19" on the front will fit the bill perfectly- but remember, if it's an Evo bike, when most of them were new there was a 55mph national speed limit so if it's got stock gearing you'll be running out of motor at 105mph and that will just lead to an exploded FXRT trying to keep up. At a minimum you'll need a 34 tooth tranny pulley and a 65 tooth rear pulley to keep up with the big boys (unless you've done the 6 speed TC96 swap, which has the same gearing as their bikes). It'll make leaving traffic lights a bit clutchy, but cruising 80 in fourth with the  motor turning 3500rpm, and shifting into fifth at 90, will make it a respectable comparable bike. Well it's good to see you back. Hope we'll see you occasionally in the future. Yeah, that's why I went on with "why can't people", rather than "why can't you". Maybe I should have been more clear, but every time someone brings up sport bikes, it's usually "Harleys suck because they're not MotoGP bikes" when the two have nothing to do with each other. 

Well, we *can* compare fruit, but if you try to make an apple pie with oranges, you're gonna end up with soup that gives you the running shits. :)

but look at OP's response to the same comment you first responded to. He comes from sport bikes, and this bike has power to spare. 

Ride safe. Yup. If I hadn't broken my back and herniated 4 discs in the lumbar, and didn't have two very arthritic hips and an arthritic thoracic spine, there'd be an EBR/Rotax monster next to the FXR and Road King in the garage.  :) I wrote [this discussion thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/3ql09u/i_ride_with_a_spine_injury_lots_of_riders_have/) a couple weeks ago. You might find it interesting and even useful. Well, get one with the lowest miles that has the best motor/seat/bars setup. If it's more expensive, it'll be worth it, but remember, do NOT pay asking price. Especially this time of year with used bikes, *cash* makes people agree to stuff they wouldn't agree to otherwise. Also, look for ads that have been up a month or more. By that point, they've accepted that they want too much for the bike. "Shiny side up" used to be the phrase, but with all the blacked out bikes these days.... :)Nicely done. What year? How many miles? Which motor? "Two rockets..."? The PT Cruisers behind the pretty bike?  Thunderheader is a wonderful exhaust. I have one on my FXR and I love it. I'd get a speedo and get it hooked up. You'll have a harder time selling the bike with unknown miles. You won't have to sell it for less, it just won't see as many interested people because they want to know how many miles are on a bike. 

If you're not wearing a full-face helmet, you should look into wearing foam or other earplugs every time you get on your bike. Prolonged wind noise coupled with loud exhaust noise causes permanent hearing damage. Every time you get off your bike with your ears ringing, that's hearing damage, and it's cumulative. My  hearing is damaged in both ears and it sounds like the tweeters on my stereo are busted. Anything over 6000Hz is muted and I'm deaf by 10K in my left ear, and 12K in my right. All from riding without earplugs and having bikes with loud exhaust. Didn't think it was ass-kissing. I would have seen the lipstick on my butt. :) 

But thanks for the kind words. I'm just giving back some of the massive lore and knowledge I was gifted by a couple old bikers in the 80s. Didn't have anyone to pass any of it on to until I found this sub, and you all have been gracious enough to not tell me to shut up too often. I just couldn't bring myself to use a term I learned yesterday. Sounds too much like the guy on the new Sportster calling everyone "bro" and talking about his "chopper". Nah, being a biker is only expensive until you finally have the two bikes you really need. After that, it's just gas, oil, tires, and insurance. :)I buy cheap, tapered yellow foam [3M E-A-Rsoft earplugs](http://www.ebay.com/itm/3M-Ear-Soft-Yellow-Neon-Ear-Plugs-312-1250-No-Cord-200-box-/191676325029?hash=item2ca0cc9ca5:g:w-YAAOSwniRWOEvw) I get by the case at Amazon. They're about $12/100 pair, and you don't worry if you lose them. There's a ziploc in the saddlebag of both bikes, and a couple pair in the bottom of my chest pockets on my road vest and jacket. Never worry about dropping them, losing them, etc. Bars being setup *correctly* make all the difference. My 16" apes on the Road King are *perfect* but if I had them tilted forward, I'd be in pain every day. Religion. Because theres thousands of years of fucked up, evil shit to rant about.Hey, you posted "my first *Harley*". Have you got much history on other motorcycles? C'mon, it doesn't take much to understand that a cop on a bike can go the same places you can go on a bike, and even more, because he doesn't have to worry about tickets, and people will get the fuck out of his way. From parades to crowd control to getting through a traffic jam to a wreck and direct traffic, there are *many* reasons to have cops on bikes... if you don't just have a hardon for cops and don't want them having fun. I, for one, would *love* getting paid to ride a Road King 40+ hours/week. Wouldn't be as a cop, but if I could, I would. Cool. Have you taken an MSF rider safety class? If you haven't you need to. Even though you've been riding for a year, the basic fundamentals of riding are something that most people on bikes do not understand and will not understand by osmosis. IF you think in terms of "leaning into corners", you do NOT understand the most basic fundamentals of how motorcycles turn, no matter what you're experience (I've known guys with 20 years in the saddle who don't know what counter-steering is and why that's the only way our bike turns). People who haven't taken the class are something like 4 times more likely to wreck their bikes than people who have. 

Even if you've taken the class, and if you haven't, go to the sidebar here and click on the "For New Riders and Relatively New Riders" link and sit down for 94 minutes and watch the entire movie. It'll save your life and exponentially increase your motorcycling pleasure. You can also find it through the wiki tab at the top of the page. 

Good luck. Welcome to the tribe. I seem to remember you writing "that "loud pipes safes lifes" is just bullshit", and that is, not to put too fine a point on it, full of shit. Had you intended an intelligent discussion, you would have phrased your *opening sentence* differently. Instead you chose antagonistic language about a point we've talked about ad nauseum. But hey, blame me. I'm OK with that. 

Point 2) Noise pollution is a very real thing, but "hurts people"? Only if they get in my face about my pipes when I'm in a bad mood. Freeway noise, city noise, airport noise, typical city/suburb noises like asshole screaming tweekers, schizophrenics yelling at the trees, and drunks yelling at any and everything are far more "harmful" than a bike going past every now and then. Singling out loud pipes as actually hurting people is a stretch. 

Point 3) People are already biased against bikers because the only bikers they ever see beyond going past on the freeway when they're sitting stock in parking lot traffic is "World's most dangerous gangs" and "Gangland" and "Sons of Ikea" and "Devil's Ride" and other moronic shows that do nothing to help peoples' attitudes towards bikers, and in fact do everything possible to create bias. It also doesn't help that people who don't know what they're talking about keep repeating that "loud pipes saves lives is bullshit" as they they are an authority on the subject. Pointing out potential negatives of loud pipes DOES NOT INVALIDATE THE CLAIM THAT THEY SAVE LIVES. 

4) Road rage is because assholes have no impulse control and think they have a right to get pissed at any fucking thing except themselves, when bad time management, stupid decisions, and an unwillingness to address anger issues. Blaming bikers with loud pipes for road rage is like blaming a battered woman for being beaten because she didn't fucking cook dinner on time. 

And I'm happy engaging in an intelligent, non-antagonistic discussion when that's what's offered, rather than "Thanks for telling me I'm full of shit" sarcasm. :) But on a serious note, even though it's much fewer syllables, I can't get used to saying "murdered out" when I've been calling it - making your bike more invisible to assholes who already "didn't see the motorcycle officer, they sure are dangerous. Do you know a bodyshop that can fix my car cheap?"Yup. You've seen my bikes. Every one I built was chrome and polished aluminum and... black. The Road King will stay copper until it needs paint. The FXR will get black this winter. Yes, but when you preface your points about loud pipes having drawbacks with a condemnation of an unrelated viewpoint about saving lives, those proponents of that viewpoint are unlikely to listen to your points about the drawbacks. Had you not chosen to condemn a completely unrelated topic, how do you think I might have responded? The thing is, this is common. 

Whether wanting to talk about negatives of loud pipes, or more commonly, ridiculing those with loud pipes as only seeking attention, those discussions ALWAYS begin with the fallacious ridicule and condemnation of the "loud pipes save lives" viewpoint and proponents. You should expect no better, more friendly response as long as you and others *choose* to frame the discussion of those issues in terms of "loud pipes save lives is bullshit".Exactly what /u/longhairedcountryboy said. It'll need new tires, a complete oil and fluid service, will probably need to have both front and rear brakes flushed with new fluid and bled, even if they work fine, and check carefully for rubber seals leaking after a few days on the bike. 

Look behind the primary cover for signs of oil. If theres no sign of leaks after a week, you're good. If there are leaks, the primary cover and drive need to come off to replace them. But ten years isn't too long and you may be fine. No oil lines to worry about, but imspect the fuel line from the tank to the carb.

I would drain any gas in the tank into a glass bottle and inspect the bottle for rust or water. Shouldn't need more than new gas, but if rusty, that might be an issue. Might drop the carb float for good measure and clean any sediment out of the bowl..

Sounds like a brand new bike otherwise, with another 100,000 miles of riding in its future.

How much does the seller want?I passed on a 2009 FXDC with 6000 miles on it and brand new tires, Dyna Defender footboards, crash bars, Vance &amp; Hines exhaust, Mustang seat and a windshield earlier this year. Seller wanted $6,600 for it. I passed. It was worth about that or a few *hundred* bucks more. Brand new bike with LOTS of optuons. Only ever had two oil changes.Yes. Engine cover? You mean the primary cover?Offer $2600 and go no higher than $2800-2900. He's expecting to take a hit on it, and priced it at $3400 expecting $3000. If it had 15K miles on it, it might be a $3000-3500 bike. It's got 29K so it's maybe had the 30K service, but if it was just an oil change, there's a LOT more to do at 30K than just oil. Do you know if the dealer serviced it? I would have had to ship it and shipping cost would have put the bike over $7400, which was the absolutely most I could see paying for a low-miles 2009 FXDC with all the things I was going to do to it anyway. To put it simply, I didn't feel like paying $7700 for it. It wasn't worth more than $7000. Period. How long has the bike been for sale? IF it's been over a month, he'll have to accept that he wants way too much. You're my hero for getting banned for calling Cunt a cunt. If it is. The cover down by your foot peg or shifter, it is the primary cover and covers the clutch, primary chain, and compensator. If its just the outer cover there's absolutely no problem and you could probably ride it dry for a few days with absolutely no problem.
But it's called the primary cover and if you need a gasket you order a primary cover gasket, if you need the inner primary you order an inner primary. That's just what it's called.I wonder if Florida has a history of people under 21 on bikes acting like complete assholes. If it's like anywhere else on earth.... probably. How much would a pristine, original condition 1975 Sportster cost? Rideable with low miles, that no one has modified much and maintained properly? There's maybe three on the planet that fit that description. Most have been "customized" until they're barely rideable or not rideable at all. Others have been so poorly maintained that things fell off and folks just removed stuff as it came loose. Then there's the people who have switched the frame for a rigid "chopper" look. 

If you're lucky, you'll find one in reasonable condition that someone hasn't butchered, but that's no longer original. One that can be *turned* into this, would probably cost you $2000-2500, but you'd spend almost that much returning it to original condition, and even then, the bike wouldn't be worth more than $3000. 

I have a different suggestion for you. Even though your dad talks about this bike and talks about how much he loved it, Ironhead Sportsters were, and are, *not* the bike people dream about... once they've owned an Ironhead Sportster. If you want to buy a Sportster, but don't want a nightmare, and want to save some money, look into a mid-2000s 1200C Sportster with a 4 gallon tank. They can be found for $3000-3500 anywhere in the US (ignore prices on craigslist- people are delusional). 

If you want to buy a Harley someone can ride anywhere, tour on, and get around town well on, look into a mid-2000s Dyna for $5000-6000. If you want a Harley that handles better than anything else Harley has built for the street, can handle touring, and is a great around town bike, look into a 1990-1994 FXR, FXRP, FXRS with under 40,000 miles on it and little or no modification. You can find one for $5000 in just about any state in the US (California for some reason has FXRs at a premium price), and the 1999 and 2000 models generally sell for $6000-6500 with low miles. 

Are you trying to gift your dad a bike or do you want one for you?

Looks like it. Oh, I'm sure, and it's Kin-tuckey, with the root word "kin"... as in "ah married mah kin", so there's bound to be a bunch of beat 1990ish Camaros running around. But the car is a $2500 car even in great shape, and the bike certainly isn't much more than a $2500 bike, so it'd be a great trade, if that's what he wants to do and can find someone to trade. I think the guy getting the bike would be getting a better deal though. &gt;I actually do live in south Florida where the roads are straight...

Well, there you have it.

It's funny, I've been looking at FXRs online, particularly on eBay and Craigslist for about 5 years now. Finally got one this year, but all that time I'd be looking, I'd see bikes in amazing condition and well-taken care of for reasonable prices, but there was something like 1/3 of them that when you look closely at the ad would say "lowered". For months I'd see these and think "Who the fuck lowers an FXR? It's the best handling bike Harleys ever sold for the street? Jeeesus." Then one day I was serious about maybe buying one, and shipping it became an issue, so I started paying attention to *where* a bike was being sold. In short order I'd see "lowered FXR" and look at the ad and "Oh, the bike is for sale in Miami/Fort Lauderdale/Boca/Pompano/etc. Nowhere to turn except into the parking lot." and being lowered was explained.  Where'd ya ride from? How long will you be staying? Are you looking for good motorcycle roads in the Bay Area or points north?Prolly just a moron.Don't worry. The first comment was ME asking if this was an ad or if OP was asking our opinion. Of course it's an ad, and there's very little chance OP is going to come back, so I'll give it a couple more days to see if OP bothers to return the courtesy of the answers  he's gotten, and then remove it. Yup. I'm willing to bet $3000 cash would get the seller salivating. Looks like an aftermarket seat with some strange bolty thingy mountie stuff strappy thing holding it on. 

I'm literate, can you tell?
Well, was it the battery? Did you have a heart attack when they told you what a new one would cost?You lost the liberal media guy when you used the word "cognitive". I really think the issue is going to boil down to dose. We did a LOT of dope back in those days, but most people I know did it at work to be productive, at home to be productive, and out and about to make the party be partyductive. Parties and the bar were basically just parties and the bar. People would pass a mirror around a party and you wouldn't know people were using other than the spotlight pupils on everyone... and that once chick in the corner who couldn't stop talking long enough to breathe. But that was about it. I was in Sibiu and Bucharest in July. LOVED it. I think the most expensive taxi ride I took was 1 Lei 50 to get across town in Sibiu, 4 Lei from my hotel to the airport in Bucharest. 

It was absolutely beautiful. Sibiu was built in the 1450s if I remember correctly, the architecture was pretty amazing to look at. I'm not sure i'd want to ever have to repair a roof, but hey, I don't live there.

My friend Ovidiu lives in a village outside of Sibiu. I was struck by how segregated even the villages are, with German, Romanian and Gypsy "neighborhoods", even though each one might be three blocks long. 

Definitely going back next July/August. My friend has an old WWII Molotov war bike with a sidecar I can ride while he rides his Softail. 

Traffic in Bucharest was a fucking nightmare anytime between 15 hours and 19 hours. 

What city are you in? I was in Sibiu Romania this summer. LOVED it. Bucharest traffic was a nightmare, and avoid it if you can. Everything is cheap, relative to the rest of Europe, but it's still an "emerging economy", with all the issues and growing pains you'll find there. 

Search for "Sibiu" in google images. The city is in the Carpathian mountains and was built in the 1450s. Romania has three main populations- Romanian, German/Saxon, and Gypsy. The Gypsies generally don't work (because no one will hire them and they get social welfare now that they're EU citizens), but they send their kids into town to beg. You apparently have to tell them "no" three times before they go away. By day three I would look at whatever kid had his hand out and say "no no no" and they'd turn around and walk away. No, I don't feel bad, because they aren't starving. 

If you are going to Romania next summer, let me know. I'll be there in Sibiu in late July probably. Your username is fucking priceless. He'd be thrilled with a late model Sportster, although if you pick up a Dyna, it won't be but about $2000 more for a decent used one. Late model Sportsters are everywhere for not much money. You can get a perfect 2004-2007 1200 for $3000-3500 and an 883 from the same era for $2750-$3000 if you're smar about it and don't believe the prices on craigslist. Don't be scared of the displacement. The engine design is totally different and size doesn't translate to power the way it does in overhead cam inline four cylinder motors like the inports. 

Read the "Buying a used Harley?" link in the sidebar or the wiki tab. You'll save a lot of.money.

If you haven't taken a rider safety class, get signed up mow. It'll save your life. People who haven't taken the class a something like four times more likely to get in a wreck in the first six months of riding.

Click on the link for "New riders and not so new riders" in the sidebar or, again, in the wiki tab, and spend all 94 minutes watching that film. It's the fundamentals of braking and turning that you never learned and knowing and practicing what's in that film will mot only save your life, but it will increase your riding enjoyment exponentially. I've been riding 33 years and I watch it once every year or so. It's really cheezy, but the info is rock solid. Watch it when you can do so without distractions. You never know which tidbit is going to be the magic difference between an amazing afternoon and a trip to the hospital.

When you go to buy a bike, run the ad past us and we'll pick it apart and tell you the questions to ask and point out things that it'll need or not need. And we'll tell you what a reasonable price might be.

If you can, take 280 south from SF to 85 south all the way back to 101, instead of 1 or 80/580 to I-5. Much nicer ride 75 miles south from SF than dealing with the bayside traffic on 101 or heading straight across to 5 or through Half Moon Bay. 

If you're taking 5 back south, do the 280/85/101 south then cut across 152 east in Morgan Hill to I-5 south.

If you're taking the coast, rather than taking Highway 1 all the way from SF, take 280/85/101 south then cut across 156 west to Watsonville and 1 south on the coast from there, thereby avoiding weekend traffic jams in Half Moon Bay and Santa Cruz. Hwy 1 is a parking lot most Sundays on that stretch, grom Devil's Slide to Santa Cruz. 101south to 156 west to 1 will still give you 400 miles of gorgeous coast highway, but won't start the day with parking lot traffic and besides, it's some gorgeous riding too..

Ride safe.Nah, it's not making you soft. It's letting you enjoy that much higher percentage of your riding time in comfort. You're a damned good rider after 40 years on that Ironhead, so enjoy it. You've earned it. :-) Congratulations! That 100th Anniversary model is a really pretty bike. I like lots of chrome because it makes you more visible to the idiots who are already not paying attention.

It looks really fucking clean, except for some dirt on that wonky missor. It looks like somebody has swapped on a set of drag bars so I'm guessing you can't see over your shoulders behind you. If you remove the nuts holding the mirrors in place and switch them to the opposite side and mount them with the mirror underneath the handlebars, you can see under your arms and see most cars behind you clearly. 

Don't forget to use blue loctite on the nuts when you put them back together. Use that stuff on every single nut and bolt you ever have a reason to remove and reinstall on your bike.

So you were patient and took your time and got the bike for a great price.. Glad we could help! We do try. :-)

How many miles are on it?I have Metzelers on both my Road King and my FXR. Great tires. I was going through Dunlops way too fast. Love the raised white letters. Very 1970s muscle car-ish.Is this a tem now for blacked out bikes or did I really miss the joke? If it's a new term, I like to keep up on this. Where ideas come from is something I'm deeply interested in.Yup, but my body is so fucked up that it's not gonna happen. I've ridden a couple sport bikes. A former friend owns a TL1000, which I really liked, and my nephew has a GXSR750, which didn't do anything for me except go fast. But it's not just about going fast. There's something else entirely that most people who've never owned a Harley miss about ANY askpect of why we ride these things when there's sooooo many bikes that are faster, handle better, and are even better suited for touring (Victory, Honda). 

My physical limitations leave me sitting upright. But  I love to ride *Harleys* and I love to ride *Harleys* hard and I'd love other uprights if they *felt* and sounded anything like a Harley. But without the common crankpin, air cooled, inefficient pushrod motors, they never will. 

By the way, an FXR handles as well as any Japanese upright did in the 80s. It's not a crotch rocket, but it will give a run to any of the uprights that were its market competitors in '82 when they were introduced. I'd only ridden one twice before I went looking for the one I eventually bought, and I was impressed, but I didn't truly realize how much it's a better design than anything Harley's ever sold. It is. Hands down. Once it's set up for the rider (bars, seat, pegs/boards/rear-sets) it's a fucking dream come True.

I have been riding Harleys since December 1982. I have loved most of every mile on those bikes, and I've owned close to a dozen (I think it's 9 now, if you include complete bikes that were in pieces with a title, 8 if you don't count that one, an XLCR which was Harley's cafe racer attempt in 1977). 

But it't that Harley Davidson feel, that *no other bike has* that I love, and within that context I ride the shit outta my bikes. I've ridden a few crotch rockets, and even considered buying a K12 BMW when I went back to riding after breaking my back. I didn't think my back could handle a Harley, but the Road King had air shocks and was fine on the back. But it was sterile. I felt like I was driving a 2 wheeled car.  

I'd love to hang off a bike, but I'm half crippled and live in physical pain 24/7, yet my love of riding has been present the whole time. If I could, I'd buy an EBR/Rotax bike and slam that bitch through the hills, even move back to Humbold to find 100 miles stretches of roads that don't have much traffic on them (Hwy299 from Arcata California to Redding California, and Hwy36 coming back from Redding- there's a famous "twisties next 141 miles" sign on google images. That's Hwy 3. That's probably the prettiest 300 miles of riding you can do while having a blast on a sport bike). 

As I get older, I love riding differently than I did when I was riding rigid frame Panheads and swingarm Shovels. Those bikes didn't handle well and I didn't try to make them, but I handled them to their limit, and could outride most other guys riding similar bikes. I doubt there are too many people who can push a Road King as hard as I do, but I know there are. 

But except for the TL1000, the sport bikes I've ridden are acceleration only to me- linear and lateral, but acceleration, and while that's neat stuff, and lots of people get off on it, it doesn't do much for me without the stuff that the Harley motor sends into the rider. I really liked the new EBR bikes, and dreamed about buying one someday (can you tell I like the Rotax engine?) before EBR folded, even though I could probably not sit on the damned thing for more than 15 minutes at a time.

So, unless they can cure arthritic spines and hips, I'm an upright seating position guy, but within that context I still occasionally have the Road King drifting through corners if I know them as well as you can know a corner, and I drag footboards while compression braking into and accelerating out of the rest. 

But yeah, I'd have a blast on a sport bike but the closest I'm gonna get is the FXR. This winter, paint. Next summer, proper front suspension (maybe off a GSXR or one like it).That's wonderful. Good to hear. Thank you for sharing that. Priceless. :)Just make sure it's got bars on it that will clear the sideview mirrors of cars. Sounds like the battery is dead or the battery terminals are loose. Did you leave the ignition switch on last night? If not, it may just have a battery that's seen the end of its life.

Go to the "Trouble Codes" link on the sidebar and follow the directions and see if the bike has thrown any codes. If it has, that's one place to start, but I suspect it's just got a 4 year old battery and the seller kept a trickle charger before selling it, rather than buying a new battery. 

Did you get it from a dealer? If so, call them and say "I bought this bike yesterday and today the battery is dead. Come pick it up and fix that shit. What kind of business are you running, anyway?"No, the run/off switch on the bars doesn't do anything unless there's juice coming through the ignition switch. Your bike has a switch on the dashboard that you can turn on, and that doesn't need a key for the bike to run. You need the key *fob* for the bike to *start*, but if you leave the switch in either accessory or on positions, it'll drain the battery overnight. I was getting about 6K from a rear on the Road King, and 10-12K on the front. Prolly should have been replaced at 8 or 9K, but I wear the outsides of the tire before the center of the tread, what with all the mountain riding I was doing- front tire was shaped like a V rather than a U by the time I replaced the front.

That was pretty consistent over 55K miles. Put the Metzelers on the RK early this year and have about 4K on the bike without the rear tire looking at all like it's going to need replacing any time soon. 

The FXR had brand new Metzelers on it when i picked it up in early August. I've put over 4K on it since and the tires still look brand new. I'll probably post something about how far I get on a rear tire on the RK in comparison, but I suspect it'll be a long while before I need to do a front on that bike. Yeah, 9,000 miles means it's only ever had 2 oil changes in its life! Brand new bike. Do the *complete* 10,000 mile service as soon as possible. Don't wait. It said for a long time, getting less than 800 miles/year on it. I'd do the fluid service immediately, and if you're going to do it yourself, follow the service schedule for 10,000 miles *to the letter*. There's no warranty, but some things get damaged with age, rather than mileage, and the inspection list will offer you an opportunity to look things over in a way you haven't yet. 

Ride safe! Welcome to the tribe. Looks like the XR750TT fender. Who makes it? That would be an awesome project if you can build a hot rod and get the suspension upgraded adequately to walk the walk that fairing would suggest. 

We'd love to see it when you're done. Sorry to hear about your Brother. Any of us who have been on the road a while have lost Brothers. It sucks, but it's righteous that you were able to ride his bike to his last rest. No doubt the bell did its job letting you know. 

My Brother Little Rich, who "raised me" in the bike world, was murdered by some douchebag he'd let sleep on his couch in the early 90s. About six months afterward, I was riding on Road 200 near Bass Lake, CA, with the ol' lady on the back. Just me and the ol' lady on a lazy ride through the hills, and me on the left side of the lane where I'd always ride when riding tandem with people. Well, every fucking time I'd start to lean into a curve, I'd glance slightly to my right to check and make sure my lane partner wasn't too close, and I'd swear I saw rich with his front wheel about where my rear wheel was, riding his Pan tandem in the lane out of the corner of my eye for just a split second. When I got home and told the ol lady about it, she pointed out that it was Rich's birthday. Trippy shit. 

&gt;  I'm just not too sure about the tradition being started as a prank or whatever. 

I'm not either. Didn't say it was as prank. I asked "Was it originally a joke?" because this is on hypothesis that's been offered to me in the past, but there's no evidence one way or the other and there's no way we'll ever know. 

But I've known bikers who would do shit like that, me and some of my Brothers for instance. There was a dude around back in the late 80s who had a really nice rigid Pan with a dual-disc wide glide front end on it, but he really liked the whole chopper look. Couldn't ride for shit, and didn't know shit about his bike. Bought it for cash and paid us to keep it running. He couldn't tell you whether it had an S&amp;S Super or the original Linkert on there, but he bought a Levi jacket and cut off the sleeves, and had brand new steel-toe boots. Called everyone "Bro" and "Brother" and talked about his "scooter". You know the type. Well we gave him a "no posers" sticker to put on his oil tank and it's probably still there today.

Keeping the rider awake is another thing I've been told. Included it as a question, too. I'd believe this if we weren't all running really loud exhausts and not wearing ear plugs for wind noise. If the bell was loud enough, it'd sound like something was rattling loose and keep you focused, I'm sure, but again "who knows?"

AS for the "doesn't work unless given to you by someone who loves you", I'm gonna hang that in the rest of the "who knows?" list. I'm sure that started with an MC somewhere, and spread. It's not like bikers haven't been known to make little shit up even when talking to their club Brothers. 

But yeah, I agree- I don't think it was a prank, but that's something someone suggested to me, and it's got as much evidence of being True as anything else. 

Ride safe. Yeah, slamming an 800lb touring bike through the hills with 275lb me and a 115lb gal on the back will beat the shit out of a tire. I'd change the rear before it got bald because 1200lbs on a bald tire is a great way to die if you hit a piece of muffler or other flotsam, especially in a turn. The front I'd change when it started tracking too much in rain grooves, because it meant the outside of the tread was worn away enough the the middle of the tread actually had angles in it where it transitioned to the outside of the tread. Makes for a noticeable feeling through the bars when the bike would lean into a turn.Huh. That would have to be a pretty fucking big bell for someone to hear it, say, inside noisy bar, or loud enough to wake you up inside the house, or wherever. Like I said, I'm sure there's many stories, some more likely than others.

Well as far as 1%ers never having bells, the only people I *knew* in the 80s were 1%ers, some more outlaw than others, but some of them had bells on their bikes, and this was before Harley's whole "boutique" business model in the late 80s. Harley dealers didn't sell them back then.So, you think the only 1%ers are in clubs?1%er means "outlaw", it doesn't mean "I'm in an MC". Never has. Some MCs are 1%er clubs, but the vast majority of 1%ers in the old days were unaffiliated bikers. I've never worn a patch and I lived a 1%er life for much of my adult life. I think "promote" would be more accurate than "could sell". :)

&gt;And yes, "murdered out" is what we call blacked out bikes. 

Good to know. I always thought of them as "invisible to cagers", but I guess "murdered out" works. Any idea where the term originated? Oops, one year off. My mistake. I did not know that. Thanks. If you were to post a thing about "check out my shop, this is what we build, and we als sell bikes for far lower prices than you a are used to seeing and by the way, here's photos of our bikes and here's one of the showroom with the bikes we have for sale. Call us or visit!" No one would be upset.:)Do you mean.... Kevlar?

And if so, are you talking about ballistic clothing? "Bullet resistant clothing" as it were, or "tougher than denim"?I'm curious about why they're so insistent that you only wash your jeans once every six months? WTF?!?Prolly. :-)I guess I just can't imagine denim or pants of any kind not being filthy after a week or two.Does the bike have complete service records? Look on our wiki tab and the first section is about what to look for on a bike with no service records. You can also click on the same link in the sidebar.A great tattoo huh? As in write Wall of Text" in a tattoo or something else? Then I'm guessing it came from a dealer. If so, I suspect they did the regular service on it, or have access to the records through their computer dealer network. 

Just make sure if the tires look new. If they look like they'll need replacing sooner rather than later, get them to put new tires on it. 

The V-Rod is basically a drag bike with a headlight and turn signals, as far as Harley's thinking was concerned. The motor is a horsepower monster. If your riding position is uncomfortable on your upper back, you might look into taller bars. Depending on which exhaust is on it, you may have problems with right turns dragging the pipe. If you do, there are different exhaust systems out there designed to get around this. 

Other than that, there's absolutely nothing wrong with a V-Rod. They're great bikes and probably the most popular Harley model in Europe, where people are used to bikes going fast, and most countries don't let you modify your bike to make it perform better, and pushrod motors like the Big Twin just don't meet the demands of those riders. The V-Rod does. HAH! She can read the DOT sticker on the back of my lid if she needs something to read. :)Huh. Crazy. I guess I'm just too much of a slob. I guess it depends on what you want from a jacket. Why do you want nylon? There's ZERO armor value in this jacket. If you want a textile jacket, look at Hein Gericke and others. They may dedicated textile jackets with armor values similar or better than leather. I used to like 'em dumb, but nowadays I want to talk to a girl after she's done wiping stuff off her face. She'll be able to read those three little letters in less than a minute, if I'm not mistaken. :)Well, if you want the jacket for when you're NOT riding, there's nothing wrong with it, I'm sure. Do the kickstart because you WANT to do the kickstart, not because of the rewards. 

But if you're looking for something more than a hoodie, and less than a leather jacket, try adding a leather road vest that's one or two sizes too big over the top of your hoodie. It'll provide you a degree of abrasion-resistant armor, and it cuts all the wind and much of the chill that a hoodie won't on the freeway. 

I'm not an ATGATT guy by any means, but for *comfort* and because there's so damned many assholes on the road, I wear *something* leather on my upper body when I ride... unless it's over 100F, then I switch to a large Levis cutoff vest, as it provides a tiny bit of abrasion resistance, and the cotton layer provides insulation against the sun. HAH! So *that's* there those fucking holes come from. Cool. Do NOT get into a $50-75 eBay vest. If you want to save some money, look at GOOD brand names *used* on eBay in your size. I've found Gericke leather jackets for under $100. If you don't worry about the price, look into things like 415 Clothing, Fox Creek Leather, and Just Leather in San Jose, CA for a heavy duty road vest. I like the Levis jacket cutoff pattern best. These brands are the best heavy road vests I and friends have ever owned. Also, River Road, First Leather, and others, sell nice, heavy vests, often with vents or perforations. You know, that would mesh perfectly with the story the old gray beard told me. If it was an old flyer who gave the bell to someone, it is very likely that this was because that is what they used when flying to keep their attention. 

That is the kind of corroboration that while not proof, is very useful in supporting anecdotal evidence.

Thank you for posting this. It lands that much more validity to the story I was told.Exactly.Another commenter posted something about his grandfather flying in Korea who used a bell to focus on long flights. Take a look. Sounds credible and fits perfectly with the greybeard's story and your thought about keeping a brother "focused", since that's exactly the word his grandfather used when describing the purpose of the bell. Crazy. Would still like to hear why you think 1%ers are only in MCs. 

By the way, I grew up in Philly in the 60s and early 70s and scrapple was one of my favorite breakfast foods.Prolly turkey road pizza by now, with tasty Chex Mix crumbles sprinkled liberally around for character. 

By the way, you should know that hoodie pockets don't work for shit on a bike. Don't use them to storke anything you want to keep. :)

&gt;You need to seriously start putting time aside (like 30 minutes) every day and just keep writing until you hit 60,000 words. Then slap a title on it. Then start sending out query letters.

I can't really see how it would be interesting to anyone much outside of those people who were there, and they were there and don't need to read the stories. Besides, I really can't name names for most of the stories, and there's little chance an editor wants to see "well, there was this one guy who I won't name" every third paragraph, and I'd still be breaking the cardinal rule of 1%ere life with most stories- "don't talk about shit". 

Also, there's absolutely zero photographs from my life at that time, since cameras meant "evidence" so almost no one, and I mean *no one* I knew bothered with cameras unless you were actually *in* a club and documenting parties and bike runs. Outsiders taking photos when club members were present would have a prospect in their face in less time than it takes to say "are you a fucking cop?!?!" 

But, I wonder if a blog about *useful* anecdotes and "riding and wrenching" tips isn't in order, what with so many people doing their own service and the whole vintage chopper/hipster thing. Now to figure out how to monetize a blog and get people to read it. Aging Rebel manages it for biker news, but he's got so many people he knows that he can get the straight dope from that it's a good source of inside info. Most of the guys I knew back then were 20 years older than me, and of the ones who are still alive I haven't spoken with any of them in almost 20 years.

Any ideas?If it's the grip binding on the bars, remove the throttle grip and apply a liberal amount of white lithium grease to the inside of the grip. Don't put it on the bar, because you'll end up greasing where the clamp needs to hold it to the bar. Just inside the grip where it slips over the bar. Since this is all you did differently, I suspect what grease is inside there is something that gums up in cold weather. Honestly... there's nothing really to let go, but you made comments suggesting no 1%er would have a bell on his bike and that 1%ers are only in MCs, which are both way off base. Not seeing them anywhere else only means you haven't seen them anywhere else. 

I wouldn't give a shit except that there's already so fucking much misinformation about 1%ers out there and it comes up occasionally in this sub, especially since there's idiots out there who think the Sons of Anarchy patch they bought on eBay will make little old ladies think they're dangerous. 

Besides, we're not the only two people reading these things, and your helpful input might allow someone else to recognize their misunderstanding of the topic. Hell, in recent years I've met people who *wear* a 1%er patch on their vest who have *no* clue what it means, and there are places where that can cause them real problems. Heh..... heh.... he said "sweaty balls".... heh.

I guess it's possible, but then again, I can't wear a white t-shirt without it being stained before breakfast. Maybe some people really can go six months without sweating, getting disrty, or being near someone's wet dog. This was posted here about three weeks ago.
:( Me too. I don't think I can ever have another. Missed a week's work when I put my last Rottie down. Well, it's $20 *now*, but who knows. I've found really nice leathers for dirt cheap for my lady friends. Nice brands with little or no wear, like Gericke and Vanson for under $100. One Gericke jacket I got for my last wife was $30 and was brand new. 

I agree. The "loved one" bit also makes credible sense for that bike of lore. Now let's see if we don't touch enough minds here that we can actually look back in 5 years and see that the "correct" origin story hasn't spread around considerably. Oh, I know there's a ton of "my life as a biker" books out there, but they're generally either cops who were undercover, 1%er patch holders who were in an MC for 30+ years, or unflattering expos\u00e9s by people with a hardon for MCs. 

Honestly, the problem becomes me running out of shit to talk about without being redundant. I have zero ability to fact check, and again, no photo references, and Americans, at least, can't read a book without pop-up pictures it seems. 

When I was asking "any ideas?" it was more about monetizing a blog and maybe what blog host (not blogspot, hopefully), and how to get people to read it. Any ideas? :):( At least you're responsible enough to not have your dog suffer when you don't have time. Good for you. Sorry you miss him. At least he's loved. I had a press credential for Outlaw Biker magazine in the 90s. Still trying to find a copy of the issue that has my last Pan in it titled "Harley's Harley". There's a blurb on the cover too. Don't remember the issue, but it was late 90s. Maybe '97 or '98. I know we talked about this before and you didn't have it. At least I think it was you. 

I wonder if anyone here would have a complete set, but I doubt it. Maybe one or two older guys, but who knows. Turns out I tossed all my old biker mags when I moved. At least they're not in the closet and they're not in the pile of boxes I still haven't unpacked yet, 30 months later. :)Huh. I wonder if the imgur account is somehow monetized, of if OP was drunk and didn't remember.  Doesn't look like it. There's usually a different shape to the stitching where the boobs go.If you're gonna replace the compensator bolt, go to Harley for the bolt. But it doesn't *really* need replacing. It's got built in thread-locker on it, but if you use *red* hi-strength LocTite on the old bolt, it'll work fine. Just make sure you torque it to the 160-170ft/lbs the book calls for (check your manual for exact torque specs).

But why do you need to pull the primary covers? Isn't the new forward setup (from the FXWG) just a bolt-on at the forward mounting points on the frame? I know the older police bikes had the shifter shaft housing on the front of the cover, but the new ones are different. You can buy a nice little [chrome cap that covers the shifter shaft](http://www.hdforums.com/forum/attachments/dyna-glide-models/69177d1253552425-forward-control-pics-on-superglide-need-a-part-003a.jpg) that comes out of the primary cover, and detach the shifter linkage and let the old shifter shaft just hang down behind the cover without any risk of damage. That way, if you sell the bike someday, all the original stuff for mids are there. I know. I have a friend who is fostering an older dane an she works too damned much. He'd been at the shelter for over a year, but she works too many hours I think for a dane (or any dog) living alone. If you weren't gonna be putting 20K on the bike in the next year, I'd say get the used Road Glide, but you'd have to find one with low miles that someone has already done bars and a bit of motor work too. You're gonna put a LOT of miles on that bike. And you'll have two bikes- a Road Glide for longer stuff, and a Dyna for local riding. Nothing like the extra weight and cargo space and other shit on the RG for being in the saddle all.... fucking... day. But again, low miles bike (under 30K) or you'll have 100K on your bike four or five years from now. 

But a newer Fat Bob with bags and a windshield WILL do the job, weighs less, and is easier to get into and out of smaller places and parking with a lot of bikes, too. But why not get a newer (but not new) Fat Bob with bags, a Danny Gray touring seat, and a windshield for those long-ass rides, and keep the SuperGlide for local daily riding. Either way, I'd recommend getting a set of mid pegs or a set of Dyna Defender (police model) footboards to go with the forward controls on the Fat Bob if you're gonna use it as your multi-purpose bike. I'd say get the Defender shifter setup, too, but I think the Defender still uses a boss cast into the front of the inner primary cover for the shifter linkage, rather than bolted up front for like the Fat Bob. But they sit as high as the pegs and are really really comfortable.

Hmmm..... What if you sell the SuperGlide and buy a Fat Bob AND a Road Glide? :)Yeah, replacing the outer primary isn't necessary unless you really really want the whole thing to look like it never had mids (you can get the cap powdercoated, or buy a little powdercoat kit and a toaster oven and do it in the back yard yourself). Leaving the old shifter shaft there will *increase* the number of potential buyers, because everything will be there without even having to take the primary cover off to switch it back to mids (keep *all* the old parts, by the way... every nut and bolt and the old shifter, since you're replacing it). Doing the swap and removing the shifter shaft and plugging the whole eliminates most anyone who wants mids from your potential buyers pool, since the whole primary would need to come off and that's an awful lot more work than unbolting the shifter assembly and linkage rod, putting the old shifter and footpeg on, and reinstalling the short shift linkage rod. It also does the same thing if you decide you hate the forwards and want to go back to mids. 

LocTite- the 262 is the way to go if you *do* take the primary apart. I use it on both the clutch hub nut and the compensator bolt/nut. When I used it on the clutch hub nut when I did the clutch on the FXR and that nut got *really warm* when I decided to pull the primary a month later and replace all the tranny seals. Really snug bind. Didn't damage threads, but it made me work to remove the nut. Good shit.

Oh yeah, and I no longer use 242 blue on my bikes. I use 243 blue, which is better for high temps and oil resistance. Great shit. Picked up a bottle from Amazon Prime for a few bucks and it's fucking awesome. Thicker than 242 and actually works a bit as a thread *sealer*, too. Nah, get the Road Glide and keep the SG, then once you know for certain the Road Glide is gonna handle the shit you're gonna put it through, sell the SG and pick up an FXR. You'll find a nice stock one (1989 and later) up there for 5,000ish tops, then spend another $1000 on seat, bars, and a Thunderheader, and you'll get to be cool like the rest of the kids with FXRs.

Shit, better yet, get an FXRT with bags and fairing instead of the Road Glide. 1990-1994 with under 30K miles shouldn't cost more than about $6k. Thanks for the heads up about the bells. Good to hear corroboration from someone who was there in the 60s. I'm sure there were multiple reasons today why anybody does anything, when enough time has passed and it's become part of a culture, but yeah, wind chimes have been around since people started stringing shells together and bells almost as long. Makes sense on the MC 1% thing and why someone would only think MCs wore 1%er patches or even identify as 1%ers. I've even heard people here mention places where certain clubs have a problem with people wearing cutoffs if they've not at least hanging around. Sounds crazy to me, but I haven't lived everywhere, and there's more weird shit out there than anyone can imagine.

As for Rich, that club name rings a bell, but I can't remember where else I would have heard it except from him or one or two other guys from the same era. He said it was "in the 60s" that the cop busted his vocal cord "busting up a club rumble". But I wouldn't be surprised. He was the "didn't talk to you if he didn't know you, and even then didn't say much" type of guy, and wasn't an easy guy to get along with for most. In fact, he split the Freedom Riders at some point after I started working at the shop.

Pretty sure he had his 44th birthday while I was working at the shop in '83 or '84 (was asked to draw a .44 caliber S&amp;W on a "happy birthday" banner), so he would have been in his mid 20s in 1966. He was about 5'8", 140.lbs. 

Sadly, he was murdered in the early 90s by some asshole he let sleep on his couch. I've heard two stories, one was that he came home and the guy had drank the 12 pack he'd had in the fridge and Rich blew his stack and the guy shot him because he was afraid he was going to get beat up, and the other was that the same guy had killed his dog and Rich went after him with a bat and the guy shot him then. The guy never got locked up, so I am inclined to believe the second story. 

But either way, he taught me more valuable lessons about life and more about 74s than anyone.  If you have positive memories of him, great, but I wouldn't be surprised if they were negative. He was like that.

I hadn't heard of the 243 either until I went to replace a bottle of 242 that had been knocked over unnotoced. Went on Amazon and there was the 243 staring me in the face. Read the description and ordered it immediately. Love the stuff. I'd recommend cinching down the pinch bolts then tightening the axle nut, *then* loosening the cinch bolts to let any flex in the for tube loose, *then* retighten the cinch bolts once any torsion is removed from the fork legs.

Also, get the *factory* service manual for anything you do to your bike. They're amazing and the same book the factory mechanics use. You can probably find a .pdf here through the sidebar. Don't bother with Clymer or Haynes, neither is as good as the Harley manual. I won't use anything else on my Road King or FXR. Pre-1980s manuals aren't very useful for much, but after the mid-80s, they're worth their weight in gold.  You'll be doing [motorcycle gymkhana(https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IBGwzK6Q1Gg) in no time! Awesome.I figure if that's what professional lumberjacks use to wrap "two man" saw blades, it'll work on crash bars, too. Damned near bulletproof stuff.The east bay ties in Rich neatly because he was from San Leandro/Hayward and his Freedom Riders patch was from the Hayward charter, rather than San Jose, which was closer. And yeah, he had a good ride. I could fill a book with the lessons he taught me about life, Brotherhood, riding, integrity and so on. Named my second Pan after his Pan "Ghost". 

About the cuts- I'm blown away that people would have such a hardon for total strangers that they'd pull a Levis cutoff because, wait, what?!? Sounds kinda overly self-important, but hey, I've seen some MCs where *every* guy had a "40 pound patch". Fortunately, living in CA clubs like that don't last too long. Besides, didn't everyone wear a denim or leather when you were down here, club or not? 

Western Washington, huh? Is this bleed over from Idaho, or just a local thing. I saw all kinds of weird shit at a bike night in the Coeur d'Alene area a couple years ago. When I moved back to the Bay Area in 2013, I was blasting south on 80 north of the Bay Bridge and saw a patch up ahead one lane over. As I got closer, wouldn't ya know it, it was a full 3 piece Sons of Anarchy patch, California rocker, MC, diamond patch and all on a proper road vest and a young guy riding a T-bar Dyna. Was NOT Halloween, nor was it one of the 81 guys in the Bay Area who were actors on the show. Just some poser who bought a bootleg SoA patch set on eBay (the FX channel apparently promised the 81 technical advisors and actors on the show that they wouldn't sell bottom rockers, MC patches or diamond patches with official show gear in return for their help making things as "real" as possible, but bootleg sellers don't give a shit). It was the first time I'd ever seen one since I'd spent the last 8 years mostly riding on the north coast and 199 and 299 between 101 and I-5. Since then we've had folks post pics here of clubs in Europe and Great Britain named Sons of Anarchy and just take the patch set completely from the internet. Crazy shit. This is how I know I'm getting old and the world will never be the same- I look around and think "these fucking kids don't know shit!" The grey hair coming in sorta helps, too.  

But yeah, in the last half dozen years we started seeing all kinds of rich kids in their brand new Frisco Leathers (from the old Frisco Choppers, now California Choppers) road vests over a blue hoodie, T-bar/quarter-fairing Dynas, wearing skid lids and white tennis shoes, just like the blonde kid on the show. No gloves, no chaps, just looking like they came right off the show or like their girlfriends bought them a full outfit at Frisco Choppers. I can't really imagine anyone here getting upset, since there's really no outlaw scene outside of the MCs (helmet law and 3-strikes law in the 90s kinda killed that completely). But *everyone* wore Levis and leather cutoffs back when I was heavy in the scene, and most without any kind of patch at all, unless it was a diamond patch or a 13 for the pot smokers.

I'm on my second road vest in 33 years and if someone tried to pull it here in California, I would be so fucking flabbergasted I'd probably laugh my ass off.

Well, thanks for trying. One day, I'll move again, pack the house, and find the box exactly where I thought it was but couldn't find it. Willing to bet the 9ers now trade for a tackle, guard, and/or center, then when Gabbert does so much better, they cut Kap. It sucks all the way around, because when Kap had a healthy, talented offensive line, his strengths and weaknesses weren't nearly as important. But if they fix the O-line *after* benching Kap, then keep Gabbert in when things get better, well...

Of course, the FO would have to be actively trying to fix the O-line for this to happen. FUCK THESE PEOPLE. What part of the world are these fucking assholes in? Jeezus, even here in the fucking overpriced San Francisco Bay Area, I don't hear shit like that. What... the... fuck?!? 

By the way, if you want to put an exhaust on there that *will* improve performance, and will still piss off these assholes, look into a 2 into 1 Vance &amp; Hines ProPipe... *without* the "quiet baffle". It's the loudest muffler pipe I've ever put on a motorcycle, and my Road King sets off car alarms when I'm putting past with next to zero throttle. The Thunderheader is as loud when the throttle is wide open and through the whole rpm range, but it's a lot quieter at idle and with light throttle. But... but.... your drone might have a camera and see their 50 year old, morbidly obese bodies in... less than flattering positions. "This is Shropshire" and we get the opening notes of Dueling Banjos from the film Deliverance. When he's welding all that shyte into the floor, we get what I think was the theme song for The A Team. Fucking priceless. I rarely laugh out loud at videos like this, but these guys really have their act together. Springer Softail. Locking bags aren't really an option unless OP wants to buy the stupid cable locks, but even then, all it takes is a good razor knife and they're open, right through the ABS skeleton. 

If you gotta park a bike outside, NEVER leave anything in the bags. You couldn't pay me to live in an apartment and park my bike outside, even if it had the quietest pipes going. Dew collecting at night with pit the chrome in two weeks, and if it's not parked under a carport, well....

The first thing Tuesday morning I'd insure the bike for full coverage, comp and collision and uninsured/underinsured motorist. Insure the bike for "market value", since for "replacement value" they look at the blue book, which is gonna be low. Market value means they look at online ads for similar bikes, and we all know people think the seat of their bike is stuffed with $100 bills. This only costs a few bucks/month more, and is worth every dime. If you've got an honest receipt for what you paid for the bike, that's a good start. But assholes have a habit of taking their unresolved penis-size issues out on other peoples' stuff. You don't want some rash cunt backing over your bike and driving off before your pager even goes off. Then there's the assholes who would steal another man's bike. They don't deserve to breathe the same air we do, but they exist and are a reality of life when you own a motorcycle.

Now that it's noon on Tuesday, get a nice fabric bike cover with a cable lock and asbestos fabric on the pipes area. Import bike shops are more likely to have nice covers for reasonable prices, and with all the metric clone cruisers out there, they'd definitely have one to fit your bike for under $100. It'll keep condensation off the bike and you won't come out one morning three weeks from now and wonder why all your chrome has the measles. Yes, I know you aren't one of those idiots who think vaccines cause the bubonic plague, but Harley chrome pits faster than a murder weapon tossed in a river. The cover won't stop someone with a knife, but assholes are generally lazy.

Now that you're insured and back from the bike shop with a nice cover and it's 2:30 Tuesday afternoon, go to www.padmapper.com, type in your zip code, then fill out the filters, checking the boxes for "homes", as well as "in-law units" and add the keyword "garage" and start looking for a house. Padmapper has EVERY rental unit that's listed anywhere online, craigslist, real estate offices who operate rentals as well as sell, rentals.com, homes.com, and whatthefuckever.com, and they work on a google map template and will show a pin for every listing that fits your criteria. This has little or nothing to do with listening to the assholes or them fucking with your bike, but instead doing what you can to avoid the nightmare of having your bike stolen. Even now that you've got full coverage on it, the crushing realization that your baby isn't where you parked it is something no proper sadist should have to experience.

I would not live in an apartment with underground parking, since I couldn't see the bike from my window and, well, people suck. Living in an apartment with your bike outside is just begging for heartache.

Good luck.
So, how does it feel when you grab that throttle at 3500rpm in 3rd gear getting on the freeway and you shift into fourth and look down and you're doing 90+ mph with two gears to go? Yeah, those dudes who talk endless shit about Harleys have NEVER ridden one. Congratulations. Welcome to the tribe.Pretty sure thats a proprietary plug for electric riding gear. If you trace it back into the bike is it a stand alone harness to the fuse box or battery, or is it part of a larger HD wire loom? There are a lot of 12 volt DC plugs that different companies use and this is one of them.

Once your new battery is in the bike, put a meter across this pins. Should read the same as your battery voltage.Get a 6 speed, EFI bike that's had cams and had work. My Road King hits 5th gear at 105 when it's wide openat redline and 6th at 115, but you know that. :-) For others reading this, read on...

Taller final drive ratio on the 6 speed bikes (wheel and tranny pulleys, not 6th  gear) than on 5 speed bikes, which is taller than 4 speed bikes. My FXR was turning 4150 rpm in 5th at 85 until I put a 65 tooth wheel pulley on there. Now 3600 @ 85mph eith 2000 rpm to go. My Pans and Shovels were turning over 4000 rpm at 70 with stock gearing. 

The stock transmission sprocket on a Pan or Shovel is either of 22 or 23 tooth, with the stock rear wheel sprocket on a drum brake wheel havin 51 teeth. Most people switched to a 24 or 25 tooth transmission sprocket to get more legs on the freeway, or put a bigger motor sprocket in their primary as it slows down engine speed for the same mainshaft speed in the tranny. With a 25 on the tranny however, you'd probably need to clearance the bearing support or inner primary because it's just too big.

One tooth bigger at the transmission is like two teeth smaller on the rear wheel. With a 24 tooth tranny sprocket and a  50 tooth rear wheel sprocket you'll be doing 100 instead of 70 (not that I was ever comfortable doing 100 on a Shovelhead or Panhead. 85-90 was more than fast enough considering the drum brakes on three of the four). :-)

By the way, *hey stranger*. How was your summer? Build anything interesting this summer? Did we ever see finished pics of that rigid monster with the 20" wide rear tire (yeah, I know, but it was BIG)?Read the "Buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar or go to the wiki tab at the top of the page. You'll see exactly how easy it is...I'm wondering /u/Generic_Cleric is either a minister, a woman, or both. The deadpan responses are looking too much like 'straight lines' and a setup for "I have tits" and dropping the mic. If it's indicative of being a member of the clergy, maybe there's other glaring road blocks you're putting up yourself.

But hey, if that's just a Dungeons and Dragons nickname, that could be the issue too. Are you spending too much of your free time playing Magic cards with your nerdy friends who haven't showered in three weeks? I work in a tattoo shop and get more action than I know what to do with from Silicon Valley professional women... and I'm a fat, crippled 53 year old heavily tattooed felon who uses four-letter punctuation in every sentence. So maybe it's the places you hang out or the things your project. Hoping gals are gonna flash you their tits at the PTA meeting and church rummage sale is probably not a high percentage bet. Moms at the "Your Daughter Thinks She's a Disney Princess And Won't Listen To You Unless You Call Her 'Your Highness'" intervention seminar aren't going to be putting themselves out in quite the same way. 

My advice? Start hanging out where young, attractive women hang out with an expectation of finding some kind of thrill- bars, tattoo shops, methadone clinics and that fraternity house famous for their Roofie KoolAid Cock-tales, and always have a 6 pack of Magnum condoms hanging out of your jacket pocket and leave a copy of 50 Shades of ~~Date Rape~~ Grey hanging out of your hip pocket. You'll get some attention.

But hey, you're *still* not gonna get any attention if they think "He's cute.. oh, wait, he's wearing a 'Han Shot First' t-shit." OK, since I offered *three* different possibilities, could you narrow it down just a wee bit? I have no desire for you to out yourself (unless you're a Catholic priest, then just publicly admit that you're gay and get fired so you can go be yourself for once in your life and find real happiness without living a lie), but now I'm really curious...

At least you use four-letter punctuation, so you're obviously a female Unitarian minister wearing a t-shirt that says 

"Obi-wan is my shepherd, I shall not want, 

He maketh me to fall down in green swamps, 

He leadeth me beside the still waters of Dagobah, 

He restoreth my Force, and leadeth me to the path of a little green midget who sounds like Kermit the Frog, 

Yea, tho I walk through the valley of the shadow of Tatooine, I shall fear no Dark Side, for Han art by my side".

*****
Ride safe. Praise be to Yoda. He is the One Jedi Master and Obi-wan is his prophet. There is no Yoda but Yoda. Yup. Having a thief steal your trash is always a good feeling. And giving a thief something *easy* to steal, so he'd feel a sense of accomplishment and completing his task *before* putting a hammer through your driver's window, is smart thinking. :)

When I lived in the Sierras and worked full-time in Fresno, it would be 105+F in the summer, 3 days out of 5 some years. I'd just leave the windows down, since my deductible was as much as the cost of replacing the window. Never leave anything of value inside, and don't spend money on any kind of decent stereo (which was funny because I was managing a high-end car audio installation as my day job- needed health insurance for the kids). Good to hear. Nothing like taking a stand. Most of those obnoxious assholes could prolly use a wake-up call. By the way, the cheapest price you'll find is [American Classic Motors on eBay](http://stores.ebay.com/AMERICAN-CLASSIC-MOTORS?_dmd=2&amp;_nkw=pro+pipe). I saved something like $250 on mine and it wasn't a second or a blem. Free 3 day shipping, too. 

But yeah, the ProPipe is fucking LOUD. The option of the "quiet baffle" is just that, an option, so make sure you gon't get that one by accident. Just get the regular ProPipe and you'll *still* wake those assholes up when you start your bike, and you'll set off their car alarms, but you'll be tempted to yell "You stupid cunt, I just spent $650 on a fucking muffler pipe, and you're still fucking complaining. Fuck off!"We've been through this before, and it's obvious you still haven't ever ridden a bike with loud exhaust to compare to how other people behave when you're riding a bike with quiet exhaust. We don't ride in a fucking desert, there are reflective surfaces EVERYWHERE and the sound coming out the back of the bike *precedes* the bike where it's going. It's also how you ride- if you never split lanes, and don't fucking ride faster than the little old lady who can't see over her fucking steering wheel, who cares, but for people who are riding a bit aggressively, and *especially* when splitting lanes, the *sound* of the bike is the *only* thing that gets people to look up from their cel phones when they're sitting in traffic and move the fuck over. 

When riding rurally, in 30 years I've only seen ONE FUCKING DEER when I have loud pipes on a bike. EVERY time I've had quiet pipes to get a ticket signed off, I'm dodging Bambi and his fucking friends every time I come around a corner. They can hear the bike coming a mile away and get the fuck out of the road.

And fuck what people think. They already have stupid fucking opinions and think assholes like Ben Carson are charismatic visionaries. FUCK THEIR AVERSION.

And last but not least, you *still* think we're talking about "straight pipes" when we talk about loud bikes. Properly built and tuned muffler pipes are still loud as hell and the bike DOES run better. 

So until you've actually ridden a bike with loud pipes in heavy traffic and actually compared how people act when changing lanes, pulling out of driveways, and making room when you're splitting lanes, you're just like the assholes who go on about apehangers being uncomfortable while never once having sat on a bike with them on there... or you'd know you were full of shit.No junkies at the methadone clinic? Damn, but "damaged goods" is so fucking hott sometimes, especially when they're from the right side of the tracks and will do *anything* that would give their mothers a heart attack. At least you said "no junkies... because I'm married". That gives me hope. &gt;;-]

I'm not really a big star wars fan either, but you gotta admit, The Yoda's Prayer (which I may have seen some version of 20 years ago, but wrote spontaneously half an hour ago), would work for a t-shirt. Took me a couple looks at google to figure out what planet the swamp was on, and how to spell Obi-wan, but hey, the story is pretty old-testament, so it wasn't hard to put together.

If I'm ever in need of a Mormon priest, I'll let you know. Until then, ride safe. Call your local BMW dealer. They have NICE covers. Whatever you do, get one with *asbestos fabric* where your exhaust goes on the right side of the bike. Most covers are plastic/nylon and will melt to your pipes if you put them on right after getting off the bike while the exhaust is hot. You're [D J Qualls](http://ia.media-imdb.com/images/M/MV5BMTgzNTE4NDA4OV5BMl5BanBnXkFtZTYwNTQyNjIz._V1_SX640_SY720_.jpg)? Damn, I loved you in Scrubs and The Man in the High Castle! Will you be back for Season 2?So what? When a motor only turns 5500rpm and doesn't ever *need* to lean over at 140mph *by design*, it doesn't matter what a sport bike will do in 1st gear. A Nissan GT-R can dust a new Camaro in the hills. But who the fuck cares? Not *buying* a Camaro if I want a car for the race track, and I'm not buying or building a Harley if I want to go down to Laguna Seca and drag my knee around the track all afternoon.  

Apples and Oranges. Why the fuck can't people get that when talking about what Harleys, they're not comparing it to an engineered Moto GP bike with a license plate and *it's not fucking relevant to bring it up... ever*?!?! But if you owned a Harley with a hot rod motor, you'd know that what I'm talking about, and it's not top speed or pure acceleration. I figured 20K minimum. This is why so many guys own Road Glides,.

Get the Road Glide (low miles) and once you're certain it's ready for the road, off the SG and pick up the FXRT. But go through it *completely*, even if it's in proper running order. Hell, put a TC96 motor and 6 speed out of a late 2000s Dyna in it! Only takes a bit of frame modification, and I'm absolutely certain your Brothers will have a guy who does this. If you can't find a Twin Cam FXR already set up, you can build it. Just buy an insurance wrecked 2007 or later Dyna and take everything off it.

A properly set up, completely gone through FXRT with the right seat, 39mm or larger forks (new Dyna forks are 49mm!) and an 18" rear wheel (10+lbs lighter than the 16") and a 19" on the front will fit the bill perfectly- but remember, if it's an Evo bike, when most of them were new there was a 55mph national speed limit so if it's got stock gearing you'll be running out of motor at 105mph and that will just lead to an exploded FXRT trying to keep up. At a minimum you'll need a 34 tooth tranny pulley and a 65 tooth rear pulley to keep up with the big boys (unless you've done the 6 speed TC96 swap, which has the same gearing as their bikes). It'll make leaving traffic lights a bit clutchy, but cruising 80 in fourth with the  motor turning 3500rpm, and shifting into fifth at 90, will make it a respectable comparable bike. Well it's good to see you back. Hope we'll see you occasionally in the future. Yeah, that's why I went on with "why can't people", rather than "why can't you". Maybe I should have been more clear, but every time someone brings up sport bikes, it's usually "Harleys suck because they're not MotoGP bikes" when the two have nothing to do with each other. 

Well, we *can* compare fruit, but if you try to make an apple pie with oranges, you're gonna end up with soup that gives you the running shits. :)

but look at OP's response to the same comment you first responded to. He comes from sport bikes, and this bike has power to spare. 

Ride safe. Yup. If I hadn't broken my back and herniated 4 discs in the lumbar, and didn't have two very arthritic hips and an arthritic thoracic spine, there'd be an EBR/Rotax monster next to the FXR and Road King in the garage.  :) I wrote [this discussion thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/3ql09u/i_ride_with_a_spine_injury_lots_of_riders_have/) a couple weeks ago. You might find it interesting and even useful. Well, get one with the lowest miles that has the best motor/seat/bars setup. If it's more expensive, it'll be worth it, but remember, do NOT pay asking price. Especially this time of year with used bikes, *cash* makes people agree to stuff they wouldn't agree to otherwise. Also, look for ads that have been up a month or more. By that point, they've accepted that they want too much for the bike. "Shiny side up" used to be the phrase, but with all the blacked out bikes these days.... :)Nicely done. What year? How many miles? Which motor? "Two rockets..."? The PT Cruisers behind the pretty bike?  Thunderheader is a wonderful exhaust. I have one on my FXR and I love it. I'd get a speedo and get it hooked up. You'll have a harder time selling the bike with unknown miles. You won't have to sell it for less, it just won't see as many interested people because they want to know how many miles are on a bike. 

If you're not wearing a full-face helmet, you should look into wearing foam or other earplugs every time you get on your bike. Prolonged wind noise coupled with loud exhaust noise causes permanent hearing damage. Every time you get off your bike with your ears ringing, that's hearing damage, and it's cumulative. My  hearing is damaged in both ears and it sounds like the tweeters on my stereo are busted. Anything over 6000Hz is muted and I'm deaf by 10K in my left ear, and 12K in my right. All from riding without earplugs and having bikes with loud exhaust. Didn't think it was ass-kissing. I would have seen the lipstick on my butt. :) 

But thanks for the kind words. I'm just giving back some of the massive lore and knowledge I was gifted by a couple old bikers in the 80s. Didn't have anyone to pass any of it on to until I found this sub, and you all have been gracious enough to not tell me to shut up too often. I just couldn't bring myself to use a term I learned yesterday. Sounds too much like the guy on the new Sportster calling everyone "bro" and talking about his "chopper". Nah, being a biker is only expensive until you finally have the two bikes you really need. After that, it's just gas, oil, tires, and insurance. :)I buy cheap, tapered yellow foam [3M E-A-Rsoft earplugs](http://www.ebay.com/itm/3M-Ear-Soft-Yellow-Neon-Ear-Plugs-312-1250-No-Cord-200-box-/191676325029?hash=item2ca0cc9ca5:g:w-YAAOSwniRWOEvw) I get by the case at Amazon. They're about $12/100 pair, and you don't worry if you lose them. There's a ziploc in the saddlebag of both bikes, and a couple pair in the bottom of my chest pockets on my road vest and jacket. Never worry about dropping them, losing them, etc. Bars being setup *correctly* make all the difference. My 16" apes on the Road King are *perfect* but if I had them tilted forward, I'd be in pain every day. Religion. Because theres thousands of years of fucked up, evil shit to rant about.Hey, you posted "my first *Harley*". Have you got much history on other motorcycles? C'mon, it doesn't take much to understand that a cop on a bike can go the same places you can go on a bike, and even more, because he doesn't have to worry about tickets, and people will get the fuck out of his way. From parades to crowd control to getting through a traffic jam to a wreck and direct traffic, there are *many* reasons to have cops on bikes... if you don't just have a hardon for cops and don't want them having fun. I, for one, would *love* getting paid to ride a Road King 40+ hours/week. Wouldn't be as a cop, but if I could, I would. Cool. Have you taken an MSF rider safety class? If you haven't you need to. Even though you've been riding for a year, the basic fundamentals of riding are something that most people on bikes do not understand and will not understand by osmosis. IF you think in terms of "leaning into corners", you do NOT understand the most basic fundamentals of how motorcycles turn, no matter what you're experience (I've known guys with 20 years in the saddle who don't know what counter-steering is and why that's the only way our bike turns). People who haven't taken the class are something like 4 times more likely to wreck their bikes than people who have. 

Even if you've taken the class, and if you haven't, go to the sidebar here and click on the "For New Riders and Relatively New Riders" link and sit down for 94 minutes and watch the entire movie. It'll save your life and exponentially increase your motorcycling pleasure. You can also find it through the wiki tab at the top of the page. 

Good luck. Welcome to the tribe. I seem to remember you writing "that "loud pipes safes lifes" is just bullshit", and that is, not to put too fine a point on it, full of shit. Had you intended an intelligent discussion, you would have phrased your *opening sentence* differently. Instead you chose antagonistic language about a point we've talked about ad nauseum. But hey, blame me. I'm OK with that. 

Point 2) Noise pollution is a very real thing, but "hurts people"? Only if they get in my face about my pipes when I'm in a bad mood. Freeway noise, city noise, airport noise, typical city/suburb noises like asshole screaming tweekers, schizophrenics yelling at the trees, and drunks yelling at any and everything are far more "harmful" than a bike going past every now and then. Singling out loud pipes as actually hurting people is a stretch. 

Point 3) People are already biased against bikers because the only bikers they ever see beyond going past on the freeway when they're sitting stock in parking lot traffic is "World's most dangerous gangs" and "Gangland" and "Sons of Ikea" and "Devil's Ride" and other moronic shows that do nothing to help peoples' attitudes towards bikers, and in fact do everything possible to create bias. It also doesn't help that people who don't know what they're talking about keep repeating that "loud pipes saves lives is bullshit" as they they are an authority on the subject. Pointing out potential negatives of loud pipes DOES NOT INVALIDATE THE CLAIM THAT THEY SAVE LIVES. 

4) Road rage is because assholes have no impulse control and think they have a right to get pissed at any fucking thing except themselves, when bad time management, stupid decisions, and an unwillingness to address anger issues. Blaming bikers with loud pipes for road rage is like blaming a battered woman for being beaten because she didn't fucking cook dinner on time. 

And I'm happy engaging in an intelligent, non-antagonistic discussion when that's what's offered, rather than "Thanks for telling me I'm full of shit" sarcasm. :) But on a serious note, even though it's much fewer syllables, I can't get used to saying "murdered out" when I've been calling it - making your bike more invisible to assholes who already "didn't see the motorcycle officer, they sure are dangerous. Do you know a bodyshop that can fix my car cheap?"Yup. You've seen my bikes. Every one I built was chrome and polished aluminum and... black. The Road King will stay copper until it needs paint. The FXR will get black this winter. Yes, but when you preface your points about loud pipes having drawbacks with a condemnation of an unrelated viewpoint about saving lives, those proponents of that viewpoint are unlikely to listen to your points about the drawbacks. Had you not chosen to condemn a completely unrelated topic, how do you think I might have responded? The thing is, this is common. 

Whether wanting to talk about negatives of loud pipes, or more commonly, ridiculing those with loud pipes as only seeking attention, those discussions ALWAYS begin with the fallacious ridicule and condemnation of the "loud pipes save lives" viewpoint and proponents. You should expect no better, more friendly response as long as you and others *choose* to frame the discussion of those issues in terms of "loud pipes save lives is bullshit".Exactly what /u/longhairedcountryboy said. It'll need new tires, a complete oil and fluid service, will probably need to have both front and rear brakes flushed with new fluid and bled, even if they work fine, and check carefully for rubber seals leaking after a few days on the bike. 

Look behind the primary cover for signs of oil. If theres no sign of leaks after a week, you're good. If there are leaks, the primary cover and drive need to come off to replace them. But ten years isn't too long and you may be fine. No oil lines to worry about, but imspect the fuel line from the tank to the carb.

I would drain any gas in the tank into a glass bottle and inspect the bottle for rust or water. Shouldn't need more than new gas, but if rusty, that might be an issue. Might drop the carb float for good measure and clean any sediment out of the bowl..

Sounds like a brand new bike otherwise, with another 100,000 miles of riding in its future.

How much does the seller want?I passed on a 2009 FXDC with 6000 miles on it and brand new tires, Dyna Defender footboards, crash bars, Vance &amp; Hines exhaust, Mustang seat and a windshield earlier this year. Seller wanted $6,600 for it. I passed. It was worth about that or a few *hundred* bucks more. Brand new bike with LOTS of optuons. Only ever had two oil changes.Yes. Engine cover? You mean the primary cover?Offer $2600 and go no higher than $2800-2900. He's expecting to take a hit on it, and priced it at $3400 expecting $3000. If it had 15K miles on it, it might be a $3000-3500 bike. It's got 29K so it's maybe had the 30K service, but if it was just an oil change, there's a LOT more to do at 30K than just oil. Do you know if the dealer serviced it? I would have had to ship it and shipping cost would have put the bike over $7400, which was the absolutely most I could see paying for a low-miles 2009 FXDC with all the things I was going to do to it anyway. To put it simply, I didn't feel like paying $7700 for it. It wasn't worth more than $7000. Period. How long has the bike been for sale? IF it's been over a month, he'll have to accept that he wants way too much. You're my hero for getting banned for calling Cunt a cunt. If it is. The cover down by your foot peg or shifter, it is the primary cover and covers the clutch, primary chain, and compensator. If its just the outer cover there's absolutely no problem and you could probably ride it dry for a few days with absolutely no problem.
But it's called the primary cover and if you need a gasket you order a primary cover gasket, if you need the inner primary you order an inner primary. That's just what it's called.Was it just the lights or the whole speedo, which is electronic. Go to the sidebar and click on the "Trouble Codes" link. Pull the codes, which will probably be "speed sensor", once you translate it. If it's the speed sensor, this is on top of your tranny under the starter motor and it gets gummed up with tiny microscopic metal "fuzz" and needs to be cleaned (rarely replaced). Sadly, you gotta pull the  footboard on the right, the exhaust (if it's 2 into 1), otherwise, just the rear exhaust and no fooboard, and the starter motor to get at it.  Not gonna leave you stranded, but the speedo, dash lights, cruise control, and self-canceling nature of the turn signals won't function. Odometer, too. My bike ran for two weeks with a bad speed sensor, and I had to trust my fuel gauge (kinda iffy, if ya know what I mean). 

Nothing else was wrong though, right? Just the dash? If it's working when you get on the bike, get on the freeway and set the cruise control. If the cruise shuts off when the lights shut off, it's the speed sensor, but pull the codes anyway. If it's JUST the dash light, and not the speedo or cruise control, it's the plug to the dashboard, under the dash. These come loose occasionally. Shouldn't, but it happens. You did read the buying a used Harley link on the sidebar, yes? Waaay overpriced. Read the link again then go find the lowest price early 2000s Road King within 300 miles on CL *that has been for sale for a month or more* and knock a minimum of $1000 off that and you'll be in ballpark at least of what three bike is worth. What does NADA's website say low retail is without any adjustments for miles or options?Cool. Glad you're on top of it. It doesn't look like the seller is going to be reasonable, but first week of February, when all the credit card bills are due, he's got his W-2s or 10-99s, and he's just paid rent/mortgage is *exactly* when to do it. Sounds like you're absolutely on top of it. 

Sounds like he's one more person who thinks he's got a gold mine in the garage because of low miles, and "it's a Harley! They hold their value". :) But if it's not there the first week of February, there *will* be other bikes that have sat all winter with low-miles, even if not that low. 

Ya know, it could turn out to just need tires and an oil and brake-fluid change, or it's gonna be a bit more of a pain in the ass with seals, fuel and shit. Let's hope he parked it with a *full* tank and there's no ethanol in the fuel where he filled up last. (ethanol attracts water)

Good luck! *Definitely* tell us if you get the bike, and what kind of shape it's in?Yeah, I know, they *all* have all dash lights in the speedometer if the speedo is in the dashboard on the tank. The dashboard contains the speedometer and maybe an ignition switch. and other function lights, from oil to "check engine". 

Yes, the speedometer light, but did the speedometer needle return to zero *when the light went out*. The turn signal lights would still work, just not the ability to turn themselves off "self-canceling". If the light itself is the only problem, the speedometer will continue to tell you the speed when the light goes out. The cruise control will continue to work. The odometer and the trip computer will continue to work. But if it's the sender these things will stop function *correctly* when the light goes out. IF THE LIGHT COMES BACK ON- these things will begin working again.

So, did you pull codes? What did the codes tell you were wrong?  If the speedometer needle works while the light is out, then it's just the light. It is possible the lighting in the dash is failing, but I don't think so. Sometimes corrosion can interrupt a connection, and sometimes it's that the plug is loose. That one that would be loose is the one from the speedometer that you unplug when you remove the dashboard. Sometimes they're not all the way secured when they assemble the motorcycle. I would remove the unbolt the dashboard and take a look at the plug for the speedometer. I'd unplug it, put some dielectric grease (get it at napa auto or electronic supply) on the contact points, and reinstall the plug and dashboard. Awesome. Wait... it's a .pdf. Isn't one the same as a hundred?Unless they've engineered some different way to keep the screen in and have it be a True filter, it's not the same as an air cleaner, or they'd call it that. 

Velocity stacks-if they're going to DO anything like improve performance- belong on drag bikes. When you put them on a street bike you end up with your jeans sucked in or zero useful filtering. 

If what you want is the performs bump a velocity stack gives, put an S&amp;S air cleaner on there. It's a tuned brochure stalk and actually accelerate the air going into the motor... with real filtering action.Or you could find one 5 years old with next to no miles on it for 1/2 the price and upgrade the suspension yourself, and pocket about $3000. If you really want a Sportster, upgrading the suspension with Ohlins or Progressive on both ends is the way to go. But if you're willing to spend that kind of money, have you looked into a used, 6 speed, EFI Dyna from 7 or 8 years ago for $6000-7000? You can find em for really low miles. If you haven't actually *ridden* a Sportster, go down to the dealer and take a Forty Eight for a test ride. They're tiny. And what a Hyabusa does is irrelevant to this conversation. Look at my other comment about exactly this topic.But OP did say "stage 4"That's awesome. Where would someone find these manuals as .pdf if they needed then?Now you know why we use torque wrenches and follow the service manual. Go buy a set of DeWalt screw extractors at the hardware store. Get the ones that come with drill bits. Drill out the bolt, and *follow the instructions* on the screw extractors for getting the old bolt out. Should be a breeze. Or you can put a rubber shifter boot on there. Knurled aluminum is going to tear up your boot. Rubber not so much.There's a "Tools" link on the sidebar with a list of tools to do everything on your bike except things like seal pullers and installers.Seriously? That's nothing. Remember rotten.com? No, don't go looking for it. :) Good to hear you're back on two wheels. Some people get a bit spooked after a wreck, and it's good to see you get back on the horse what threw ya. But some folks get a bit hesitant and/or tentative about corners and curves, especially when they have a wreck like you did, when a corner snuck up on them steeper than they thought. Confidence in avoiding the *next* wreck is one of the most important things you can do when you get back on the bike. 

If you haven't watched it in a while (or at all), click on the "For New or Relatively New Riders" link on the sidebar and watch the Twist of the Wrist film on handling and braking... again. Friends have told me that the confidence they gained from watching that (and applying the principles) after they'd been in a wreck helped them get over the hesitancy they felt after the wreck that they never had before. They found themselves feeling really apprehensive about corners 
(for good reason). It's natural, but a fundamentals refresher was super helpful in putting that shit behind them. 

Good luck man. Good to see you back on the road. Ride safe!Oh yeah, and take the whole primary cover off to do the drilling. You do NOT want metal filings inside your primary because that oil also oils your *transmission*. Go buy a primary cover gasket and a screw set (get allens) for the cover. Harley dealers will have em and many indy bike shops too. Drill the old bolts out on the workbench where you can keep the drill vertical. Use the screw extractors to get out the old bits, and TOSS any chewed up bolts that are from the rest of the cover. Buy a bottle or tube of LocTite 242 or (243 if they have it) and use it on *every* fastener. 

Sounds like the asshole you bought the bike from is one of the reasons Harley gets a reputation as being unreliable bikes- because broke-ass morons don't bother doing shit the right way. Use the *factory* service manual (you can find a .pdf over at /r/Sportster) and torque the screws to exactly the torque settings in exactly the tightening order the manual tells you. 

Good luck. I'd love to hear how things turn out.  Ouch. That sucks. Well, the bikes depreciate by the minute, and selling a used bike is harder and harder every day so you're gonna have to prove the bike aggressively if you want it to sell anytime soon. The used Sportster market is FLOODED with low miles pristine bikes, but most folks list them for stupid high prices. The fact that you've accepted the huge hit your gonna take actually puts you at an advantage for actually *selling* the bike rather than having it depreciating for months while the ad languishes with no responses.

Craigslist is where people look for used bikes mostly, but to get people's interest, it's gonna have to be priced at least $500 *lower* than the least expensive identical bike, it people just aren't gonna call. If you don't get a bite in two weeks, pull the ad and write a new one with different wording and drop the price another $500. Yeah, you're gonna take a huge hit, but you've accepted that.

 List it on eBay too. Set a reserve at your absolute bottom line (NADA's "low retail" without any modifications for options or mileage is a good place to start), but don't set the opening bid any higher than $5,000. The low bids dont put you at risk with the reserve being what it is, but people will NOT bid at all if they don't think they have a chance at a steal. Often folks will get into a bidding war and go past your reserve. Of the don't reach the reserve but get close, you can always message the last bidder and offer to accept their bid. 

Demand a $500 *non-refundable* deposit within 24 hours in the ad. Set up shipping in the ad too. Look at a bunch of other ads to see how people describe this. 

List any extras, and take as many ewell lit, outdoor closeup detail photos as you can, but dont, forget to get pics of the whole bike from both sides in sunlight.

Good luck.Nah, same air cleaner means same air flow. You'll be ok.I'd think so. Jist make sure if those are banjo bolts holding the baking plate, that you don't overtighten themRomania wants badly to be on the Euro, but the EU fights their efforts until they get corruption handled. Joining the EU brought a lot of EU development grants into the country.

There is a multimillion Euro, multi-building convention center built 50km from the nearest decent hotel on the road from Bucharest to Sibiu. When I was there in July friends said it was built with an EU economic development grant. SOMEONE got rich building it, but the jobs it created paid shit wages, and in the years it's been there it's NEVER been used... because there's nothing but tiny villages nearby, no hotels, and no economic infrastructure. Land owner and building contractor made out like bandits, plus the officials paid to approve the plans, but a simple inspection of the site by honest EU personnel would have saved a LOT of money.

 Corruption takes a LOT of forms.
Yup.

But it's not everywhere all the time and certain members of government are genuinely trying to change things. My friends there ride Harley Davidson motorcycles, and it used to be that you could import a new or used Harley from the US for the cost of shipping from the US and the cost of the bike in the US (half of what it would cost in eastern Europe!). You'd pay the motor vehicles and customs guys a few dollars of "black money" and things would go through easily and the legal title and inspection papers for the bike would all go through quickly and easily. In the last few years they've been unable to do this, as the motor vehicles and customs people are no longer willing to accept the black money for fear that anti-corruption police will catch them, *and* because like was said earlier- many many Romanians are fed up with this state of affairs and are actively trying to change it, and these people also get jobs at motor vehicles and customs agencies. So there is some improvement, apparently.

By the way, I live in California and in the two weeks I was there I fell in love with much of your country. I don't *ever* want to drive a car in Bucharest, and I'm not sure I would be willing to live there, but it was beautiful (as long as you ignore the trash on the side of the road) and the people were (mostly) absolutely amazing. I met Romanian and Saxon people constantly for the two weeks I was there who were as gracious and polite as any people I've encountered anywhere on earth. I also loved that the taxis around Sibiu would not cost more than 4 or 5 lei to get across the Old City from one end to the other (that's about $1 to $1.25 for you folks who need help with conversion). Hotels were inexpensive and I stayed in a pension in Sibiu that was just wonderful.

I will be back in July of next year. Wow, those are nifty! I like it. But I worry that you can no longer back into angle parking spaces without your front wheel sticking out into traffi... wait, bikes are shorter than cars. Never mind. :)

Looks good. There is nothing on earth that sounds like a Harley through fishtails except a Harley through fishtails an I, for one, find it to be one of the most beautiful sounds in the universe. Weird, huh?

It sounds like your carburetor is dumping gas at idle. Your idle mixture screw is soft metal and the needle can get deformed if it's tightened too tight even once. This will make it so you can't turn the screw in far enough to lean out the mixture to where it wants to be. A stuck float needle or crud in the float needle seat can do this also, as fuel will dump into the cylinder just from gravity from the gas tank. 

How old is the bike? What carb? How many miles/years on the carb?

There's another thing- if it's electronic ignition, the ignition module could be glitchy and retard the timing far. Also, if the charging system has failed and it's running off the battery as the voltage drops, the combustion becomes less efficient as the spark weakens, and you can carbon foul things that way, too. I want an octopus on my bike, too! Tentacles are hott. It's a Bugatti kit car like the other commenters said, with a fiberglass body on top of a newer chassis like a Cadillac CTS or Ford Crown Victoria. It's not very much like that car, it IS that car, as others have pointed out.I know you were. so was I ...it's really easy to deadpan in an all text environment. :-)&gt;When did eavesdropping stop being tacky as shit?

When Facebook invited everyone to butt in and comment on strangers' conversations. How many times have you posted something relevant to people you know, have a friend like the post (causing it to show up in *their* friends' news feed), and then some asshole or stupid twat you've never heard of before butts in to say how everything is Obama's fault and that you are what's wrong with the world?

This, combined with media, particularly conservative media, demeaning critical thinking every day for 30+ years now, teaches people that no one else can expect privacy *in any place they happen to be, especially public places* and that they have a right to force their opinions on you whether you want it or not. Asshole them goes outside and does the same thing to people walking down the street having a private conversation are fair game...Good to hear. Don't worry that it's cheezy as hell. The stuff in it is vitally important to actually understanding everything that happens in a corner. I learned a lot the first time I saw it after riding more than two decades, much of that living in the mountains with two lane twisties to have fun on every day. Awesome. Thank you.Well, it's still True for many many people. Just because you and I have most things set to "private" and check regularly to make certain FB hasn't reset things to "public" with every update, doesn't make us the norm. :)It is possible, but not likely, or everyone's bike would end up running rich every few months/years. I'd be more inclined to think the float needle is obstructed. It normally closes when the float bowl fills and the float lifts far enough to close off the fuel flow *into* the bowl, but if a piece of crud/rust/aliens gets into the needle seat area, it'll allow fuel to fill the bowl completely then pour through the main jet into the venturi, richening the mixture considerably. 
Media in general has discouraged critical thinking for a long time. Conservative media *actively demeans it*, with people like Limbaugh and Beck ridiculing critical thinking, and many of the "news" shows being thinly veiled cognitive fallacy wrapped in a veneer of news. I'm a former Marine, gun owner, and former NRA member (quit when they became a lobbying org for gun manufacturers), yet I am still able to be honest about it with myself when people are doing something so glaringly obvious. Not a political slant, but reality. Glad I could help. "Pissing gas out the tube" means you have a stuck float. Gotta inspect inside the float needle seat *carefully* with a light, and this means pulling it off the manifold. Shit. I'm guessing the shoulders are gravel, and people taking those roads in cars are cutting them tight, kicking gravel onto the road. I wrote about taking a pyrometer up to the Sierras and testing road surface temps a while back. On the first of those two trips, I was coming down 4 from Angels Camp and CalTrans had laid new gravel on the shoulder for about 4 miles of fucking gorgeous twisties. Well, every single car with a boat trailer and every single camper trailer and every single what the fuck ever that touched the gravel kicked a shovel full or two onto the asphalt right at the middle of the curve. Took the fun right out of that stretch of road. When I went back a week later, I slowed the hell down for that first curve, and sure enough, have a truckload of gravel spread across my the inside of each curve for the whole stretch of now week-old new gravel. Nah, it's gonna be fine for most things you gotta do. The screw extractors however, need to be of high quality or a) the drills will not drill True, and b) the screw extractors will break off in the screw, and THOSE are a bitch to get out when broken (you go in through the other side with a pin punch and hammer them out the from the back side). Buy DeWalt or Mikita or MAC or SnapOn or Matco. They're worth it. They come in a set in varying sizes and the set you want is sized typically from #10 through 3/8" since I'm pretty sure those are 1/4"x20 screws and you need a drill and extractor small enough to get into the middle of the bolt and strong enough not to twist or snap when you back the broken bolt out. You'll never need to buy another set for the rest of your life. Running way too rich. Taking the air cleaner off causes lean condition, so if its still rich, there's something dumping a lot of gas in.The rubber needle can work itself one a rapper. They're cheap. Replace it anyway. Did the main jet come loose buy any chance?Gorgeous Road King! You upgraded *from* the Fat Bob. Got it. If you decide this one isn't big enough, there's always the Road Glide Ultra. &gt;;-p

Love the DayMaker. I haven't gone there yet and have 'settled' for the Xenon bulb in my stock 7" lens. Works great and only $17, but I'd *love* to put an LED headlamp on there. 

Hope you don't mind some questions, but we've talked a lot about your Fat Bob and my Road King in the past and I'm curious about some stuff.

Is this your first bike with a full windshield? I took mine off *once* and when I got on the freeway, I got off at the next exist and went back to the house to put it back on.  

And you know i love the bars. How do you like the 16s? Do you have an opinion on them yet re: riding position and handling subtlety and/or parking-maneuvering for a heavy bike?

I know you've put a few miles on her these last two weeks. How's the seat treating you? I was just looking at a 2016 at the dealer while waiting for a parts counter guy and it looks like they've *completely* redesigned the driver's seat construction and shape, shaved the inner thigh area to relieve pressure and lower the seat height, and added some considerable padding for the passenger. Good looking seat. My stock RK seat in '08 was an ass killer for me and the ol' lady, and I know you had to swap to a DG seat on the Fat Bob. Are Harley's newer seats that much of an improvement over the old, or is this just waiting for the gaping hole in your wallet to fill back up first?

Whaddaya think of the footboards? Is the change from the FB enough for you to know why I've had boards on every bike since the first Shovelhead? Any plans for freeway pegs in the future? If you're gonna get freeway pegs for the crash bars once your wallet has stopped hemmoraging a little, I recommend something that has adjustable positioning like [these](http://www.amazon.com/Kuryakyn-4575-Longhorn-Offset-Dually/dp/B000GZQIO6/ref=sr_1_9?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1446765357&amp;sr=8-9&amp;keywords=harley+highway+pegs). I didn't get the adjustables because the location with non-adjustables was *perfect*, but I still keep my feet on the boards about 90% of the time.

If you do eventually put freeway pegs on there, that will be relevant when you discover these ["soft lowers" from Sagebrush Designs](http://sagebrushdesigns.com/harley.html). I just put a set of the Sagebrush Chaps on the FXR this week, since the temps dropped below 50F coming home from work after our first rains of the season last weekend and I wasn't enjoying the cold humid air. They had to to modify a set for a Dyna Defender, and do a cut for my freeway pegs, but they had 'em here within 4 days from Canada! Went on in about one minute and with the big windshield they knock out about 80% of the cold blowing up the legs and into my face. 

They eliminate most of the bugs and cold that comes up over your legs and right under your glasses to dry out your eyes and rip heat right out of your body on cold days, and reduce the blow-drier effect of heat coming off the asphalt on hot days. 

I have a set of the chaps from another vendor on my Road King, and they've been there for 5 or 6 years and I *love* having them there. WAY fewer baked-on bugs to scrub off the primary cover, exhaust pipes and air cleaner, and they channel air *towards* the engine (and oil cooler) like a giant funnel. With the fork-mounted wind-deflectors they eat sooo much of the shit i'd have to wash off the chrome on both sides of the motor, and the front of the saddlebags. [This pic was taken after a 7 hour summer ride into the Sierras](http://i.imgur.com/Ow7Bq6p.jpg). You can see how much shit the soft lowers and the wind-deflectors caught that would have baked immediately onto the hot engine. They also limit the shit thrown up from cars and trucks in front of you one wet and dry roads- drimy road spray, gravel, and other odds and ends. Doesn't eliminate the need to wash your bike by any stretch of the imagination, but reduces the amount of shit that gets on *you* considerably.

If you add [these to the mix](http://www.amazon.com/Bikers-Choice-Fork-Deflectors-28-111/dp/B00JCE1HAW/ref=sr_1_fkmr0_2?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1446765331&amp;sr=8-2-fkmr0&amp;keywords=road+king+fork+wind+deflectors), you can almost (not quite) light a cigarette on the freeway, while still enjoying the wind in your face (even though the link says "to 2013", I think that's because this is the last time they updated anything except price- if you eventually get a set, call Kuryakyn, they'll know).

So, whaddaya think of the RK?  

It's a fucking gorgeous Road King man (heh... heh... he said "but fucking"... heh). I'm kinda jealous. Hey, HAPPY CAKE DAY! Yay. You're... special. Thanks for posting this. People who drink and drive generally *don't* think about any consequences except maybe going to jail for an evening, and maybe not even that. It took a Brother of mine getting killed on his bike way back in the 80s for me to really understand how dangerous a couple drinks can be, even if you feel OK. That one split second of reaction time you need, that's delayed by half a second because you were drifting or daydreaming, and whamo.

But even if no one gets hurt, you get arrested, your bike gets impounded and can cost upwards of $1000 to get out of hock, there's bail money if it's election time and they're "cracking down on DUIs" so the DA and judge can get reelected, and if you hit someone, you're being charged with a felony, so you *will* be posting bail. You'll have many days you gotta take off work to go to court, there's court fees, fines, the suspended license that you have already pointed out, at least in California a *first* DUI convictions means a *six month* suspension, and you gotta pay for a lawyer if you're gonna fight it enough to either plea bargain or have that suspension changed to a restriction, allowing you to go to and from work. 

Then there's the *many* months of court ordered alcohol classes that you *have to pay for* and can't miss without potentially being sent to jail. There's the time off work and away from your family while going to court half a dozen times and all those evenings sitting in a DUI class.  And then the really expensive thing- increased SR-22 insurance costs for 7 fucking years that will add up to a LOT on top of your time with your license suspended. 7 fucking years you'll be paying "you're a fucking nightmare risk and we don't want to insure you but the law says we have to so we're going to fucking rape your wallet until you can't pay rent" insurance every month, and if they catch you driving without insurance while on probation for a DUI, at least here in California your bike can be *seized*, not just impounded, and you're going back to jail. 

Man, I'm really glad you pointed this out, and I think most people here have no idea about the other costs you're paying, have paid, and will eventually pay before this fucking thing is off your driving record. According to the LA Times two years ago, your *first* DUI in California will end up costing you about [*$15,000*](http://articles.latimes.com/2013/mar/14/autos/la-fi-hy-drunk-driving-conviction-cost-20130314) (!!!!!) when all is said and done and it's all totaled up, and that's if you don't pay for a lawyer and don't hit or hurt anyone. 

Second DUI means "between 3 days and *a whole fucking year*" in jail, and 18 to 30 *months* of one or more nights *every fucking week* of court mandated DUI school, plus all the other shit. The second DUI will eventually cost you considerably more than the first one, and that's *after* you've already spent the $15,000 the first one cost you.   

Then there's the whole "somebody dying" thing. Too many righteous biker Family of mine have been killed and crippled because someone just didn't give a fuck, and too many riders and their passengers have died because *the rider* was sure he/she was OK with just a couple drinks in them. I'm guilty of having ridden with a few drinks in me back in the 80s, and there's no excuse. Mitigation? None. I was spending a lot of time in biker bars and "everybody drank, some more than others", and getting laid was just a lot more fun when you and that cute redhead had a couple of drinks in you (and going out behind the bar for a blowie just wasn't gonna be enough). 

And then the *first* of my Brothers got killed by a drunk driver and I haven't driven or ridden with alcohol in my system since June of 1985.

My Brother "Road Map" Lloyd was killed by a fucking *professional driver* who'd had "one too many" and drifted over the double yellow and hit him head-on on his Panhead... with a Peterbuilt, while riding south on US 101 from Clear Lake to San Jose. We called him Road Map because the scars all over his chest and stomach looked like a road map, because he'd survived being hit by a drunk once before and they had to do multiple abdominal surgeries to put his organs back together from the first drunk. 

So hey, I'm really glad you chose to post this. I'm really glad you have begun to understand how much this is costing you, even without anyone getting hurt. Thank you for not wanting to do this again. It matters. Ya know, I completely agree with you. Even in the heyday of the outlaw scene in California in the 60s-80s, there weren't as many patches running around, and there certainly weren't Starbucks barristas running around with a diamond patch on the cutoff. Jesus christ, the Sons of Ikea have fucking changed things a lot. 

But hey, on a positive note, you and I are completely invisible to many cops as a result. Well, I am, anyway, because I don't wear a patch. Maybe someday we'll get to the point that cops look at a 3 piece patch and think "I wonder if that's a Bar Association club or a Masons MC...".I dunno about the clubhouses thing, but I'm pretty sure /u/culraid does. He's riding in Europe and has since the 70s, and occasionally posts pics of the more absurd things he sees in the MC world. So unfortunate for your friends. :) Even after 33 years in the saddle I find myself taking off for the hills and back roads, anytime I have a morning or afternoon off work, no matter who is or isn't working. If you're new to motorcycles, get used to it. :) If not, it's good to see another rider enjoying things solo. 

A word of warning- I first experienced this in early 1983 and the desire to get on the bike and GO has not diminished one bit, despite back injuries, old-timers disease (being a fucking grouch), and twice the number of cars on the road as there were in 1983 when I first felt the urge to head for the back roads, hills, and forests. &gt;when I'm riding but I make sure to burn at least a gallon of gas before I have another one.

Sounds like a workable plan...Glad you're OK. Another example of deer street gangs affecting our neighborhoods. They gather on the side of the road, and they play chicken with cars. Whichever is the newest gang member is supposed to wait until the car or bike or truck is close and then bolt across the road close enough to touch the car/bike/truck. But these gang members are cowards at heart. They get halfway out there and the fear sets in and they *freeze*. Not good. I'm just glad it wasn't rush week at the local deer fraternity. There's like three times as many on those days. Foam ear plugs. Hearing damage is cumulative and even with the full face, high speed wind and exhaust noise can cause damage. Every time you get off your bike with your ears ringing is a sign that you've done a small amount of damage, and with its cumulative nature, it adds up. I'm deaf above about 12kHz, and above 6kHz things are attenuated from 20 years without plugs. Been wearing them for the last 15 years and it hasn't gotten any worse.

But the Rinehart 2 into 1 is a pretty sounding pipe and performs really well. Foam ear plugs.Does your bike have a key fob? If so, the battery may be dead. I replace my batteries at least once a year. In California if you hurt someone driving drunk, you will be charged with a felony. Maybe not convicted, but it's "felony DUI". I'm on my cell but I'll find the specific code section when I get home.Ask me how I knew the answer to that one... :-)I buy 3M E-A-Rsoft Yellow Neons earplugs by the box of 200 or 300 for about $12/100 pairs on Amazon or ebay. I keep a ziploc of em in the saddlebag of each bike. [They're on sale right now for half price](http://www.amazon.com/3M-OCS1135-Yellow-Neons-Earplugs/dp/B008MCUOH2/ref=sr_1_6?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1446829411&amp;sr=8-6&amp;keywords=foam+ear+plugs). In fact, I just bought a box right now, since that's about an $18 savings.I'd forgotten about that. Hilarious.If you put pipes on it, and have an exhaust leak, it'll throw a P0051 code, since it throws O2 levels out of whack.&gt;  I know my local dealership has been known to use crimps and electrical tape for wire extensions. 

Jesus, what fucking dealer is this so I can avoid it... forever? It's a funny joke. My daughter would probably have told me to fuck off if I brought home a Suzuki and said "going for a ride. Wanna go with?" 

Well, at least they looked like the assholes they are cutting your shrink tubing off. But electrical tape to put it back together? If I had ONE piece of shrink tubing I'd have to cut away for some reason and didn't have soldering gear handy, MAYBE. But at the dealer service dept? Nope, fucking nope fucking nope. Get out the fucking soldering gear and do it right assholes. That's exactly what they are. You're in IT. Of COURSE you're a nerd. I buy em by the dozen since I use them for an LED clip light that takes 'em. I have one spare in the saddlebag (in the ziplock with the foam earplugs in it). If you don't have a bag or shit gets stolen, use duct tape and tape a couple on the inside of the painted side cover over the fuses (after wiping down the plastic with isopropyl). Yeah, but at least I'm not trying to tell you to sell the bike you have now. Everyone needs two Harleys. :-)Yeah, but that's a Ducati. Any bike that needs a cam lobe to *close* the valves can't be all bad. A pain in the ass to maintain maybe, but at least it's not a Suzuki. :-)When you take them off, *replace the seals*. Did you replace them the last time you pulled the exhaust? If I pull my exhaust, I replace the seals *every time*. They're cheap. Even if I've just put the bike back together and realize I gotta pull the exhaust again for some silly reason, I pull the seals and put new ones in. 

When you assemble the exhaust, there's exactly one right way to tighten things with a 2 into 1. With everything in place and the exhaust flanges slipped over the studs, wiggle things until the exhaust pipe is as close to each head as it's going to get easily. Make sure EVERY bolt from the frame and brake hanger is so loose that they're almost falling off. Starting at the front head, *put hi-temp anti-seize compound on the threads of the studs or on the inside of the nuts*, and *follow the service manual to the letter*.

1. Tighten nuts at front cylinder studs as follows:

a. Install lower nut and tighten finger tight.

b. Install uppper nut and tighten to 9-18 in-lbs.

c. Tighten lower nut to 60-80 in-lbs.

d. Tighten upper nut to 60-80 in-lbs.

2. Tighten nuts at rear cylinder studs as follows:

a. Install upper nut and tighten finger tight.

b. Install lower nut and tighten to 9-18 in-lbs.

c. Tighten upper nut to 60-80 in-lbs.

d. Tighten lower nut to 60-80 in-lbs.

*THEN* and only then, do you tighten the bolt at the clamp that holds the collector to the frame, *then* do the muffler hanger in back. You're done and you won't have exhaust leaks. Any other sequence and you've got a better than 50% chance of exhaust leaks. Absofuckinglutely. Gonna change that right now. Done. Thanks for pointing that out. I have a bag of a dozen of them in the cabinet in the garage, so haven't though about the aftermarket seals in a few years. Good lookin' out. By the way, ONLY use Harley exhaust seals. The aftermarket ones do NOT work as well and the couple times I've tried them (because a friend supplied them for his bike), they've been junk and have never been able to seal properly. Get the factory seals from the dealer. They're cheap. &gt; It is running a little laggy, and this morning on the freeway I couldnt go over 90 mph. It just wouldnt go above that. 

If it's not an exhaust leak causing the O2 sensor to put the EFI out of whack, that's gonna be symptomatic of something else. Could be something else in the EFI like the throttle position sensor sending a bad signal, or your electrical system running below 12V, or something in the ignition timing/module being wonky. Exhaust leak will affect the O2 sensor reading, which *will* effect the EFI, but once you get it fixed, I'd love to find out what it was.

The best price on exhaust I've found is [American Classic Motors on eBay](http://www.ebay.com/sch/m.html?_odkw=&amp;_ssn=americanclassicmotors&amp;_armrs=1&amp;_osacat=0&amp;_from=R40&amp;_trksid=p2046732.m570.l1313.TR12.TRC2.A0.H0.Xexhaust.TRS0&amp;_nkw=exhaust&amp;_sacat=0). Saved about $150 on my ProPipe over Revzilla. I dunno, in your shoes I'd be thinking more in terms of "what if the two dozen kids were screaming bloody murder and bike 1 had an issue? I'd be able to escape on bike 2 and leave her to deal with it!"I've been able to fit Shovels in Panhead rigids before. Are you running into an issue with the rear rocker box and the seat tube or the top frame rail?Sportster 1200 makes for an *adequate* touting bike if you weigh 130lbs and don't know how comfortable a real touring bike can be. 

FTFYOh, I agree with you, but there's a reason the California Highway Patrol no longer has "accident reports". They're "collision reports" or "incident reports" now because they finally got the clue that calling it an accident means morons think shit was unavoidable. Nope, with *very* few reasons (deer, premature failure of some mechanical part that suddenly steers your car into oncoming traffic, etc.) if there was a wreck, *someone* was fucking up, from going to fast to following too closely to failing to yield the right of way to letting their dog run wild so it can run into the street and cause a wreck. 

But I think a LOT of things should be treated as a felony or at least as badly as DUI by the courts-

* Texting while driving. If you're sitting at a light, maybe not so much, but if your fucking car is moving, fucking with your phone *kills people*. You can fucking get your phone to tie your shoes if you talk to it correctly. *Learn how to use your goddam phone's features, like "voice to text" or Siri or Android Voice or whatever your phone has, and arrange your goddam phone book so peoples' names are simple and clear "Call Oakland Harley" is easier for your phone to understand - *and for you to remember* than "Call Harley Davidson Dealer in Oakland California... wait. maybe it's Call Harley dealer in Oakland... fuck. Gimme the phone". I don't care that your DVR is still flashing 12:00 all day long. There's something called The Internet and YouTube. Use them. Learn that shit and stop killing people because you're too fucking lazy to learn how to use your device. If you're incapable of learning how to use your phone properly, you have ZERO business driving a fucking deadly weapon. Reasons: you might as well be looking at the floor or the headliner above your head or wearing a fucking blindfold... and people die when you're driving by braille. 

* Programming your GPS without pulling over. Pull the fuck over. See "Texting while driving" for reasons.

* Driving under the influence of children- if your kids are being assholes and you need to turn around to beat them, PULL THE FUCK OVER. See "Texting while driving" for reasons.

* Putting on your fucking makeup while driving. Pull the fuck over, or wait until you get where you're going. Nobody thinks you're hot anyway, and if by some strange confluence of events you actually *are* hot (hot and stupid in the same person? Never), you don't fucking need makeup. You're already hot. See "Texting while driving" for reasons.

* Changing lanes without signaling between the diamond lane and the number 1 lane in heavy traffic and during HOV lane hours, and changing lanes *any* time without physically turning your head to check your blind spot. Unless you're missing both fucking hands, the turn signal is located *where you can fucking reach it without taking your hands off the fucking wheel*. People split lanes between the diamond lane and number 1 lane, at least here in California. If you're in such a fucking hurry that you can't signal, you're in too much of a hurry to check your blind spot, too. Fuck you. Learn to drive. 

* Saying the words "Gee officer, I didn't see the motorcycle. Those things sure are dangerous" should be a fucking capital crime. Someone should put a gun in your mouth and splatter what little brains you have against the headrest of your fucking car. If you'd have opened your fucking eyes and actually *looked*, rather than glancing for half a millisecond and not seeing anything *filling* the lane and decided there's nothing there, you wouldn't have left-turned the guy. Reasons: you're supposed to signal, *then look over your shoulder*, not "change lanes then check your mirror to see if you cut anyone off". Die, asshole. 

I feel a little better now. :) Not much, but a little. Now we need to make a law so that *cops* have to pull over to type on their in-car laptop or text or dial their phones, too. It's not well known, and it would be poetic if it wasn't so fucked up (not well known because the CHP kept it hushed up), but a guy driving a Toyota pickup in southern Humboldt a few years ago will spend the rest of his life knowing he took a life- killed a CHP officer with his truck... because the cop was texting while driving and drifted over the center line and hit the pickup head-on. Said truck was lifted and after immediately sheering the left front wheel off the car, the axle went over the hood of the car and through the A-pillar and hit the cop square in the neck and head. I'm sure you had a "great" time, and I'm sure your bike did its job. Sounds like a great ride, and no doubt the landscapes were gorgeous! I absolutely *love* riding in mountainous, forested terrain, and Canada and the US have a lot of that. *Everyone* should take a bike cross-country and see the world. Too many people are hung up on "I live in ____ city". True, but they also live *on Earth*, and that's a great fucking big planet and until you've spent day in and day out going to new places on a bike, and felt the pavement change from state to state and country to country, you're really missing out. It's been a long time since I went cross country in a big way, and the last time I put more than 1500 miles on a bike in a three day weekend, it was a rigid Panhead. NOT a great touring bike. Not even a "marginal" touring bike. "Bone breaker" would be more accurate.

Others here have posted their multi-thousand mile trips they've taken on Sportsters, and there's no doubt they're *capable* of accomplishing this, but there's a matter of degree of comfort and, as you brought up, luggage capacity. It was just your choice of calling it a "great" touring bike is a bit of a stretch in any universe, mainly because it implies comparison to, well, touring bikes.If you install your pipes correctly, you won't squash the tapered seals into the port, either. But *Harley* makes [flat exhaust seals](http://www.harley-davidson.com/store/se-performance-exhaust-gasket-kit?source_cd=SEM_Shop_PLA&amp;_cr=pla|Google|17048-98_10752&amp;gclid=CjwKEAiAvPGxBRCH3YCgpdbCtmYSJABqHRVwP12M5fT1bzAXNJZVHn8TexQ3v9iNmVDq4R7DMzvvHxoCGb3w_wcB). Copper crush seals, too. They work better than any of the aftermarket seals I've used. Yeah, if it's at your battery box, it's probably coming from the rear exhaust port. And yeah, intake leaks are more likely to cause lean conditions, but the exhaust valve is open for a split second after the piston starts going down, so it can let in extra air. That's the way it's supposed to work- pipes installed correctly, nothing leaking, even if you bang it up. 

The other bit might be better for /r/sportster You might be better off buying a donor bike for many of those parts- you know, another bike that's been sitting in a shed for 20 years, that's got lots of the original parts on it. They're only a couple hundred bucks, and used parts on ebay might add up to more than that.You would be correct.One way to better team play in platoons is to be in GAME chat, so others can coordinate with you too. Your gonna love how it works, too. My favorite tank of any kind for the last year... that is until I got my Waffle 100 two nights ago. :-) Grinding the T57 now because that autoloader on the Waffle is magic. Can't wait to have one on a heavy.

Re: Jagtiger- get hull down when you can. The superstructure armor is trollish. You can track your recent progress at wotinfo.net. my first year was so bad that it affect my overall ratings terribly, but I found that as often as not I am playing at unicum levels every couple weeks, with a current 51% overall winrate. Doesn't look like he bothered with the front brake at all. No front end dive, just rear wheel locked up instantly. Inexperienced rider. You're just not gonna leave it alone, are ya?

If you wanna ride a metric cruiser, ride a metric cruiser. If you don't wanna ride a Harley, then don't, but you keep trying to pick apart everything I say about why comparing apples to oranges (or Harleys to sport bikes) is irrelevant. I'm sure they're built well and engineered well, but they're ugly to me exactly because they're trying to copy something without copying it exactly, and you get a [1974 Toyota Celica fastback](http://2000gt.net/Celica/Celica76LB_01.jpg) instead of a [1970 Mustiang 302 Boss fastback](http://www.remarkablecars.com/main/ford/ford-00291-2.jpg)- no matter how well built they are, they will never be what they're trying to copy.

No matter how many times I tell you it's not some stupid fucking 'Murica/Harley brand circle jerk that makes most of us ride Harleys for our entire lives, you seem like you'll never believe it. *I don't ride a motorcycle because of net \u0394v a sport bike creates*, if that \u0394v is without emotion. I ride Harleys (and love muscle cars) because of the feedback loop caused by their very inefficiency that no other manufacturer has built since Indian quit making flathead/sidevalve engines in 1952. 

The metrics are fucking sterile. They *exist* to try and LOOK like a Harley, and their engines have been designed to try and replicate the look and feel of a Harley, but they're fucking sterile. They're lifeless compared to a Harley. They may be as fast or faster, and they are probably engineered as well as the amazing engineering departments at the import design labs cam make them. But there's ZERO of the emotional component the engine design on a Harley feeds into the rider through the seat, the footpegs, and the grips, and  Honda, Suzuki, Kawasaki and others have either *never understood* this, or don't realize how important it is to those of us who won't buy anything else, or just don't care. 

They've *all* dumbed down their engineering to pick up the "I can't afford the Harley I want, so I'll buy the bike that looks most like it and save some money" market and they've produced slow, awkward looking, faux Harleys for decades now, and they've never once produced one I can look at and think "wow, they did that right" the way I do when I look at a TL1000 and I'm pleased they made a 90 degree V-twin and got rid of the desmo valve mechanism nightmare on the Ducati. 

Of course, enough people didn't *want* a 90 degree twin from Suzuki, so it didn't matter that they eliminated the maintenance nightmare of the desmo valve train. They wanted a 90 degree twin from *Ducati*, and from Suzuki they wanted a Gixxer/'Busa, so the TL went away and Suzuki continued to build monster sport bikes that for whatever reason can't quite seem to compete with Honda and Yamaha and Ducati on the MotoGP circuit, but they build a *very* popular, very well designed and engineered street bike.  

But Harley didn't go away like the TL because they understood something Suzuki didn't understand about the Duc (pronounced Duck, so you don't think I'm sitting here pronouncing it "Duke"). 

It all boils down to the same thing it's always boiled down to- there's something the inefficient and noisy and weird feeling about the desmodromic valve mechanism on the Duc, and Harley's 45 degree *pushrod* V-twin with two large cylinders *sharing a common crankpin* does things to the rider that no overhead cam, short stroke, or even faux-Harley metric V twin engine is going to do, and if you can't fucking understand that, why are you even here on this sub except to be a troll? No pushrod engine in a Harley is going to have the same horsepower/displacement ratio that an overhead cam inline, small bore import will. Ever. And a faux-Harley that doesn't use a common crankpin will never *ever* feel or sound like the Harley they're trying so desperately to copy.

But when Honda and Kawi and Suzuki build faux Harleys that are as slow and don't handle any better than a Harley, but *don't* bother building an engine that fucking grabs you by the intestines and massages your liver from the inside, they will *always* be bikes for people who either don't *have* the capacity or desire for the emotional attachment we get from Harley engines, or for people who really want a Harley *instead* but have listened too much to the bullshit "they're too expensive" or "they're not reliable", or "they leak" or "they're slow", put out by "experts" who have never ridden one and think all bikes should perform like a sport bike, because of course no one else could possibly want something different from a motorcycle than what a sport bike does, right? So they went out and bought a Honda Shadow 750 that can't get out of its own way and feels like you're driving a pedicab and they convince themselves that they look cool on it and rev their engine every time they ride past my work and see the Harley out front, as though I'm going to say "wow, that Suzuki Intruder is 'one of us'. Right on man" (the same idiots on Sportsters who do that every day get the same scorn, by the way). 

So lemme 'splain it one last time in terms you might understand- I loved my '87 Acura Legend V6/5 speed manual/leather interior/LS(?) 4 door, and my 1997 Toyota Avalon V6/auto/leather/LE, which put out about the same power/displacement ratios as my 1966 Chevelle with a 283 and a 2 speed Powerglide slushbox and my '67 Camaro RS/SS with a 327 and a Muncie 4 speed, and both sedans handled amazingly well compared to the Chevelle and Camaro, and were 100 times better engineered, quieter inside, more comfortable, and considerably nicer looking inside... but I loved that Chevelle and Camaro a lot more and I will *always* love my old rigid 74s more than my Road King and my Chevelle and Camaro more than my Avalon or Legend. 

The reason I love Harleys (and 1960s GM Muscle cars) has nothing to do with the name, and everything to do with the engine design. When you take a bike that's *not* designed for knee dragging, but instead for taking it relatively easy in a riding position of considerable comfort, you're making a whole slew of choices around that, not the least of which is engine design. The metrics have never reproduced the things we love about the Harley engine and it appears they have no desire to do so (and I can't say I blame them- much more maintenance, higher cost, etc. etc.).

Ride safe. [You figure out what he did wrong. It's all in "rider 101" that everyone should learn before getting on a bike.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KVWLIfChUwg)Chalk it up to lack of understanding of braking fundamentals, something every rider should understand and there's zero excuse to not know them, since they're free, easily accessible on the internet, and so on. You're right, but my answer was to the question you asked, rather than one about business model and upgrades. 

Harley's business model is to engineer a bike the dealers have a good chance of selling upgrades for so the dealers and the boutique in every Harley dealer can make a profit during the cold months and the days in the warm months that they don't sell bikes. 

The thing is most people who buy Harleys don't know the difference, so why bother spending the money ? The FXR was the best handling bike Harley ever built for production, but within three years they'd put forward controls on it and lowered it 2" because Harley buyers didnt want a bike that could keep up with a CB750 in the hills. They wanted a bike that looked a certain way and the FXR wasn't it. 12 years of dumbing it down every couple years and they replaced it with the Dyna.

I don't particularly like Harley's business model, you don't like it, but apparently lots of people like thinking they have a better, more "custom" bike and a cooler collection of clocks and ice cube trays than the last guy to buy an identical bike the day before and this  business model accomplishes exactly that. The rest of us who want a bike that handles well have accepted it, whether or not we like it. 

I have Koni adjustable shocks on the FXR (now Ikon, how creative), but the forks are stock 35mm 1985 forks with upgraded springs and a fork brace. I'm gonna put a 39mm front end on there just as soon as I fine one with dual disc kegs, calipers, and the top triple tree I want on craigslist for a reasonable price. But when it was new, this was the fork on the police bikes and Harley wasn't thinking about suspension upgrades at the dealer. There's nothing really wrong with it, it's just a bit flimsy for the way I ride. 

But yes, a new Sportster 1200c should have adequate suspension on it new, in my opinion.Yup. The simple fact is there are 15 people on your team, and the more people you can get to coordinate with you merely by talking with your platoon mates, the more likely others are to come to your aid, cover you when you've got a long reload time while separated from your platoon mates, and have artillery smack that pesky AT15 or Tortoise or Jagdpanzer E100 you're bouncing off because of Russian accuracy. 

*Just about everyone* seems to click the "requesting fire on DouchebagusMaximus3 over here", even if they're driving a tier 10 heavy with an autoloader and it's a tier 6 light tank zipping across the front of the campers. Actually saying "Hey, can someone put a shot into this asshole in the T32 at B6 for me? I can keep him tracked, but I can't get out of this position to flank him without getting killed" will actually result in one or two team-minded players turning their turrets and shooting your tormenter in the side of the turret, thus improving your overall platoon play and the chances of your team winning. 

Way too many platoons are in party chat, and especially when it's an arty platoon and they can't communicate with anything other than the comm menu, it's just sooo damned much easier to *talk* to people, even if they don't have a mic and can't talk back. 

I'm on a bit of a mission to get people in platoons to get out of party chat and into game chat for exactly these reasons, but I get way too many responses like "the rest of the team is gonna suck anyway, so why should we bother?" which just makes the chance of winning the match smaller, and decreases overall survivability of almost everyone. 

Now if only we can get people in bottom tier heavies to stop camping or committing suicide "because I can't do anything and I'm just gonna die anyway" and play like a "big slow medium", get under cover, and spot and keep the guys they can't pen tracked for those who *can* pen them. :)Cool. That's good to hear. Yeah, "metric" means "anything where your tool kit will be in metric numbers, rather than SAE" if you want a useful definition (made it up but that works). Don't consider Victory a metric, nor Indian, but I don't like either brand, with the single exception of the Victory Klingon Battlecruiser III touring bike (my name for the Victory Vision), which is a fucking gorgeous machine an is really well designed and built. If I ever buy a touring bike that's not a Harley, that'll be the one. Now if only I can figure out where I hid my tricorder in the luggage compartments.

I think the metric cruisers, as I laid out in the first response, are a bad compromise of trying to look like a Harley without directly copying it, and not caring or understanding or even intentionally avoiding the single thing about Harleys that makes them *feel* so fucking wonderful to ride- the engine design. I've test ridden all kinds of metric cruisers (all used) for friends and clients looking to get into a low-budget first bike, and I've never once ridden one that didn't feel awkward in a way that was clearly attributable to their attempt to copy Harley's styling, without actually accomplishing what 100 years of evolution has accomplished with the Harley. 

No one woke up one morning and said "Hey, let's build a Road Glide exactly the way it is with the 2016 models" because the chassis and styling can be directly traced to the 1980 FLT, with 35 years of refinement and reengineering to get where they are today, and the engine, while completely reengineered, retains the original common-crankpin 45 degree V of the first Harley twins 100 years ago. The Sportsters are even more linear to the 1950s, although the 1979 XLCH is the most closely related chassis of old, even though the motor design goes back to the 1930s R Model 45 with 4 cams and a 750cc displacement, which became the W model, which was then mated to a transmission in 1952 to compete with the British TT bikes, which was given overhead valves in 1957, and other than displacement increases from 750 to 900 to 1000ccs, was relatively unchanged until 1979 except for the electric start as an option in 1970. 

Sitting down and designing a Honda Shadow or a Suzuki Intruder or a Kawasaki Vulcan should have originally produced a much better looking, better performing, better handling, more ergonomically complete bike than they did. Too much effort spent on copying styling cues, and not enough time spent on understanding *why* those cues are what they are. 

Fast forward 20 years later, and the new Vulcan looks great, but handles like a truck. The other metric cruisers have evolved as they should have, but the evolution of their styling cues has still failed to understand why Harleys looked the way they did, like the Honda Shadow [VT line](http://www.motorcyclespecs.co.za/Gallery/Honda%20VT750C2%2097%20%202.jpg)Get em used off eBay from someone who swapped a different bike to forwards. I think the primary cover is the same. Yes, they get weak and/or rot with age. They're not high pressure, but they do need to be of good integrity. Yes, you can get hose by the foot at Kragen (now O'Reilly's) Auto, and fuel line is OK, but I'd use oil/power-steering hose if it's available. It also helps to get new hose clamps in the right size, and you want to get 5/16" hose if the fittings/nipples on the oil pump are 5/16", 3/8" if the fittings have 3/8" nipples on them. Believe it or not, you can also order the rigid oil lines for that which will have all the original bends in them (like the new Breakout's oil lines), at J&amp;P Cycles online. 

You can also order made-to-fit oil lines from Russel's, Drag Specialties, and others through J&amp;P probably that have properly swaged fittings on each end and thread right in without any hose clamps. I have the rubber lines with hose clamps on my Evo FXR, but when I do eventually replace them, they're getting braided stainless with the correct fittings.Usually oil lines get damaged by hose clamps, exacerbated by using too big a line on a smaller nipple with the hose clamp cutting into the outside layer. They also crack where they're bent/pinched, and can rot in direct sunlight. 

I'd get the braded stainless oil lines from Drag or whoever, and a roll of teflon tape for the threads on the fittings. You may need different fittings at your oil pump, crankcase vent, and oil tank, but it's the bulletproof, good looking way to replace the oil lines. Make sure when you route the lines that there's no kinks in the line, whether or not you use braided steel, and also that they're not snug against any sharpish edges. The last thing you want is to have a bolt or bracket rub through an oil line and eventually allow oil out on the freeway at 70mph. Stopping becomes "front brake only" real quick and downshifting can cause you to dump your bike. Not to mention the pain in the ass cleanup. 

Let us know how things turn out?&gt; and generally "metric" cruisers are head and shoulders above Harley's.

Again, that's subjective, and depends entirely on wanting something other than what Harleys provide that no other bike does. What are you riding now? Street? Sportster? 

Generally anywhere you find people calling Harleys junk it's people who have never once ridden one. And again, there's the whole "what do you want from a bike?" thing. If you want a motorcycle that looks a certain way and you don't care about a) doing your own service, b) how it *feels*, and c) what it sounds like, a metric may well be the way to go. But if you want a visceral, emotional feedback from the bike, even at 30mph, there's only one cruiser out there that even comes close to a Harley, and that's a Victory. 

My mother in law is on her third Vulcan in 15 years. She has money so she doesn't work and spends several weeks each month going from state to state on her Vulcan, always under the speed limit (I will *never* ride with that woman ever again, and my wife apologized the first and only time we did, because she'd forgotten how annoying her mother was on a bike). She loves it. I rode her newest one two years ago and it was hugely disappointing. I expected a 1.8 liter Kawasaki engine to be a monster, but it didn't perform any better than my Road King (this is what I referred to in a previous comment about dumbing down their tech and building an underpowered bike). I couldn't get off the thing fast enough as it had none of the personality that the Road King or Softail Deluxe has, despite being in technically the same class of bike. And when I say personality, and use words like visceral and emotional feedback, I'm not talking about appearance or how it feels to own a bike you've dreamed about all your life (or for three weeks). I'm talking about the feedback loop the bike has with the rider through the handlebars, seat, footboards/pegs, and not unimportantly, the ears. 

No Japanese cruiser will ever sound like a Harley, no matter how hard they try to make them look like a Harley, and that's because the cylinders on the metric V-twins fire on an even rotation "thump thump thump thump", riding on separate crank journals on a conventional crankshaft while the Harley Big Twin and Sportster engines fire at 315 and 405 degrees (360-45 and 360+45) of rotation "thump thump... thump thump..." on a common crankpin wedged between two heavy flywheels. This sounds like a bunch of inconsequential excuse making for why Harleys aren't as smooth, but in reality it's why Harleys have the feedback look that the metrics will never have until and unless they completely redesign their engines, which they have no reason to do. 

For your asshole friends who call your bike junk, look up Consumer Reports' satisfaction and reliability numbers for motorcycle manufacturers. Harley owners are generally more satisfied than most other manufacturers' customers, and they're considered more reliable than even BMW and Ducati (and the rest of Italian "pasta rockets"). When you have time, PM me about what's going on with the bike and I'll see if I don't have any neato unconventional solutions for things (like the rigid oil lines) or insight to how to maintain reliability in a bike that old. When I have time I'll get back to you. One of his better movies and one of my favorites. No Fat Bob in 2005. If it was a different Dyna model, it's a 5 speed instead of 6, 88" instead of 103", different wheels, and probably carburetor on the 2005 and definitely EFI on the 2015. Yer killin me. Fucking priceless.Wow. I'm just here for the comments. He's been an outlaw probably longer than you have been alive. :-) and you are really fucking wrong about that. If you weren't there in the eighties you don't know what you're talking about. About 65% of parts on new bikes are sourced offshore./u/harleydoctor might know. Which codes did it throw?2008 is a 96" 6 speed EFI bike and I'd you can get one with under 20K miles on it for $6500-$7000 you're doing ok. Any more than $7000 and it's hopefully from a dealer with at least a 90 day warranty, New tires, and a recent full service. 

Read the "Buying a Used Harley?" Link in the sidebar or in the Wiki.Drone. Do a YouTube search for "racing drones" and your mind will be blown. Looks interesting. Loaded it and logged in. Crashed in 5 minutes. Would seem to allow me to "reply" (small curved arrow) on any but OP's original post. Why do some comments have the arrow and others don't? Am I really unable to reply to comments other than OP's? The sub I was looking at is one I'm a mod on. Couldn't figure out how to do anything modish I'd normally do in reddit is fun. 

Thought you'd appreciate the heads up and maybe I'm doing it wrong.Wouldn't want cars running efficiently and burning less fuel and end up destroying Oklahoma's economy now, would ya?I'm pretty where I'm at, too. :-)Good to hear. Glad I could help. Way too many people who have never sat on a Harley go on about how they're junk. This changes ok once they've actually ridden one, but it's a catch 22 for many people. But the reasons Harleys aren't as fast per displacement as overhead cam motors is exactly why we love em- that inefficiency is translated into sound, vibration that *welcome*, and torque on the low end. Nothing else has the same feel. Ah.Aside from the reasons already mentioned, let's not forget that in the American, British, and French zones the population was busy being thankful they weren't in the Russian zone, and likely didn't want to give Stalin any excuse to insist on "helping" the other allies with putting down a German insurgency, on top of the other, already mentioned reasons. They knew what had happened to civilian populations when the Red Army came through the east on their way to Berlin, the fall of Leipzig, and "the rape of Dresden".

In the Russian zone, people who remained (after the headlong flight of millions to American lines) were pretty much cowed into compliance with the Soviet occupation, having suffered the Red Army's advance through the east, and the first months of the "armies of the steppes" in the eastern regions of Germany were horrific for what remained of the German population. 

German POWs had been sent to labor camps in Russia (and mostly died there), leaving the remaining families unwilling to do anything that might diminish what little hope they had of seeing their men again. Few enough men of military age, those most likely to fight an insurgency, were around to do such things in the first years after the war in the Russian zone in any event, and most women and old men able to work had been conscripted into labor forces clearing rubble and operating what industries remained.

Look to Isaac Deutscher's article "East of the Elbe" in *The Economist* October 27, 1945 pp591-592 :-)I LIKE my Brembo brakes, my Showa forks, amd.my NGK spark plugs. Don't care where the parts come from. Don't ride and own Harleys because they're American made, I ride em because they're Harleys and no other bike built since 1952 feels like one or looks like one. 

The new Indian Chief looks too much like someone tried and failed to make it look like a 1952 flathead Chief in a sprung rigid frame, which is what they did. But the Softail Deluxe looks as much like an early 50s Panhead as a modern bike can look, and my Road King looks as much like a late 60s Shovelhead as a modern FL can, but with better styling and engineering, and considerably better reliability.

I'm a former Marine and I was born and raised in the US, but I would love my Road King and my FXR and my Panheads and my Shovelheads if they were built in Russia... so long as they were built exactly the same way they were built. But they aren't and weren't built anywhere else, even if many of the parts were sourced elsewhere.

I am happy that it is an American brand if for no other reason than it would be sad to see the brand that was so iconic in creating the idea of motorcycling no longer made where the lifestyle was born, but that's not because of some patriotic fervor. It's purely romantic. And there's nothing wrong with that, in fact it is part of the romance that is Harley Davidson. Not romance in the sense of supermarket fuck novels, but romance in the classical literature sense.

But it's still funny to see people talk about their Harleys as through they're the last bastion of American manufacturing. :-)Couldn't find the comments menu, and wasn't offered a crash report. I may not have been looking in the right place, but the reply arrow below OP's post and comments looked obvious, the arrows just weren't present under most of the comments.I think the Red Army's behavior in the east is pretty well established and there's nothing politically sensitive about it, whatever the source. Nope. Guilding menu on tap and hold. No reply option, and crashed again when looking to see if your instructions brought different results (this time got a report option). Gonna try dumping it and reinstalling it. Will update. .Short answer, no, with a few exceptions. There are a few folks, generally in MCs or folks who own old school choppers built for showing rather than riding who go in for that, but the bikes today don't lend themselves to engraving except on very few parts (like the derby cover and what used to be called the points cover on the cam cover, and most people opt for CNC graphics when they do.

Gun people are more likely to be your market.Are you suggesting that anything else in my comment was inaccurate?cams and headwork will give you the most bang for your buck, but there's an old saying "there's no replacement for displacement". You can get big bore kits from mot aftermarket vendors, from Harley, and from ebay. Hell, you can find them on Amazon. How can we tell you're Canadian? You'd be happy deleting your post.  :) Where in Ontario are you? 

As a new rider, I'd suggest buying a used bike for your first, since a) it's not nearly as expensive, b) you don't feel quite so bad if you fall over, and c) you have a lot more options to choose from.

Don't know what Canada's attitude is about buying bikes in the US and bringing them north, but prices in Canada, even near the US border are considerably higher than here in the States. There's just not as many bikes available and the "used Harley market is FLOODED" bit doesn't really hold for Canada, so I'd recommend going through Canada's process for importing a bike, then purchase one in the US and save a lot of money. Even buying a used bike from an US dealer may be less expensive than a private sale in Canada, despite the fact that dealers in the US routinely charge 20-30% more for a used bike than a private seller might. 

There are two relevant websites - [how to import a bike purchased in the US](http://www.thethinkbox.ca/2012/01/13/step-by-step-how-to-import-a-motorcycle-from-the-usa-into-canada/) and [what a bike needs to be allowed into Canada](http://www.tc.gc.ca/motorvehiclesafety/safevehicles/importation/usa/vafus/list2/Section8_0.htm) (scroll down to Harley Davidson).

It doesn't look that hard to buy a bike and bring it north, but it does look like it's gonna have to meet Canadian exhaust noise, lighting, and speedometer standards (you can purchase a Canadian km speedometer).I tapped the middle of the comment, not the 3 dot menu. I wish I could hand you my phone. Uninstalled it and reinstalled it. Crashes every time I touch a comment now (with sorting at "new"). Not touching anything remotely near the menu, just tapping the middle of the comment text once or tap and hold in the middle of the comment. No difference "Slide has crashed" with the unhappy yellow blob face. Older... checking. wow. Way older. 4.4.2. Let me update that and I'll get back to you. Time flies.Me too obviously, but it was the other guy's comments that got my attention. "They're called 1%ers" or whatever. Wow. That's fucking priceless. My little brother is a hedge fund guy on Wall Street. I should get him one, maybe with the extra decimal point for he 0.1% that he belongs to. On a positive note, when I'm too old to ride and too broken to work (spine injury, hips need replacing, etc.), I don't have to worry about sleeping in an alley... on purpose, anyway.Ya know, I never once put the patch on anything I owned. Lived the solo outlaw life for 18-20 years, but I've never felt the need to sew a diamond patch on anything. It always seemed like advertising to the cops for trouble.There were a couple clubs in California in the 80s and 90s that wore their region/state on the inside front of their cutoff in a short rocker to avoid issues with the 81 and others. Always thought "what's the point? Either they see it or they don't. If they see it, there's gonna be trouble. If they don't, you're being kinda weak." I guess they felt daring or something but not really.Why? So OP can have upper back problems? Elbows are barely bent as it is, and this is as close as OP can get to optimal riding posture without pulling the bars *closer*. ANY day you can ride is a good day. 

And good for you for having your bars where you can have decent riding posture. The forward controls probably don't help with potholes and such, but you've got the rest of the bike set up for good riding position. I test rode every bike I looked at but one in July and August, and the one I didn't treat ride was over a thousand miles away. Don't buy any bike you don't ride first. I would bring riding gear with me and touch my car keys to the guy that owns the bike and say let me take it for a ride. If you have a motorcycle endorsement on your license and they actually want to sell the motorcycle there is no reason not to let you ride it.

That said, the 883 is good for city riding, and even with a 12:50 kit on it, the gearing is still likely to be set up for city riding. The 1200 is geared for multi purpose riding, and don't worry about the engine size. It's not nearly as fast as a 600 cc overhead cam inline 4. It's a different engine entirely so don't let engine size scare you.

Go to the side bar or the wiki tab and read the information about buying a used motorcycle, and also read about buying a motorcycle that doesn't have complete service records. No Sportster built before 2006 should cost more than $3,500 if you are in the US, and most of them can be had for between $2500 and $3,000.No, they haven't, but your legs can. At least put mid pegs on there so you can stand off the seat for the really bad ones. I broke two vertebrae and herniated 4 discs hitting a pothole at 80mph with forwards. Buy used. Don't spend upwards of $10K on a new bike if you don't even know you're gonna like the 883. There's also "buying a used Harley?" on the sidebar/wiki that is absolutely essential in not getting ripped off in buying a used bike. Buy used because you won't be upset if you fall over nearly as much, besides, you can find a reasonably low-miles 883 from the mid-2000s for $2500-3000. Pay no more than this for a 10 year old 883 EVER. 

The 883 is a city bike that will go on the freeway but isn't designed as a freeway bike. The 1200 is a multi-purpose bike that's geared for the freeway and works great in the city. Go to the dealer and sit on each of the different models, and take an 883 and a 1200 for a test ride, and don't tell them you're buying a used bike. Just let them try to sell you a new one, but use that opportunity to figure out what feels right. If your legs are too short to flat foot a particular model, do not freak out. There are seats that put you and inch lower for a couple hundred bucks, and you can always buy rear shocks that are another inch or two lower for another few hundred bucks, and you'll be fine. Don't let them talk you into buying the Something or other Low model new. They've pretty much just put shorter shocks on it and shorter fork tubes on a standard model and called it something new, anyway. 

Talk to us before you buy a bike. We may see something you don't that's not mentioned in the ad that makes a bike NOT the bike you wanna buy. 

There's a lot of books listed in that "for new riders" link. Buy a couple of them, especially "Proficient Motorcycling" or whatever it's called. Read them from cover to cover and re-read things as they come up every week until it's second nature.

Once you've taken the class and got your license, *make sure you test ride any bike you're going to buy*. The "seat of the pants test" is going to tell you more about a used bike than looking at it will. If something feels wrong, it probably is.

Never EVER presume that any car sees you, including the one right next to you, the one right behind you, or the one right in front of you. Most people aren't fucking paying attention beyond some vague sense of whether or not there's a large mass in the lane blocking their vision. 

Check your mirrors regularly. Whether you're sitting at a light or on the freeway, cars behind you may not know you're there. On the rare occasion you see the car in your mirror coming and not slowing down, you will be aware of things in enough time to change lanes quickly.  

[Read this](https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/1rocz6/the_first_of_several_long_posts_containing/) and all the comments.

[Read this](https://www.reddit.com/user/silverfox762/submitted/#page=2) and all the comments. Some of it may not apply to you, but some of it will be very important.

Once you've got used to riding your bike, [read this and all the comments](https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/2f0hrb/my_thoughts_about_engine_rpm_and_how_lugging_your/). Engine rpms matter in motor longevity and how much control you have over your motorcycle. If your bike doesn't have a tachometer, know that it's redlines at around 5500rpm and you will feel like shifting somewhere between 2500 and 3000rpm when you're taking it easy. Once you get to know your bike, you'll want to keep your motor around 3000-3500rpm to keep have the engine available as a tool to get out of trouble when some idiot changes lanes.

Seriously consider buying a removable windshield. Worrying about rocks and bugs and the shit cars toss up can wait until you're an experienced rider. Every little bit helps when you're learning.

Put 100% of your attention on riding with your "head on a swivel" (well, eyes, anyway), bouncing off every vehicle that might be a threat and anticipating what morons are likely to do if they don't know you're there. Every driveway, every parked car, every side street, and *every fucking car coming towards you* will potentially pull out in front of you at exactly the worst moment possible. There's time enough for sightseeing when you're out of town and on rural highways. **Drive like 99% of the cars on the road don't see you and the other 1% are fucking AIMING**. I ride like every single car around me is going to do the stupidest thing possible at exactly the worst time possible. This way, I'm pleasantly surprised when they don't, and I'm prepared when they do. 

Be aware of how many miles you can go on a tank of gas and always know how many miles you have left before you *must* stop for gas. If your bike has a gas gauge (883 doesn't), they're notoriously inaccurate. Do the math based on your trip odometer every time you fill up, know how many gallons your tank takes, and figure based on your proven gas mileage. 

Also, do NOT let anyone give you shit about being a gal on a Harley. Anyone with a problem with is has a tiny dick and has no business talking to women anyway.

Ride safe Pengcoon. Welcome to the tribe. We'll be here for ya. You might have ridden a relatively new used bike they had for sale that someone had them put a 110 motor in, or one someone blew up under warranty and they had a 110 that someone never paid for so they put it in the warranty bike.Forward controls make for that posture. Mids would fix that perfectly.That is exactly the symptom of a gummed up speed sensor on the top your transmission. It is under your starter motor so there will be some surgery to replace it or clean it, but tiny metallic shavings from the transmission end up sticking to it because it is a magnet. I have had exactly that symptom before and it required pulling the starter motor and the exhaust to replace or clean the speed sensor. It is always possible your speedometer is going bad, but I would check the speed sensor first.

The first time it happened I just had to wipe off the fuzz that was stuck to it. The second time it happened 60,000 miles later I replaced the sensor. Read the sidebar link about installing a 2 into 1 exhaust for instructions on how to reinstall your muffler pipe correctly, even if you have dual exhaust.

If it just needs cleaning, it will cost you 15 bucks for a pair of exhaust seals and a couple of bucks for a bottle or tube of anti seize compound.:-) I was at work all day tattooing a pretty gal. Playing with crayons and smearing Vaseline on pretty girls is almost as much fun as riding. It's really close if they actually cry.You plan in being One of Us. No sweat. After you've been around a while, you'll see that I like to write and type really fast. :-) I write a lot of long comment replies because, well, I have a lot of downtime at work and in the evenings. I akso have a bit of knowledge about the older bikes. 

That said, watch all 94 minutes of that movie *before* taking the class. Hell, do it today. Even of it mostly doesn't make sense, or much sense, you WILL learn some important stuff, and I'll bet you a buck you'll be blown away by how many of your friends are way the fuck off base with the advice they've given you about how to steer your bike in corners. 

Learning how and when to brake, and as importantly, when NOT to brake, is as important as any single factor in riding other than how to take your bike into and out of a corner.

You'll have a great understanding of some of the stuff in the class when you get there, more of the class will make better sense, and you will get more out of it than the other students. The things in the film and in the class will save your life. The stuff in the movie will also exponentially increase the enjoyment you get out of your bike because you'll have a level of knowledge and confidence that only comes from really understanding what's going on underneath you in turns and when braking, and that will allow you to make the right decisions when it matters most.

I know this sounds like overkill, but watch it now, once again the night before your class, then watch it one more time right before you get on your bike the first time. You'll be amazed at how much it makes a difference in your first *week* of riding. 

I've been on Harleys for 33 years with close to half a million motorcycle miles under my belt and I've done it without putting a motorcycle on the ground. That's a statistical anomaly and most people say things like "... not IF you lay tour bike down, but WHEN you lay it down, but it doesn't have to be that way, who knows, those numbers can be you in 33 years too. I watch that movie at least once each year, and there's always some incident I had happen recently that the film either helped me with or that allows me to identify what I could have done better.

Something like 70% of the "single vehicle" wrecks for motorcycles (wrecks where no other vehicle contributed to the crash) happen in the first six months of riding, The more info and foundation skills you have the day you first get on your bike, the less likely you are to ever become a statistic.

I'm putting a lot of emphasis on people not seeing you because the vast majority of drivers out there are NOT paying attention to you, and waaaay too many of them just plain won't see you because their cell phone is blocking their vision, they're fucking with their GPS, or driving under the influence of children. Every bit of riding skill you develop early gives you that much more of an advantage over trhe assholes, and will make ya better rider than most. other people on motorcycles. 

Please check in with this sub regularly. You'll learn a lot that might surprise you because we have a good crew here and some really smart people, too. Run any craigslist ads you might be interested by ymus and we'll give you the straight dope on whether or not something is a good deal.

Ride safe.Probably pick up my slack. I just love to write, type really fast, and learned how important good communication is at an early age. 

I was lucky enough to have a couple of old bikers take me under their wings 33 years ago and teach me everything they could about life, wrenching on bikes, riding, staying alive on the road, and enjoying life on two wheels. This is just me doing what little bit I can to give something back and hopefully live up to the incredible gift they gave me. Without them I never would have found half the happiness in life that I have, and I wouldn't be the man I am today.

I complained once to my last wife that "nobody these days seems to be teaching anyone the important shit I was taught". She said "maybe it's because you're supposed to be teaching them". This sub has given me a bit of that opportunity.

Hopefully the things I write here help someone the way they've helped me. If just one of the things I write saves one rider's life, once, I'll never have done anything else as important in life. If the stuff I ramble on about life, bikes, and riding helps one rider enjoy his or her bike as much as I enjoy mine and if someone, someday passes some of my ramblings on, then the stuff I was taught wasn't wasted and the cycle continues. Sure thing... I think. I'm good with the rum if you come to the Sam Francisco area. Not sure what you mean by "spin them".

What part of the world are you in?Well, barring unforseen circumstances, I'll be in California and happy to help you map the ride, and even ride with you across California as far as the Sierra Nevada mountains.

If you're planning on buying a bike  on the west coast and riding east and sellling it there, outside of the San Francisco area by 100 miles or more will save you a lot of money. Everything here is more expensive due to all the tech money.They a weigh the same when they're moving. Training your passenger is helps, too. I'd you wanna ride with a passenger, avoid the 883. Not suited for riding 2-up.You would think so. My bike didn't show a code the second time it did this. The only other possibility is the plug for the speed senso, 6" from the sensor itself. Would cause the same symptom. 

So, either the speedo is going bad and is a $400 replacement for the Harley part with the correct mileage put on the new odometer to find out, or someone who's a decent mechanic can find out for the cost of two exhaust seals and a bottle of NeverSeez. The other comment is exactly the advice I'd offer. 

What kind of sludge do you mean is it metallic filled sludge or even putty-like stuff or just extra thick oil? If it's the metallic filled slidge, I'd begin to worry about whether or not there was ever an oil change done or if something was throwing off metal shavings inside the engine.

Also, either reuse the dirty oil filter after draining it of old oil and reinstalling it when you do the flush fill (not recommend, but acceptable), or buy a couple filters and replace the filter each time you drain the oil while flushing it. They should be about $10 apiece so its not too much $$ do do this. 

You might do a YouTube search for "Harley 5 quart oil change" and do this if you can make it work on your bike.Yup, ABS is a life saver for many riders, especially new riders. I've never had it on a bile, but there's zero question that it's worth every dime. Sorry Double D. No racial slurs allowed. Comment removed. Nothing personal, but we have Asian redditors subbed here and even if we didn't, it's the 21st century and we can say all kinds of things without insulting 1/4 of the earth's population.The previous comment before yours was removed. No racial slurs allowed. I removed it as soon as I saw it. Someone wirh the username that includes "38DD" is probably not a "he"And sadly, the "pregnant 13 year old in Asia" is actually pretty accurate for much of the manufacturing in the eastern hemisphere. The bike was *assembled* in a union shop..."  FTFY.Nope. Not the street. I'm sure you can put a passenger on one and ride it on the freeway, but it's the entry level bike, it's really small, and there's really not a used market yet since they're so new, so you'll be spending more money that you need to unless you are insisting on a brand new bike. Are you planning on buying new or used? 

There are literally thousands of used Harleys for sale  in the US with less than 10,000 miles on them, and any bike with less than 15,000 miles can be considered "like new" if it's been maintained properly. After 20,000 miles, they've still only had 4 oil changes in their lives, but why bother when you can find a bike with half that number of miles on it for the same money? Harley has sold almost 2 million motorcycles in the last 15 years, and most of those went to people who "want a Harley" but never got into riding much or had a close call and got scared off, or decided their hair style was more important than riding, so there's a shitload of bikes out there for less than half the price of new that are still in like-new condition, even if they're 10 or 15 years old. $13,000 1200C Sportsters sell for $3500 when they're 10 years old, even if they have less than 10,000 miles on them. $15,000 Dynas sell for $5,000 or so when they're ten years old, again many many with under 10,000-15,000 miles on them. If you maintain a Harley correctly, and get the complete "every 5000 miles" service done properly and replace anything that gives you less than perfect performance on the bike, you can expect to get 100,000 miles out of a Harley... most of the time. 

Either way, I'd look into a "slightly used but 10 years older" 1200C Sportster first for cost savings ($3000 for an early-mid2000s, $3500-4500 for a mid-late2000s). You're a rookie and it doesn't make sense to spend a shitload of money on a bike without even knowing whether or not you like riding.

The 1200C Sportster is a tiny bit better suited for 2 up riding, simply because of the engine size, but if you decide it's not the right bike, the next step would be to look at the Dyna product line for riding with a passenger. Bigger than the Sportster, but heavier and definitely more stable on the freeway and a great purpose-built bike for 2-up riding and with a windshield and saddlebags, people use them for touring all the time. A lot of the big MC club guys ride Dynas and those guys put between 20,000 and 30,000 miles on their bikes *every single year*!!! 

You might also look into the Softail product line, but they tend to cost a bit more than the Dynas and they don't handle as well by any stretch of the imagination, and the ride is not as cushy as the Dyna because the rear suspension is a compromise between style and function, with the emphasis on style. The seat height on the Softail is considerably lower than the other bikes, and many many short stature riders love em for exactly that reason. If you buy an older one in great shape, you can usually find one from the late 90s or early 2000s with relatively low miles for about $5000. They're more in demand in most of the country than Dynas, mostly because people who aren't cool want to look cool, so they're a bit more expensive than a Dyna of the same vintage and condition, typically.  

The thing about the Softail is its frame was a compromise between the looks of the old rigid frame bikes bikers everywhere were riding and offering *some* rear suspension which the rigid frame choppers we were riding in the 80s didn't have. This is the bike that caused old-school bikers to actually consider buying a new bike when Harley introduced it in 1984. No Softail is going to have as much rear suspension as a Dyna or Sportster, but unless you live somewhere that the roads are fucked up and don't plan on taking it into the hills much, people everywhere love their Softails. You sit lower and there's a lower center of gravity, and they fucking look awesome. You probably don't weigh a whole lot, so the rear suspension isn't likely to be as much of an issue to you as it would to me at 275lbs. It may just be exactly the bike for you. Go take a Softail for a test ride when you get your license. They sell a product called the Lo or Super Lo, and the Slim, and these are market towards shorter folks, but again, unless you're insisting on buying new, you don't need that since the stock Softail sits really low anyway and you can always lower another Softail model an inch easily. If, however, you're buying a new bike because, well, I've done it and so have 2 million people since 2005, the Softail Slim may be the way to go- it sits low to the ground (handles badly, but oh well, compromise, right?) and is relatively inexpensive as far as Softail models go.  

The Sportster isn't really a great bike for riding 2-up, but that's thinking in terms of the typical total weight of an adult male rider and passenger. People ride Sportsters with passengers all the time, and many love it, but they usually end up moving to a bigger bike in short order, just because the other bikes are better suited for it, not because the Sportster is junk. Not because they need to, but because the bigger bikes are that much better suited for 2-up riding and long distance stuff, while still being perfectly good for city riding and commuting. 

The Dyna and Softail will be considerably more comfortable for you, with or without a passenger, but that's not to say the Sportster 1200 is a bad bike. It's not. It's just not the *best* suited bike Harley sells for multi-purpose riding (city and highway and touring), but it is much lighter than the others by about 100lbs, and you can always buy a used 1200C, ride it for a year and sell it for about what you paid for it if you get an early 2000s bike for about $3000. If you don't abuse it or wreck it, you can probably sell a 1200 a year later for the same money, and hell, if you gotta take a couple hundred buck hit, that's a cheap lease for a year.

Unless you absolutely want a new bike and money is no object to you, there's really no reason to buy new for your first bike since a) the used bike market for Harleys is fucking *flooded* and you'll never get close to your money out of it if you try to sell it even six months later. By the time a used Harley is a year old, it's listed value is high enough that people want dealer support and a bike no one else has touched if they're gonna spend that much money, and that makes selling an almost new Harley for a reasonable price one of the most frustrating experiences you'll encounter without anything really going wrong in your life. Besides, since it's your first bike, you don't even know what you like in a motorcycle and you can find a perfectly good, low-miles, like-new early-mid2000s 1200C for $3000-3500 and a similarly low-miles, like-new early-mid2000s Dyna for $5000-5500 in any city in the US except San Francisco where people think Dynas come with their seats stuffed with $100 bills. 

The street is even more of a solo/city bike than the 883. You're tiny, so the 1200C Sportster will be adequate for your needs, but it's not really built for touring if that's in your plans. One last thing- don't be scared off by engine size of the 1200. The displacement of Harley engines does not mean the same kind of power the same size engine in a sport bike would have. They're completely different engineering designs, and a 1200C Sportster isn't going to be as fast as a Yamaha R6 600cc sport bike. I figured, hence my good manners.Butters is bike-curious. But then again, the automoderator removed your comment for containing a slur, as it has been programmed to, and even though I know you didn't mean it that way, I'm gonna leave it off because anyone who doesn't know the South Park reference (and I'm always surprised by how many don't) will take it the wrong way. Didn't you see the comment about the adaptive fuel valve? Take it to the dealer and ask them to reset it. They'd just need to reflash the ECM. Damn, I never get more than about 6500 out of a rear and 10,000-11,000 out of a front Dunlop on my Road King. It's a heavier bike, but seriously, 13,300 on a set of Dunlops means a serious change in riding style or Dunlop finally change their tire compound due to customer complaints. Let us know about the Michelins after a while? I'm curious. Got the Metzelers on both bikes right now and lovin em and expect more miles than the Dunlops by a large margin. Still would love to hear about the Commander IIs. Yeah, sounds like a great deal. And yeah, fuck shiny. Who needs cars having a better chance of seeing you on the road... :)Do you know what filtration level the 3330 has in microns size of the filter? Twin cams call for a different filter level than Evos call for a different level than Fords.Um.... what sensor? No pic. You have to post the image to some place online like Imgur.com, then link to the photo. Wow, how the fuck did I miss your username 5 months ago. That's fucking hilarious. So fucking what?!?! I own a Toyota but I don't go on about people who have ipods hooked up to their stereos and Bluetooth earpieces. Does anyone else hate stereotypical Toyota drivers? They're so fucking pretentious. And those black people with their BBQs and liking grits. God, that's annoying. I'm not like that, but I think I need to talk about other people who are.

Get over yourself and ride YOUR ride and stop worrying about what other people do. Who fucking cares what other people do. You're not a "biker", like you said. Why do you give a shit about people who are?

Or do you mean you hate it when people stereotype YOU?Yours came factory with the forwards and the linkage never came through the primary cover when it was new. The pics I've seen of XL1200Ns show the linkage coming *through* the primary. I use the weather channel app and it'll tell you hour by hour for the next 18 hours what the percent chance of rain is, and if it's more than "0" I click the radar map and then "future" and it'll show where the radar is picking up rain now and where it's projected to be in an animation. It'll often project radar mass 10 miles south of my work and it's usually spot on about the radar.

But if I check it at 8am and it says 10% chance at noon, I check again at 10am an it'll have changed what chance and when.I hope so. I've been wrenching on, building, and riding Harleys almost every day since December 1982. Missed a few years in the early 2000s with a broken back, but other than that, at least one running Harley almost every day of that 33 years. hogfornoobs is *killin* it over there. I haven't laughed that much in a while. Wow. Hey there, Meggaphone! How the hell are ya? (again :) !)

How many miles on the Sporty now? You getting to ride much? I think I'm gonna write a "don't be a pussy- put on those long johns and heavy leather and go ride in the cold!" post pretty soon. It's down below 50 at night here now in Sunny California, and will probably get down to freezing before the holidays. As much as I loathe saying this, I hope we get a bunch more rain (and more importantly, snow in the Sierras), but I'll be riding all winter. If you have a Thursday or Friday off, we should head out for a ride somewhere. You haven't seen the FXR yet. Hey, just so you know, that was an 800lb bike in that video about the gal lifting the bike(!!!), but what they didnt' show was the her left hand was holding the *brake lever* on the handlebar and the throttle grip at the same time. If you don't hold the brake, you'll have the bike try to roll away sideways on you when you try to pick it up. Also, PUT THE KICKSTAND OUT BEFORE picking up a bike. Would suck to have the bike on its *other* side as soon as you've picked it up from the first side. You are quite welcome. As for family and friends not riding, consider yourself lucky. The vast majority of "advice" I've heard people give their friends and family about how to ride a motorcycle shows a shocking lack of understanding of basic motorcycle principles that you're gonna have hands-down before you've been riding a week. :)1200s have a LOT more chrome parts on them, a larger gas tank, a passenger seat typically, and different trim. Shouldn't be $5000 more, but it's substantial. She's concerned about riding with a passenger. :)For city riding, sure. But it's really limited as an open road bike. Sorry, but it's also a new model and she's looking to spend $3500-4000ish. This means 1200 Sportster or a much older Dyna.No sweat. I was someone hoping to own a Harley one day once, too. Unless you are an experienced builder with a comprehensive tool set and comprehensive engine and transmission building knowledge, it's always a good idea to start with a *running* donor bike, even if "running" doesn't necessarily mean "rideable".

Starting with a basket case with the motor in pieces is like trying to learn the skills of a bone surgeon, a heart surgeon, and a neurologist at the same time... without supervised, specialized training. Start with learning to be a bone surgeon. You'll learn a lot about the heart and neurological systems while you're at it anyway. Besides, you'll have plenty of chances to learn about that already functioning heart and nervous system without worrying about killing the patient every time you pick up a wrench.Back the master cylinder off 1/8" toward the end of the bar and retighten and see if this solves it. You ONLY changed the grips, yes? The throttle-by-wire stuff in my bike spins completely free, with no binding at all. None. Pretty sure there's not even grease inside the thing. If you have the service manual, look up the "twist grip sensor" info for removal and installation as well as the "switch housing assembly" removal and installation to see if there was some process you missed when reassembling the master cylinder housing to the bars. In my 2008 manual it's sections 4.9 and 8.29. There's all kinds of weird "be sure to install cardboard spacer when disassembling" kind of language because shit can apparently get damaged easily in some areas. Makes semse, if the grip is binding at the switch housing, you may be able to just wiggle it back a tiny bit. Well done. You also got most of the War Hero op handled with one mission.How about the some of [the best 5 minutes of film ever made](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KmhGYB4NdYc)- the last scene of Unforgiven. It includes one of the greatest lines ever delivered "Well he shoulda armed himself if he's gonna decorate his saloon with my friend" followed by one of the most realistic shootouts ever recorded in fiction- quick, deadly, uncoordinated by most folks involved, and nothing flashy.  

Edit: although yeah, the shootout in Heat in front of the bank is pretty fucking awesome. &gt;No worse than guys in shorts and vans riding the same club style bike.

SSSSsssshhhhhh! You'll scare away the half the sub. What really gets me is when I see guys in cookie-cutter MCs that didn't exist 5 or 6 years ago riding in cargo shorts and Vans. BBut there is a positive in this- dressing like that is a great way of telling serious bikers that you haven't been riding long enough to learn anything meaningful about falling down. It's how *we* know who we can scare the piss out of by scowling and saying things like "I ain't your Brother" and "who the fuck are you?" when they talk to us. :)

On a more serious note, the "club style" is really "lane splitter style", since the T-bars and quarter fairing became popular in California long before the Sons of Ikea hit the airwaves and everyone with half-decent credit bought a Dyna and decided to join an MC... or start one. Those bikes have been around for a long time before anyone called them "club style". So has the quarter fairing, but quarter fairings usually had a minimum 12" tall windshield- now T-bars and a quarter fairing have become a fashion accessory for most people with them, particularly if they live someplace lane splitting isn't allowed). 

By the way, leather is armor and chrome makes you a bit more visible to the idjuts blinded by their cell phones.

Ride safe. He's been around here a while. What people don't often get about *my* responses to shit is that they're not the only people reading it, and sometimes, even if my comments are directed specifically at a single person, trolling and getting the predicted responses can be a "learning opportunity" for folks new to the world of Harleys (and some folks not so new who forgot their thinking cap... back in their 1st grade classroom's lunchbox cubby hole).

Something that happens way too often everywhere online is that commenters forget they're talking to the whole internet, and that the responses to their comments and posts are being read by everyone who comes across it. A few of us write with those other readers in mind, and the main reason I go into so much detail about how the world/bikes/life work is that most people reading don't have a clue about context. 

But hey, I'm gonna go put on my fingerless gloves and my do-rag (do, not du, as in "hairdo") and get on my club style Dyna and.... wait. I'm gonna go put on my leather and cold weather gear and get on the FXR (which the ex-wife has named Lolita... because she's 23 years younger than me- the bike and the ex-wife) and go to work.

Ride safe. Note the tasteful barbed wire graphic along the pickup bed body detail.Hey there! I didn't know this sub existed. But then again, I live here and ride a motorcycle everywhere, so I get to see a lot of the things posted here in person. Hand made ~~Supercar~~ *Uglycar*.

FTFY :)Number 1 is a 1953-1955 Oldsmobile hubcap.:)409 Tub and Tile cleaner and a good brush works wonders. Everything else on the motor  is new stuff,from the oil  pump to the circuit breaker. There's not generator hanging off that hump, either, so it's an alternator left side case. STD, S&amp;S or someone else cases. That said, I'd love it because it's not an original Pan motor. I'm sitting here trying to figure out what fishtails would look like on an FXR....Yup. There's also no generator hanging off the hump, so it's an alternator left side case, too. It's an aftermarket motor, maybe a mutt even, but that doesn't mean it doesn't run great. New oil pump, circuit breaker, etc. Even with a security system, [GET A ROTOR LOCK](https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/3lbsrc/there_have_been_several_posts_recently_about/)More importantly, the entire USED Sportster market, no matter the model, like all used Harleys, is FLOODED. You will not get anything close to what you think your bike is worth when you go to sell it if you buy new. Save 50% and buy one 5 years old with under 5,000 miles on it. Read the "Buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar or in the wiki. It'll show you how to get the best value for a used bike. NO asking price is relevant. Only what they sell for. Good luck. To the best of my knowledge, the only controversy is among people who've a) never really listened to Zappa and b) those who know nothing about music. Good to hear. This is a Sportster fork lock from someone subbed here getting its fork lock broken in under 10 seconds. [Watch](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A6NNkPILxmw&amp;t=3m5s). Brake rotor locks are the best way to go, but a padlock on the forks is second best. Just to be sure, when was the last time you went to investigate when your neighbor's dog was barking?Actually, you're close. The final drive ratio of the *transmissions* are the same at 1:1. It's the tranny to wheel ratio that's different on the 6 speed that makes 6th gear taller than 5th on a 5 speed. 

And an 883 and 1200 have the same difference- the 883's final drive is for city driving. The 1200s is taller, allowing for more highway use. The Vrod is WAY more popular in Europe than the US. LOTS of people like the water-cooled, high-speed nature of the Vrod for European highway riding. 

But I've seen a few here in the Bay Area, they're just mostly on the Peninsula and points south since tech guys seem to be more likely to buy into the Vrod's engineering. I think most people buying 883 Irons are buying them as their first *bike*, more often than just as a first Harley after owning other bikes. They look great in photos, but if you've spent time on ANY other bike, you'll immediately realize they're tiny and not exactly fast on the freeway, not well-suited for a passenger, and generally just an around-town solo bike. And it doesn't take long with them as your first bike to realize this, either, which is why so many used ones are available, and why if you actually want to *sell* one, the only way to get anything close to your money back is to trade it in at the dealer on another bike.Welcome to the fold. Hey, I've had secular Christmases with my family for 53 years. We have a wonderful time, and lots of family gatherings and great food and great memories and not once has it had to be about religion. Have a GREAT Christmas. But think in terms of the social aspect, and the value that getting together (or not) with people you like can bring absent an excuse you don't believe. 

That's the thing though- you hit the nail right on the head with "I kind of wish he was". I suspect a huge percentage of Christians, especially the outspoken "extra" religious folks, *want* it to be True, but if you put them on a polygraph and asked "do you *really* believe it's True?", they'd fail miserably. Nothing wrong with wanting something to be True, but so much of the horrible things that come out of the mouths and pens and keyboards of people who claim to believe tells us so much more than their profession of belief. 

So have a great holiday season and have a great Christmas. Don't toss happy memories. Enjoy them, but think of them as interpersonal events, rather than events that are somehow tainted. Key fob battery. 
Didja pull codes? There's a link on the sidebar.Rent a storage locker.I'll believe corporations are people when Texas executes one.Losing a charter is not quite the same as lethal injection for the board of directors, which is what I was hoping for. NEVER leave a hydraulic lift/jack or anything else UNDER LOAD. Always relieve pressure on the hydraulic. You learn this the first day in shop class in high school. It's also on EVERY hydraulic product ever sold. If it's the ride on lift, there's steel rods you insert to allow you to remove pressure from the hydraulic once the bike is up. If it's the under-frame jack, there's the steel catch that's what the jack is supposed to sit on while you work on the bike. Instructions make this clear on every hydraulic product I've ever owned. The board has a fiduciary responsibility to shareholders to keep dividends coming and share price increasing, whether this means paying starvation wages, shipping jobs offshore, or whatever. Upper management just implements the desires of the board.
Sadly, the only qualifying required for driving high performance cars and bikes is a checkbook or credit score.Rich over at Berkeley performance cycles has a certified Harley tech on staff and usually has parts same day. Great shop. That's where I take my bikes for tires and if I wasn't my own best mechanic that's where I would be taking my bike for repairs.Start with the factory service manual and see what you're in for. It's not that hard to swap rear suspension on a Softail, but it does require a lift unless you want to be lying on the ground doing all the work. I suspect the threaded rod is broken off inside the shock. You can get really good stuff or you can get OK stuff or you can get factory "take off" stuff that people put on ebay for not much money. I'd go for the original take-off stuff if you're trying to save money. That's how I replaced the fork sliders on my Road King ($60 all in including oil, seals, bushings, etc.). You may also need to get into some tool expense. There's a link on the sidebar, but the place to start is the *factory* service manual. You can find a .pdf online easily enough. [Look brand new, not expensive](http://www.ebay.com/itm/HARLEY-DAVIDSON-GENUINE-ACCESS-05-15-SOFTAIL-REAR-STOCK-SHOCKS-/361441673659?hash=item54279a41bb:g:ibIAAOSwhcJWP6GO&amp;vxp=mtr)6th is only an overdrive on aftermarket transmissions that are built that way. The final drive ratio on *Harley* 6 speed transmissions is identical to the 5 speed, but the ratio of the transmission pulley to the rear wheel is taller on the 6 speed bikes. Might as well be an overdrive. I typically don't touch 6th below 70, but since I'm riding at 85-90 all day long here in California, I LOVE having a 6 speed on my Road King. My 5 speed FXR has a taller rear wheel pulley than stock, but it's still turning 3500 rpm at 75mph, and closer to 4000 at 85. Not good for gas mileage.That would be a bike jack, rather than a lift. Workable, but annoying for rear suspension work. Get the manual and see what's involved. Otherwise, bite the bullet and pay someone. Working on a bike in an apartment garage is going to be annoying at best. 

It's a common misconception. 6th on a 6 speed is taller than 5th on a 5 speed. My '69 Shovel had a 24 tooth tranny sprocket to make freeway riding more fuel-efficient at speed.  Nope, the final *transmission* ratio is 1:1 on both. The final *drive* ratio is different between the transmission pulley and the rear wheel pulley.The methanol will help, but honestly, unless you got a LOT of water in there, you're likely not to notice just riding it out. Throw in the alcohol and slosh it around then ride it. Can't really hurt anything, but if there's a LOT of water in there, 100ml methanol isn't going to absorb very much. Make sure you use PURE methanol. 80% methanol already has 20% water in it. He did say "chaos", not "changes". Let's not get too excited yet.Seriously?  In case you're not trolling, I'll spell it out for you, but at this point mostly for others reading. "Final drive ratio" isn't the transmission gearing ratio, it's the ratio of transmission *pulley* to rear wheel *pulley*. The transmission drive ratios, which is 1:1 on BOTH 5 and 6 speed *Harley* trannies *in top gear* (meaning for every rotation of the main/input shaft driven by the clutch hub, the final drive gear /output gear you put the transmission drive pulley on rotates exactly once on both 5 and 6 speed transmissions in top gear). If you bolt a Harley 6 speed into a bike that came stock with a 5 speed, using the same clutch hub, transmission pulley, and rear wheel pulley you'll have the same engine rpm on the freeway in 6th as you would have in 5th, with an extra shifting point. 

**TL,DR:** *Final drive ratio* has nothing to do with transmissions, except in that you choose a different final drive ratio based on how tall 1st gear is and how fast you want your engine turning on the freeway. It's the transmission pulley to rear wheel pulley ratio and has nothing to do with transmission gear ratios.

For comparison I'll talk about touring bikes, but the Dynas had similar changes, although different final drive ratios. From 2002-2006, 5 speed touring bikes had a 3.15:1 final drive ratio (32/70 tooth pulleys). From 2007 on ALL touring bikes had a final drive ratios of 2.79:1 with 6 speed trannies (32/66 tooth pulleys). The reason why 6th on a 2008 Road King (2.79:1) is so much taller than 5th on a 2005 Road King (3.15:1), is because the *rear wheel pulley* on the 6 speed bike has *four fewer teeth*, and has NOTHING to do with 6th gear being taller than 5th gear. So discussing 5 speed *bikes* and 6 speed *bikes* is not talking about transmission ratios, which are ALL 1:1 in top gear.

If you put a 66 tooth rear wheel pulley on a 5 speed touring bike from 2002-2006 (you need a shorter belt, too) you get the exact same 2.79:1 final drive ratio as the later bikes, and will turn the SAME engine rpm at the same speed in top gear (although you'll have more trouble getting moving in 1st, since it's much taller on a 5 speed than on a 6 speed bike).

There are three drive ratios that affect engine speed for any given gear at any given speed of travel- the primary drive ratio (compensator sprocket to clutch basket sprocket ratios that people sometimes mess with as longhairedcountryboy pointed out), the transmission top gear ratio (1:1 on the *Harley* transmissions, 5 and 6 speed, but an *overdrive* on Baker 6 speed OD transmissions), and the final drive ratio for the transmission to rear wheel belt pulleys. The primary difference on the 5 speed and 6 speed *in top gear* are in the rear wheel pulley. Over the years, Harley has also messed with the primary drive ratios, but for the purposes of this discussion, it's irrelevant.

Hope this is more clear now. What if he isn't the child of a hard working woman after all? Is it still polite?Hitler was Austrian, not German.  :)You're confused because of your advanced German sense of ~~humor~~ literal usage.&gt; Asserting some connection is not the same thing as condemning all Muslims in the same

EXACTLY.Sorry, but all three of the big Abrahamic texts- the Torah, the Koran, and the New Testament- tell you how you should treat your slaves. Doesn't sound like a beautiful idea to me. And ALL the books have discussions of how slaves should be treated and the New Testament even tells slaves how they should behave (Timothy). Old Testament is filled with fucked up stuff that taken as a whole or in part makes it clear that killing people is one of the best ways to show one's faith in God. European history is clear- "convert or die". Quran (2:191-193) - "And kill them wherever you find them, and turn them out from where they have turned you out. And Al-Fitnah [disbelief or unrest] is worse than killing...
but if they desist, then lo! Allah is forgiving and merciful.   And fight them until there is no more Fitnah [disbelief and worshipping of others along with Allah] and worship is for Allah alone.  But if they cease, let there be no transgression except against Az-Zalimun (the polytheists, and wrong-doers, etc.)"  &gt; Biblical definition of slaves isn't quite like the one people were put under in America in the 1800s. It was more like indentured servants if anything

That is a gross oversimplification. Slaves were *property* and could be killed or abused without sanction. 

&gt; Now, the OT does contain some distasteful content, yes

That's like saying "the writings of Muhammad ibn Abd al-Wahhab does contain some distasteful content about the modern world". It's like saying "the story of Lot does contain some distasteful content about his daughters". 

But that's the thing, isn't it? If you're gonna believe, BELIEVE. If you're gonna pick and choose, why not pick and choose which science to believe, which "news" network to believe, which bigotry to believe? Oh wait, people who pick and choose what to believe do that, too, don't they?Light intensity, if I remember correctly, is an inverse square of distance from the light source, meanin if you're 1AU from the the sun (where Earth is), let's call the intensity of the light "x". Twice the distance from the earth is 2AU, but the intensity of the sunlight would be 1/4x . 4AU away, 1/16x, or 1/16th as intense as when orbiting Earth. Once you're far enough away, it'd be like powering a solar cell by starlight. Not "forever". Reading comprehension bro. The guy you responded to said Christianity.And figuring from the distance to Sol from Earth, what do you think the intensity of stars many MANY light-years away will be? We're talking about *accelerating* to a useful velocity coverting solar to electric.

Even Voyager's solar cells and batteries only power a few simple instruments using the faint light from Sol, which is still considerably brighter than starlight using the inverse square rule, even as far away as she is. How much electricity do you think it would take to power a "microwave motor".That's the big difference- people who drive drunk generally don't have the same reaction. Most folks I know who are impaired from smoking wouldn't dream of driving while like that. But we all know way too many people who insist they're not impaired when they've been drinking. Just sayin....Quote it accurately. I wrote "most people I KNOW who are impaired from SMOKING". Not "drinking" as you misquoted me. Get over yourself. And I was CAREFUL to qualify things with my experience. I did not compare all drinkers to anything. https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/3r2a0e/so_the_question_of_what_gremlin_bells_do_came_up/In case you're curious, I did a lengthy writeup on the [bells and their history](https://www.reddit.com/r/Harley/comments/3r2a0e/so_the_question_of_what_gremlin_bells_do_came_up/). The comments contain a guy who's been living the life since the 60s, and another whose grandfather's comments corroborate the story I got back in the 80s about where the bells came from and that there original purpose was. There's a lot of neat Harley clocks out there, some with neon, others based on vintage steel signs. Worth looking into. Having spent 53 years on this planet questioning everyone and everything I reasonably could, I have come to the conclusion that most religious people WANT their religion to be True, but really don't believe it is. Lovecraft put it best...

If religion were True, its followers would not try to bludgeon their young into an artificial conformity; but would merely insist on their unbending quest for truth, irrespective of artificial backgrounds or practical consequences.

H. P. Lovecraft

.
 Self-justification is a powerful force. The flaw is in number 1) ... "raised to believe"... and it goes downhill from there. I was fortunate to have folks who raised me to seek information and knowledge, and above all, to think critically from a young age. Annoyed the shit out of my school teachers and school mates, but it's done me well in life. Typically I think it's more emotional need, from "I miss mom and these people tell me I'll see her again" to "I can't live with the guilt of how completely fucked I am as a human and the shit I've done to others or to myself and this way.... IT'S NOT MY FAULT", religion gives people an answer to all their fears and guilt and loneliness in life. It's an amazing con based on self-delusion, but it does provide many people with solace and a way to absolve themselves of guilt or responsibility for their acts (and no, that's not all it does, these are just two examples). SOME people, sure, but there's no one "this is why someone is religious". But introspection is normal and natural and I'm convinced that many religious people BECOME religious or STAY religious exactly because of introspection... and not liking their conclusions. It's so much easier to blame an omnipotent deity when you're a fucked up human being, either inside or out. What one does with introspection, on the other hand, and where it takes one, is where things fall apart. People who think critically, and those who examine their own motives and actions critically are far  more likely to choose a rational path. 

For instance, I've accepted that I'm a consumer and that I've *chosen* to live in a 21st century life filled with electronics and fossil-fuel burning vehicles. I also know my part in what we're doing to this planet, but I've made the rational determination that even if I went and lived in a cabin in the woods and didn't do anything worse than pollute by burning wood for heat, there won't be a single day's more resources and there won't be a single hungry person fed. I'm unwilling to devote my life to helping others, since I'm a mess physically (spine injury, arthritis, and other shitty things I deal with daily) and it's all I can do many days just to get up and go to work. 

But here's the difference, I think- I don't blame some omnipotent deity for *my* choices or actions, for bad things that happen in the world, or for the choices of those around me who have contributed to my life's pleasure or pain or that of those around me, affected directly or indirectly by my actions. I accept that *my* choices are *usually* well thought out, but that even if my conclusions are not helpful to the world at large, at least they're no more harmful than the next guy. It would be easy to blame shit on "god's will" or some other bullshit.

But I accept my culpability in the condition of the planet and how my choices affect the world around me. Religious people, in my experience, tend to heap a whole lot of that on their deity- "Mom got killed by a drunk driver? The lord works in mysterious ways". "Dad fucked his 10 year old daughter? Satan was working through him". It's bullshit and self-serving, and for all the good claimed to have been done by religion in the world, I don't buy it because of all the murder and abuse and bullshit and genocide and obvious corruption foisted on those around them by "believers". I've read it, or at least a modern version of it, from cover to cover. Have you?People have *faith* in a football team that loses every year, like Raiders' fans. People have *their money* on teams that are likely to win. Yeah, it's semantics, but "faith" means "choosing to believe", which is not the same a True belief in my book. I have faith that a mathematician understands a theorem better than I do, but I have zero doubt that they are able to offer mathematical proofs to others who speak their language. I do NOT have "faith" that an alternative medicine proponent better understands homeopathy than I do, since examining homeopathy critically leads to dismissing it wholesale. So while we use the word "faith" to mean several different things, in the sense of religion, it really means "choose to believe something no one can prove"... like homeopathy. One would actually have to believe in sin, then, wouldn't one? Funny how so many wonderful things are considered "sinful"...&gt; But I think that falls into the same fallacy of people who see religion as only existing from those who invented it solely as a tool for controlling people

Not True. That's a broad overgeneralization. 

Consider, if you will, the reaction so many religious people have when one questions their belief or argues that some OTHER belief or lack of belief might be valid- hostility, anger, even threats. We see this every day, from the assholes in the Westboro Baptist Church to conservative politicians to my next door neighbor. Psychologists have spent over 100 years pointing out that choosing an angry response to a simple question usually means someone should be looking in the mirror and examining themselves. Shakespeare put it well in Hamlet- "the lady dost protest too much, methinks"&gt; Your experience is unfortunately a vast minority.

I agree, if you're suggesting that being raised to think critically is a minority experience. I've often suggested that the single biggest change we can make in the world is to teach critical thinking every single school year from the time children enter kindergarten. It'll never happen, simply because so many parents lie to their kids as a daily exercise, or threaten them with burning in hell if they don't eat their broccoli. 
Surprising. As you're one of few Christians I've spoken with who've actually read it. 

My take is that the English-language old testament of today is the product of four millennia of politically advantageous mis-translations of oral traditions that had been around since the bronze age. The new testament is the product a millennia and a half of the same politically advantageous mistranslations of oral traditions that were cherry-picked, assembled and codified 1600 years ago at the council of Nicea. Relevant in a world of abject poverty and slavery and women's servitude to give people with no hope in their daily life a hope for a life *after* they died. :(With the caveat that the motives of the council were probably honest, yeah.I don't think of the Council of Nicea as a falsifier, so much as a conglomeration of individuals who all had a personal stake in the canon that evolved there. They didn't *write* anything, but they certainly cherry-picked what they did codify as canon. Anything remotely suggesting that a powerful "Church" wasn't part of the plan was summarily tossed out, such as the Gospel of Thomas. Based on what?So does conspiracy theory.Tell that to a religion whose existence demands proselytizing.Then you're horribly mistaken. My quest was lookin *for* God, and wanting desperately for one to exist. You're putting words into a LOT of atheists' mouths.Semantics. The quote was part of a longer treatise on religion. Him and Mel Gibson both.Your premise is deeply flawed. I had no desire for the old testament God to exist, just seeking something supernatural if it was real. Although dashing children on rocks and slaughtering fatted lambs does have its appeal certain days.&gt; Atheists want there to be no God,

THAT was your all-inclusive declaration of what all atheists *want*, which is patently, demonstrably bullshit. Most atheists don't give a shit except that religion insinuates itself into our lives in all kinds of insidious ways, from religionists in government to assholes in southern public schools who think prayer belongs in taxpayer funded public schools and self-righteous religious assholes in athetists' subreddits. 

You do a lot of telling people what they want and don't want. One of these days, you might actually hit on something accurate *accidentally* and for once be right. Until then, grow up. That bottom number is the least critical of the numbers on there (I wrote it and I'll adjust it to 50-250). If you find a *quality* 250lb torque wrench that doesn't go below 50lbs, you're doing OK. The problem with 250ft/lb wrenches is they become inaccurate at very low numbers unless they're higher quality wrenches. I own one that's 0-250 (a $400 torque wrench when it was new), but if you get one that's 50-250, still need one for inch-pounds that goes from 0 up to something like 750-960 inch-pounds (62-80 ft/lbs) to cover the difference at the bottom end for most fasteners on the bike that aren't compensator sprocket nuts. If you look at higher-end wrenches like Snap-on, MAC, or Matco  on ebay, there's 0-250 Snap-on "Torque-o-meter" wrenches on there, but they're older and may not be accurate. If you get a modern 50-250 and another 0-960 or 750 in/lb wrench, you're covered (12 in/lbs to the foot/pound). The point is to have an accurate one for smaller values (most nuts and bolts on the bike) and an accurate one for the 140-170 foot/pound values that compensator nuts require (depending on year and model).Most atheists don't say a word about god except in response to asshole religionists who insist on telling them how they think. Um, what kind of bike are you riding? The compensator and primary chain and adjuster are the only things that really suffer from no oil in a Big Twin, but the tranny is oiled with primary oil on a Sportster. I rode Harley after Harley with dry primaries for 20+ years. No harm, no foul, but I didn't have compensators on them, either. Every Harley with a compensator from the mid-40s until 1965 had a dry primary where the ONLY thing oiled was the chain by directing the crankcase breather on the chain and the oil mist being the only lube.

But you haven't said what was "smoked", because the "primary" is only part of a part description. Primary chain? Primary chain adjuster? Primary cover? Clutch? Compensator?Maybe not. Every Harley with a similar compensator before 1965 had a dry primary. Limp mode is treatable. Look up the forum discussions of other bikes doing this. You've got it pretty much figured. 2 into 1 gives better performance. The Shortshots are going to be for looks, and while they perform OK, they're not going to put a spot on your seat with performance, except in comparison to the stock, almost strangled exhaust. If you have plans for future performance upgrades, buy exhaust once- get a 2 into 1. Warning- the ProPipe (the one withOUT the "quiet baffle") is fucking *loud*. Louder than the Shortshots even. I set off car alarms *ilding* down the street with my Road King. Never see deer, either. :)Come to think of it, you might end up doing the three-way split. if you can't find one, do it with three- one 0-150in/lb, one that's 5-75ft/lbs, and one that's 50-250ft/lbs. You ought to be able to find good used Snap-on for a little more than the price of new at other places for the two smaller ones. 

Damn, looking into it, they're pretty rare. I've edited the sidebar to include three wrenches, just to be safe. I like 3/8" drive for the smaller two wrenches, and 1/2" drive for the big one, although my sockets for compensatory nuts and range in 3/4" drive and need an adapter for the 1/2" drive torque wrench. I'm gonna have to edit that sidebar again. Sorry about that. Pretty sure this was posted here a few months ago. At least episode II is something I've seen before. Is this a repost? Not complaining, just trying to figure out where I saw it.That's a great story. One of the things about modern evangelical Christianity is that the ONLY way to *guarantee* that you won't get into heaven is to "question the divinity of Christ". When a religion begins and ends the discussion by prohibiting critical thinking, it loses  any credibility and does its level best to keep the flock ignorant. Tell people "oh yeah, HEAVEN is real, but if you DARE to question this stuff, you'll never get in there where the *rest of us* will be" and you've got a captive audience in many many households.

I'm glad your parents encouraged you to inquire about the world and religion. It's too rare in any household, let alone religious ones. &gt; As long as they mind their own business I'm not going to complain about it.

Yet, as we see way too often in daily life, there are WAY too many who seem incapable of minding their own business and do their level best to impose their religion and bogus religious "morality" on strangers. Not unless you're abusing it. I ran dry clutches in both Panheads and a Sportster (where the modern clutch design comes from) without problem.That *is* rare. If only Evangelicals could just believe and mind their own business in the world. The whole "everyone and everything must conform to OUR worldview" is where most animosity toward American Evangelical Christianity is rooted. Believe what you want n private and NO ONE would give a shit, if only they didn't spend so much time trying to make everyone else follow their religion, or at least their bullshit morality. And I DON'T mean your parents, but the public face of Evangelism in the US. 

My Christian grandmother was one who felt "religion is a private, personal matter and shouldn't be discussed in public". Of course she also said things like " that's not very Christian of you " and "why don't we let good be the judge of that" anytime someone said something bad about another person. Attitudes far too lacking today.You're in Australia and have asshole cops to deal with who are convinced bikers are the Antichrist. He in California, that's how it was from the 1960s to the 1990s. You can get the Propipe with a quiet baffle that still offers performance.I guess it's then fair to say that celebrating the *death* of someone is far more in line with Christian values than celebrating the *killing* of someone. (only a tiny bit /s)&gt; but this attitude is allowing a violent misogynistic backwater religion to fester and indoctrinate.

You are correct. American evangelical Christianity has become horribly dangerous with its warmongering and violent denigration of women's rights, gay rights, and free thinking. and there's a growing incidence of Christian terrorism against women's health clinics, physicians who provide women with this care, and LBGT people. Something needs to be done and we need to stop being afraid to call it what it is- a scourge on American principles of freedom.&gt; Of course then they are 18, and cant manage to do anything in the real world because their parents kept them in a dumb bubble.

Absolutely, but this is far more of a middle-class to upper middle-class issue I think. Poor kids have dealt with adversity and typically have less-well educated parents with fewer restrictions on their kids' behavior and exposure to the real world. 

I have friends who are university administrators and they refer to middle-class freshmen and women as "teacups". I'm paraphrasing a comment that was made just last week, for the umpteenth time I've heard one or the other state this- "They're like fine China teacups. They're so damned pretty, but they are *fragile* and they fucking break if you look at them wrong. Nothing bad has ever happened to them as their helicopter parents have made sure there's zero risk and zero misfortune in their young lives, and provided every possible advantage that money and overprotecting a child can provide. Come to college and get a bad grade or have your heart broken or *gasp* contract an incurable STD because they were taught asinine "abstinence only" sex-ed, or never taught to *insist* on condoms, and they want to kill themselves."
Do you really think I think everyone, particularly Christians, will *agree* with Lovecraft? I don't expect everyone to agree with this, particularly Christians. I also know that not every atheist here agrees, and that not everyone here is an atheist or antitheist. I also have some understanding of trends, and when I watch a trend that's been steadily on upswing take a sudden, significant nosedive, it means something has changed in the variables contributing to the trend. 

Over at /r/childfee there's a phenomenon where the "mombie brigade" who would otherwise never soil their eyeballs or computer screens with the likes of people who don't want kids, comes in and mass downvotes posts that criticize self-righteous, entitled parents for their egregious behavior in public or private, usually first-person experiences posted by those with no interest in having kids (in a like-minded online community). It's not something like old "phone trees" from the 60s and 70s where each person would have two people to call (because that would require too much effort on the part of too many people who just have no free time to do things like this because their special snowflake demands all their attention), but a repost with negative commentary somewhere else on the internet (typically in a self-righteous, entitled moms' online community), will trigger a sudden influx of otherwise non-participants to show up and try and silence -through sending a comment or post into downvote oblivion- those who would dare to find their behavior despicable or offensive. 

It happens here, too. Circular, self-serving logic nonetheless. But it also makes my point about the weakness of peoples' belief- if they *really* believed the amazing claims of Christianity and in particular Evangelical Christianity in the US, it would hold to reason that they'd be content in the knowledge that others are going to burn in a lake of fire with red dudes with pointy tails and bad goatees poking them with sharp things for all eternity, rather than trying to silence any challenge to their faith. 

But the "Satan" element you point out is also self-serving in the extreme... "If you don't agree with me, it means you're tainted/influenced by Satan, therefor all right-thinking people agree with me and anyone who doesn't is evil or under a spell of evil. The way *I* think is the *right way" and *GOD* loves me especially much for thinking this way". Delusional bullshit.And whether you believe me or not, I absolutely respect your right to believe in God. Whether or not your experience has shown you that God does exist or whether you've made the *choice* to believe in the existence of an omnipresent deity is beside the point, despite my original comment about what I believe is a distinct *lack* of belief in those who profess it the most. You have a right to belief, particularly if you live in North America and Europe, and I am one to respect the rights of others provided they don't infringe on the rights of someone else. 

That said, I have little reason to respect peoples' *specific* beliefs, despite respecting their right to have them. If it works for you, that's wonderful, and I mean that, so long as you continue the chain of encouraging critical thinking and don't force belief on others (which it doesn't sound like you do). You are not alone. There are many instances in the people I've known in my life who went the same way. At some point, they finally decided that something else made things worth investigating, and once they actually applied reason to things, they stopped denigrating things that chalenged their "belief" and began examining them, only to find reasonable explanations for most or all of the things they'd ascribed to supernatural forces.

I hope you find that life is actually easier for you. I've known a couple of people who really really wished they could delude themselves, but have to accept some pretty harsh realities about their own lives instead.&gt; Never once was I put down or questioned about my beliefs 

You are a lucky person. Your parents, or whomever raised you without condemnation for this, deserve recognition for this. Too often people are outright disowned for daring to have their own mind and search for Truth. No kidding. Most scientists would be drooling to examine even the smallest shred of *real* evidence of a supernatural being, an afterlife, or any number of the things claimed as True by religions the world over. Ricky Gervais is a funny guy and right on the money about a lot of topics that make it into the media.I agree. That's why I chose to paraphrase a different approach than OP's "hypocrisy", which sadly, seems to be the case WAY too often. :)Not to mention a costless way to seek absolution for the things people know they've done in life that they feel guilt or shame overAlso it's *very* hard for western people to admit to others that they've been wrong about something, for so long and so deeply. Studies have shown that when people believe things like "vaccines cause autism" or "homeopathic cures are real" or "Obama is a Muslim" or "there's no evidence to support the old earth hypothesis" that showing them well explained, factually supported *widely accepted proof* they're mistaken/wrong/misinformed, they double down instead of considering facts as having validity. They would rather appear insane or irrational than admit they might be wrong or that they have been duped into irrational thinking.:)If you were to study the history of storytelling and oral tradition, you'll find that for the most part, apocryphal stories and morality tales are tailored by the teller to suit the audience and, if advantageous to the storyteller, the political realities of the day. Religious stories are no different in their infancy.

Any tale that's survived by memorization and retelling for even several years will have been modified by the tellers for ease of remembering, ease of retelling, and to make such stories fit the needs and desires of the respective audiences. 

In a time of abject poverty when borderline starvation and subjugation of women, underclasses and slavery were the order of the day (Christianity first found popularity with women and slave populations), stories that promise hope for a wonderful, empowering future, justice for the oppressed, and retribution against the oppressor, even if it's in a widely believed in afterlife, will become very popular with the disenfranchised. 

They also will, after several hundred years of retelling, not only promise everything that's missing in the present life, but will often empower the storyteller with authority, as Acts empowers the Church with authority and Corinthians empowers Evangelists with authority to correct misunderstanding. Add to this that Romans tells us that only through believing these stories can you find that promised future, and the whole thing becomes self serving, self sustaining exercise and inoculates itself from criticism.

The Council was careful to choose the stories that suited its purposes and ensured its authority over all within earshot, even those who had no interest in these stories. Stories that don't empower the teller/Church with authority, as with the Gospel of Thomas, were discarded and called heresy, and believing or even *telling* other than approved stories will be sure to keep you out of the promised future and later on would get you killed as heretics.

This is what I mean when I say the new testament is the product of cherry picking on the part of the Council, and the evidence supports this, irrespective of what you choose to believe. My belief is not based on a casual reading of the Bible, although it doesn't really require more. It's based on an understanding of the history of that document and how stories evolve, especially those first recorded years after events supposedly took place, as with the Gospels. &gt;  it begins to tend naive to suggest the majority of theists don't genuinely think their superstition is valid, and it becomes more apparent that the majority of theists do. 

I didn't make ANY claim about "validity". I'm talking about *actually believing, deep in their hearts* that something is True. *Choosing* to believe something is valid or True is not the same, imo as actually *knowing* it is, and I suspect if you put most, especially the overtly "in your face" religious people on some kind of foolproof polygraph, that the vast majority would pass on the question "do you really really want this religious stuff to be True?" and would fail on "do you really really *believe* it's True?". Or else why even discuss "faith"?

You're the one with the history in brain science, something far too complex and subjective for my attention span, and you've written some very sound arguments about how the brain works. But your premise is a bit off what I said, or based on semantic definitions that I maybe should  have made clearer. I think most people *want* the things they say are True about their religion to be True, but I suspect most of them would fail a hypothetically foolproof polygraph is asked to distinguish between the two degrees of cognition.You might make a production of hanging gingerbread men on a Christmas tree for and with them, which it has been suggested by more than a few people (don't know how True, but it sounds like it could be), is a tradition carried over from the rituals where folks would sacrifice people to Odin and, after conversion of all Scandinavia to Christianity at swordpoint, instead of hanging slaves and animals on the great trees in a sacred grove, they moved a single tree inside and instead hanged them in baked effigy yumminess. Makes sense.Read the sidebar for "New and relatively new riders". Watch the film. All 94 minutes of it. It'll save your life. Even if you've taken a rider safety class, watch the film. If you haven't, get signed up for one now. Again, it'll save your life, too. 

Welcome to the tribe. Ride safe. "Only 9000 miles"?!?! I never get more than 6500 before it's time to swap tires, and that's not unusual considering the way I ride. You're getting 50% more. How many miles do you expect out of a rear tire that you say it doesn't hold up? Hell, I could ride a rear tire to dangerous baldness and say "it didn't hold up", even if it was 50% over what I could reasonably expect. I'd be wrong, too. Well, you ride a lot of flat, straight lines without turning much, or you have it overinflated. What tire pressure are you keeping it at? As I said in another post, you're upset because you get 50% more miles from a tire than I do. Don't know what you expect from a 700+ pound bike with a rider on it...You don't exceed the speed limit much, huh? I get about 6500 out of a rear Dunlop 402 on my Road King with mostly just me and a 110lb wife on it, but I'm clocking 85-90 most days, and dragging footboards through the hills ever chance I get. Not gonna find trailers, in all likelihood, but it's mostly citizens who don't pretend to not be citizens, even if they often do dress a certain way. Define "poser"? 30 years ago here in California that meant anyone on a Harley who didn't build it themselves. What part of "hit by a drunk driver" didn't you get? That's like asking a rape victim "were you wearing a short skirt?"How about "were you wearing pantyhose?"Almost certainly not a factory color. 

The decal is '88-89 FXSTS, so you're right on the Springer. Someone just painted over the stock color. :)I do have a brother in law who rides living in Carrollton. :)One of these summers I'm gonna be riding down there to visit. Maybe not 2016 but if not then 2017. You should know enough before then that I won't be any help. :) In the mean time, the internet is a great resource. Start with early Harley history 1900-1920 and work up from there. Cut it into easily digestible chunks. Aaaaaand?My point is that without qualification, the question "were you wearing a helmet?" implies some connection to causation.Nope. Not against helmets. Against the immediate supposition that a helmet or the lack thereof is part of the fault. There was no comment about drunk divers prior to the question. Rider would have been FINE if some asshole hadn't got behind the wheel after drinking. The helmet or lack of one had NOTHING to do with the wreck happening. If there had been a discussion of the actual events by that commenter, before going on about whether or not he was wearing a helmet, I wouldn't have commented.I disagree that we're not looking into Saudi influence. I'm pretty sure we are. That's a different thing than DOING something about it.Great DOUBLE episode with the other half being about the suicide bombers. Great episode. Most folks I tell about it don't have a fucking clue or even believe such a thing could be True. More than you plan on filling.No, it's it's like asking if she tried keeping her legs closed.And no one should think that keeping one's legs together prevents rape. But there's a long tradition of blaming riders for not wearing helmets when they get injured, or have you been living in a cave.You'll get many more miles out of a tire than I will, no matter the brand. Damn, and I thought me going for a gallon of milk and leaving with $200 worth of groceries was bad impulse control. At least this way, your bad impulse control will have something to show for it a week later. Mine just ends up with an empty fridge after the week.

Ride safe. Chrome isn't for older men- it's for people who know it's hard enough getting assholes in cars to see us as it is, and things that are shiny and reflect just MIGHT get some texting asshole to look up long enough to not kill us. Really? Try looking at it the other way. Start with the chromed out bike as the "norm". They're a bitch to see, especially at night, or the words " gee officer, I didn't see the motorcycle. Those things sure are dangerous" wouldn't be part of the lexicon, and it wouldn't boil the blood of so many riders. Now let's make that chromed out bike HARDER to see by removing and reflective surfaces and painting everything black. That's EXACTLY what if do to a bike it I wanted to make it harder to see, say for the cops to see at night. The ONLY thing that would make it harder to see is if I rigged a brakelight cutoff that allowed me to keep the lights off and not light the brake when I'm running. But that's the only difference between a regular blacked out bike and one *made* hard to see at nightAnd yeah, it's your bike. Not telling you what to do with it. I just responded to a comment about chrome being for old people.Why do you think buying used doesn't offer much savings? Dealers routinely charge 20-40% MORE than private sellers for used bikes. *Read the wiki tab or the Buying a used Harley? link on the sidebar* All will be explained. IGNORE used bike prices on craigslist until you have. Those are ASKING prices, and those bikes will *never* sell if the seller doesn't drop the price considerably. They're tiny. I have a friend who's 5'4" who rides an Iron and she looks about the right size for the bike. Both of them are *tiny*. 

Look into the Dyna, but seriously, buy a "like new" low-miles used bike for thousands of dollars less than you'd pay for new. Get your own financing or Harley Finance can finance private sale used bike if they're new enough and pass inspection. 

Before you do that, however, read the "Buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar. It's also the wiki tab at the top of the browser page (if you're on  mobile, go to the top right corner and drop the menu, then "view in browser" or whatever language your phone app gives it). There are 2009-2010 Dynas with under 10K miles on them selling for $6000-7000 and bikes a couple years newer are selling for just a couple thousand dollars more. Buying new means a) YOU take the depreciation, b) you'll never get what you think it's worth when you want to sell it (not by a long shot- used Harley market is FLOODED).

But whether you buy new or used, provided you already have your motorcycle endorsement for your license, go down to the dealer and test ride a couple Dynas. You may find that even they feel too small for you. Take a Road King or a Road Glide for a ride too. Then, when you've fallen in love with a specific model, find a used one and ask that the dealer take a look at it before the sale. There's so many used Harleys on the market right now that most sellers will accommodate you. People SUCK. Go online and look at Vance &amp; Hines, Rinehart, Thunderheader, S&amp;S, D&amp;D, Bubb, Supertrapp, and others. Cycle Shack is probably the least expensive effective muffler pipes with reasonable performance, but only if you're too broke to get a premium, properly tuned exhaust from one of the others. Look at 2 into 1 pipes and dual muffler pipes. Sure thing. I *passed* on a 2009 Dyna with 6,000 miles on it in pristine, never-been-laid-over condition at $6600 in July. The asking prices are a bunch of delusional people looking at other peoples' delusional prices on Craigslist and thinking "that must be what my bike is worth. Besides, I spent $3,000 on chrome doodads and skulls and spikey stuff so the bike must be worth $3,000 *more* than those *other* bikes". They're delusional, like I said. EVERYONE does add-on mods to their bikes, but those are *personal taste* add-ons and don't add a dollar's value to a  bike unless they're *top shelf performance mods*. All other mods are "tough shit buddy, I don't *want* a bike covered in skulls, and will have to spend *extra* to replace all those parts if I buy this bike". 

Good luck. If you have questions about a bike's value, you can message me and I'll give you at least a ballpark. What metropolitan area are you in? Yes, but not "production" videos. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p_jMGbvb9uYhttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p_jMGbvb9uYHe's not alone. Sure, a lot of people have spent a *lot* of money to do big-wheel baggers, but I'll always see them as gimmicks like 30" apehangers or 6' sissy bars. I didn't even notice that! Interesting. They have to be fabbed, since I've never seen aftermarket mids for a bagger. Pegs instead of boards, yes, but those pedals are different, too. It's a production video. Willing to bet there were spotters keeping traffic out of the intersection. He's got seriously unresolved penis-size issues, obviously. And I'm willing to bet his wife or girlfriend left him for a guy with a Harley. Better yet, a GIRL with a Harley. Fucking moron. Too bad we live in a  world where you can't just put a gun in his mouth and prevent this kind of behavior in the future. Cars/vans/trucks are *deadly weapons* and anyone who misuses such things needs to be removed from the gene pool. There's a lot of good cops out there. We just never see them because the good ones don't fuck with people just for the hell of it. "Between San Diego and LA"? Oceandump? Poway? Escondido? Former Marine here. If you know how to look, there's a LOT of inexpensive Dynas out there, even though most of them are *listed* for more money than they're worth. NO REASON to pay $17,000 for a new Dyna when you can find one in like-new condition with super-low miles for *less than half the price of new!* For example, [this 2009 Dyna in Temecula with under 8K miles](http://sandiego.craigslist.org/csd/mcd/5245873333.html) is essentiall brand new, as far as function is concerned with an $8300 asking price. It's overpriced even then, and the bike has been listed for a couple weeks already without selling. It's only ever had two oil changes, and is probably still on its first set of tires (I'd get the dealer to replace them). I'm not partial to the forward controls on this bike, as they don't give as much control in corners as mid controls (unless you're over 6' with long legs, as I think you said you are), but I'm willing to bet you could get this bike for $7K cash. It's a car lot, and they probably took it on trade, if not consignment. To be clear, I am NOT saying "buy this bike", but just showing you that bikes with VERY low miles in like-new condition are out there for *less* than the price of a new 883 (which you'd hate in about 20 minutes). 

The age of the Craigslist ads is critical information, and taking your time and getting to know which bikes have been sitting for a month or more, even if they seller removes the old ad and creates a new one every now and then will give you a much better idea of what bikes are overpriced. Any bike that's been for sale for a month or more is more than $1000 overpriced, since the seller hasn't even gotten an offer close enough to accept. People just don't get that their bike isn't worth what they think it's worth. 

Harley sold almost 200,000 bikes in the US each of the last half dozen years. That's a *million* Harleys out there, and at least half of them are sold to people who "really want to *own* a Harley", but either never get into riding once they've bought it, get scared, have a wife who tells them "no", or just plain can't figure out how to enjoy themselves in life. With real incomes declining for most of the population, the bike in the garage  is at least a way to generate *some* cash. The used Harley market is *flooded*, and that makes it a buyer's market. At one point this summer, there were over 300 Sportsters for sale in the Dallas/Fort Worth area on the same day. Over 700 ads, actually, but I figure half of them were duplicate ads, and I'm being generous with the 300 number. Why on earth would anyone buy any buy the lowest priced "similar" bikes when they can have their pick of used bikes from sellers who need cash and haven't gotten an offer on the bike they've had for sale for a month or more?

Kelly Blue Book isn't the best place to figure out what a bike is worth. NADA's site, on the other hand, will give you a loose ballpark if you look at "low retail", and ignore options and add-ons, since NADA hasn't caught up with reality yet, and their value list is only going to be accurate for bikes for sale at a dealership. Private sale bike, no matter how many "extras" there are, rarely *sell* for a dime more than "low retail", and that's for bikes with under 15K miles, but people think their bike is a special snowflake and can't possibly be worth a dime less than "high retail", with all the extras and options figured in, and list their bikes for sale accordingly. Those bikes never sell. Longhairedcountryboy mentioned his Wide Glide for $5100. The seller had a $7500 price tag on it, even though it was a dozen years old. After sitting for sale without a single offer, the seller was *happy* to get $5100 for the bike. :)

There's nothing wrong with a bike with 30K miles, provided it's been properly maintained, but they just don't sell easily, since there's so many with under 10-15K out there for reasonable prices. That Dyna with 7K miles on it for an *asking* price of $8300 I linked to took me  2 minutes to find. Why on earth would a buyer pay the same for a bike with 30K miles on it? Oh, they're *listed* for reasonable prices, and again, there's nothing wrong with a 30K bike (if properly maintained), but it'll be way down the list of bikes to look at for the same price point. And remember, *cash is king*. 

Good luck. Oh, I'm sure *someone* makes them. I've just never seen them for sale is all. Ah. I guess I read that too fast. I agree with you. So does my Road King. :)I think you misunderstand peoples' views re: the FXD Dyna. Every single week you'll see me and other here (and I own an FXR) telling people to buy a Dyna. They're great bikes, and if yours is well-maintained and not horribly abused, it'll last 100K miles or more. What they aren't is an FXR. They *replaced* the FXR in Harley's inventory and are the best-selling Big Twin in HD's product line. They're versatile enough to be a grocery getter, heavy enough to be a touring bike, and light enough for around town and as a commuter, with saddlebag and windshield options/mods available. 

There's a shitload of used Dynas out there with very few miles on them, especially since the Sons of Anarchy outfreakage led something like half a million dudes to go out and buy a bike "just like the ones on the show" (Street Bob with T-bar handlebars and a Thunderheader). More than half the people who buy Harleys because they "really want a Harley" seem to never get into riding much, or become afraid, and for whatever reason certainly never get into the lifestyle, so there's a shitload of super low-miles, like-new Dynas (and other models) sitting in garages 5, 10, 15 years old, and with so many people selling these bikes, it's a buyer's market. You can find a 5 year old Dyna for half the cost of the same model new, with low-miles and even the mild performance mods that most people do to their bikes already done. If you're willing to buy 10 years old, you can get one for 1/3 the price of new. 

The FXR (1982-1994, plus 1999 and 2000 limited release models), is the bike that saved Harley in the 1980s, and was the first bike you could buy that you didn't need to be a mechanic to keep on the road (vibration means serious required maintenance to make sure things aren't falling off the bike). It's the first rubber mounted engine and transmission unit, best handling Big Twin Harley ever sold, and if you can find one in great shape, you can't go wrong with the Evolution motor, 5 speed tranny, and disc brake forks.

That said, there are used Dynas out there that are junk, and used FXRs that are junk, too. The FXR at 585lbs is 100lbs lighter than the Dyna, so therefor more nimble in the corners, accelerates faster given identical motors, and has a much more rigid frame construction than the FXD. Harley *replaced* the FXR with the FXD in 1994, primarily because frame construction costs on the FXR was high, and the FXD frame could be built entirely by robots (20th century manufacturing- nothing new). The FXD also eliminated the cost of a seat hinge, putting the oil tank access and battery box outboard of the frame. The FXR had the battery and oil tank access under the seat and required a seat hinge and if you replaced the stock seat, you needed to remove the rear seat bolt just to check your oil level. Both the FXR (1983-2000) and the FXD (1994-1998) came with the 80 inch Evolution motor, 5 speed transmission, rear belt drive, and a 39mm front fork with single or dual disc options (35mm on FXR until 1989, then 39mm through 2000, FXD had the 39mm fork from day one, except for the 49mm on the FXD model called the Fat Bob). The 1998 FXD to present came with the Twin Cam engine, in 88, 96, and 103 inch versions, with a 5 speed until 2006 and a 6 speed transmission from 2006 til present. 

The only serious difference is the weight, the frame design, and the availability of the two models. There are over a  *million* Dynas out there, and you can pick up a late 2000s FXDB or FXDC for under $7000, and early 2000s for $5000. If it's a 1990s bike and you're paying $5K, you're getting ripped off unless it's a brand new bike with very low miles on it. 

FXRs are in high demand among club guys and wannabe club guys, since the big boys in the 81 ride FXRs as their local bikes, and Road Glides as their touring bikes (drives Bay Area bike prices up for both models). The younger guys ride Dynas because they're cheap and reliable and can be hot-rodded easily without sacrificing reliability.

Shovelhead FXRs (1982-1983) can be found for $3500-4000, and 1983-1988 Evo FXRs that haven't had the transmission mainshaft upgrade or a 39mm fork installed can be had for $4000-4500 almost anywhere. 1989-1994 FXRs with the upgraded transmission and 39mm forks sell for anywhere from $4500 to $8500 here in California, with the high end being bikes with brand  new , big-inch engine builds and a Baker 6 speed transmission, beautiful paint, KrafTech or Chopper guys frames, mag wheels, and so on.

I own a 1985 FXRP (Police model, but never a cop bike- came from the dealer with footboards, windshield, and the word "Police" on the speedometer for $6800 brand new in late 1984- I didn't buy it new, but I have the original receipt from Bob Dron Harley in Oakland CA). It came with $22,000 in receipts from Arlen Ness for transmission upgrade, chrome and polishing on everything that could be removed from the bike and sent to the plate/polishing shop including the wheels, brake calipers, motor mounts, rocker boxes, swingarm, footboards, controls, and so on. Mods were an Andrews cam, S&amp;S carb, Thunderheader, Corbin seat, 12" internally wired ape hangers, a really ugly but expensive 1996 "custom" sea-foam green with hot pink pinstripe paint job ($4500 in 1996), and so on. Everything was polished or chrome except the frame, engine long block and the transmission case. 

The bike was built in 1996 as a show bike then parked in the guy's car collection in his climate controlled "barn" (he was a commercial building contractor- his barn was nicer than my house). It was rarely if ever ridden in those 20 years, so I've had to replace all the rubber oil seals that dried out and cracked in the 20 years since they were new. Other than that, it's a brand new bike with chrome and polishing (and labor) that would cost me about $35,000 today. I overpaid a bit at $7,000, primarily because any FXR I would have bought would have gotten the transmission upgrade (if it didn't have it already), FXRP footboards (I have a fucked up back and need the footboards for comfort), seat, bars, tires, carb, cam, exhaust, windshield and so on. I essentially bought a 30 year old $5000 bike with about $1500 in mods I would have needed to do, and another $20K in stuff I didn't need for another $2000. Finally got all the seals replaced and the brake calipers and master cylinders rebuilt (any bike that sits for 20 years is going to have rust and corrosion in the brake system) and have about $200 more than I paid for the bike in it. It's *quick*. Much quicker than my Road King will ever be at 800lbs, even with a hot rod motor. But a Dyna would be as quick, especially if it was a 96" or larger bike with cams, pipes, tuner, EFI, and headwork. 

My point in all this is that you can find a NICE Dyna or a NICE FXR for similar prices ($5K-8K), but the Dyna for that price is likely to be more reliable, have less wear and tear, and have more parts availability from Harley. FXRs are going to be in conditions from beat to shit to pristine, and you can't place a value based on year and model unless you've specifically looked at the individual bike in question, mainly because so many have been modded by top shelf shops, and an equal number neglected and wrenched on by broke-ass bikers who didn't know what they were doing. 

Here's a brief article on the [FXR](http://www.hotbikeweb.com/bikes/separating-men-boys-history-fxr), but [this forum discussion](http://www.cvoharley.com/smf/index.php?topic=25417.0) will tell you EVERYTHING you need to know about the various years and specific models and options from Harley, and goes deeply into the history of the FXR and all its advantages and shortcomings. 

People with FXRs LOVE them. People with Dynas LOVE them too... and many wish they had an FXR instead or as well. 

Edit: thanks for the gold.FXD (Dyna) is what OP is asking about, not the Softail. The FXR at 585lbs is almost 100lbs lighter than the FXDB at 672. Even the FXRT with touring package is only 635lbs, 40lbs lighter than the Dyna. I'm curious what it is about the wider tire that makes you want to put it on your Heritage. You need to worry about belt clearance as much as fender clearance. If you have less than 1/4" between the tire and the belt (or the belt guard), you'll have problems. It's because he had the big front wheel, obviously. I've always thought those bikes looked dangerous to ride. 

On a more serious note, what.... the.... fuck?!?! I'm guessing the previous vehicle/customer dumped a gallon of fuel on the ground. That, or he had a fuel-line failure, and needed gas because his bike was dumping it on the ground. Damn. That sucks. Any idea if the guy survived? He looked fully engulfed in flames from when the gas tank erupted, spitting burning fuel everywhere. I'm thinking the previous customer dumped a bunch of fuel on the ground. Just starting his bike back up would have done the same thing. Wow. 725lbs?!? My *Road King* is only 770 with the hard bags and windshield on. 800 with a full tank of gas and full oil reservoirs. The fully decked out FXRT with tour pack, leg fairings, stereo, passenger backrest, hard bags and mounting hardware, with the factory heavy-ass dual exhaust with heat shields, factory air cleaner, and footboards is only 654 without oil and gas, adding maybe 25lbs ready for the road. I'm guessing your buddy's girlfriend was standing on the scale. Even if the Ultima flywheels are heavy like the stock Harley wheels of old, and the Fat Bob rear wheel and tire weigh more than stock, and all those extras were made of lead it wouldn't account for 150lbs over the factory weight.  With the Heritage, I'd think going with wide "gangster" whitewalls would look better for a lot less money than trying to make a 150 or 160 fit on your bike. The Heritage looks great with wide whitewalls if you don't already have them on there.  I've got the 140 on my Road King ('08 takes the MU85-16B, which is the 140- MT90 is the 130) and it handles the 1200lbs of the bike, me, and a passenger just fine. But honestly, I can't even see my rear tire, except for the sidewall under the saddlebag. unless I look really hard. :)  

Got it. After reading your description of both your bikes, I realize that I am having a hard time going from my FXR back to the Road King I've put 60K happy hard miles on. It's not nearly as quick or as nimble as the FXR for daily commuting/lane splitting, and while it's comfy as hell, but the FXR is comfy too (once I put the stock pillow back on it and put the Corbin seat on the shelf) and it's a nimble little rocket ship compared to the RK. Who the fuck downvoted ythis comment?!?! The mid controls on a bagger are really rare and totally cool. I'm guessing some moron with forward controls on his 883 thinks just saying something nice about mids is somehow belittling his totally custom Drag Specialties bolt-on forward controls. Idjuts. Fucking Bartell's. Jeebus Kreist. I thought that poster was a joke the first time I saw it. I'm a capitalist and all for separating people from their money if you provide a decent value while fleecing them,  but.... DAMN. Has anyone seen one of these bikes on CL or eBay yet?There's nothing wrong with your stock tire though. Even if you could go with a really wide tire without mods, how much of the tire can you actually see?I asked him why, and his answer was about appearance only. Not much tire to see, so not sure how it would change the look on the bike, but oh well. :)I don't think it's any better or worse than it was a year ago. Sure, there's the same questions about long trips, same "Should I buy an 883 Sportster? By the way, I'm 6'5" with long legs" posts, same "I put on different handlebars, pipes and an air cleaner and now my bike is really custom" photos. But there's still the occasional gem, and some groovy people. Fewer white supremacists, more club discussions. Good mods, decent duscussions. That's a very astute, very accurate take on the Dyna. Honestly though, the Dyna performs better than the needs of 95% of those who would ever ride one. Harley introduced the Shovel then Evo FXR with almost 7" of ground clearance and within three years had lowered it and put forward controls on it because Harley buyers didn't *want* a bike that could handle the hills as well as the competition. By the way, lowering the FXR is something I see as a crime, but that's neither here nor there.

It's sad what happened to the FXR and you'd think with all the awareness of the model that Harley would introduce a Twin Cam FXR as its own product line. Wishful thinking, I know, and there's more than a few FXR-TCs out there as special construction bikes. I just wish the factory would build one. You in the Bay Area?  Frame design accounts for most of it, since fender rails, battery box, oil tank, and everything else that needs to be bolted to the frame is different.It's funny that you mention the exposed rear frame member. When the FXR was relatively new, I was a young biker fresh out of the Marines, being "raised" in the outlaw scene by a bunch of guys who had survived the club wars of the 60s and 70s. Every time the FXR came up in conversation, or when we were at the dealer for this part or whatever, *someone* would make a comment about the frame design, saying "looks too much like a Jap bike" or "looks like a Honda", and not as a positive thing. Within 5 years the whole attitude had changed, but that's one of the reasons the FXR didn't sell very well. The Softail Custom, on the other hand, looked like so many rigid frame "California bobbers", yet offered "some" suspension in the back and sold like hotcakes despite handling like a truck and not being particularly comfortable on longer rides. Read the article I linked to from [HotBike](http://www.hotbikeweb.com/bikes/separating-men-boys-history-fxr). Buell designed the frame. Lemming trains happen on the NA servers, too. Just not quite as often, and folks who aren't in platoons occasionally have mics. My only bitch is that people who are platooned generally are in party chat and can't communicate as "part of the team". Makes shit frustrating when arty is platooned and you can only use the bump prompt, which every noob uses on every tank in their gunsights. The best deals are from friends, since dispensaries charge much more than street prices in Humboldt. Hell, in 8 years in Arcata I don't think I paid for pot once. Too many friends growing willing to toss an ounce here and there. Just about EVERYBODY I know in Arcata who smokes has a 215 card. There's no "going out of your way" about it.Thanks. Sucks that people would steal shit off your bike. Shit like that happens WAY too often. Liced on a dirt goat trail kinda road for two years.... riding a rigid Panhead. Keeping shit clean was impossible. I'd leave 20 minutes early every yhree or four days and hit the coin car wash.  Sucked.Yeah, the Nova story was a disappointment. That Porsche V4 would have been something else. At least we got the fairing and bags for the FXRT  from it. 

Not holding my breath about tge factory doibg anything different. I'm only 53 years old and expect I'll build or buy an FXRTC some day. Just wish I could walk into the dealer and but one. Wasn't being condescending. This is one reason I left Humboldt: too many people *looking* for something to get offended about.&gt;People just don't have enough to talk about

Sure they do, especially in Arcata: hot yoga,  the "energy" inherent in inanimate objects, the healing power of crystals, manifesting whatever, herbal cleanses, organic vegan friendly tattoos, pretending to love everything and everyone, this week's topic in gender studies, how to keep your dreadlocks from molding, how to manage squirrel infestations in your dreadlocks, and so on. :-)&gt;I've had that happen

Man, this happens once a day here in the SF Bay Area. Too many people texting, fucking with their GPS, driving under the influence of children, and so on. The saying "99% don't see you, the other 1% are aiming" couldn't be more True.Funny becoming jazz like that. FZ  only me a politically informed, critically thinking cynic. Does that count?This is the MOTORBIKE builders sub. And that's NOT the world's first electric bike. I've seen it happen. Guessing it's an indy shop and some retard used tire irons with the wheel on the ground instead of a tire machine. Watch someone do this sometime. The wheel is sitting on the rotor and the moron is kneeling on on side of the wheel while trying to get the tire bead off the rim on the other side, bending the rotor and gouging the rim on the asphalt/concrete/gravel. The ONLY way to do thus is to put 2x4s under two sides of the rim anf get the rotor pff the ground. Part weight, but mostly frame design and WHERE the weight is. The FXR frame was designed by a racer named Eric Buell. And that disc golf should be an Olympic sport.Yup. Sometimes indy shops *aren't* a better value than the dealer. Breakout is a Softail, and that frame will NOT "do it all". They handle like a truck compared to the Dyna. Look at the specs for "lean angle" on Harley's website. The Dyna handles MUCH better and the Softail frame has *some* rear suspension, but not enough for touring/long distance riding on any but the nicest freeway surfaces.The Breakout has only 23.5\u00b0 of lean angle to either side, almost 10\u00b0 *less* than the Dyna.They were designed to *look* like the old rigid frame bikes so many bikers loved, yes still have *some* rear suspension. They were and are a compromise, and handling and comfort is what got compromised for appearance.Needin a new motor. Nothing wronG with the Evo or 5 speed enough to make the swap before I need to.It's in your owner's manual. V/IV, KV-1, and the Jumbo (M4A3E2). All have a high rate of fire, good armor for their tier, and can get out of trouble as quickly as they get into trouble. I still don't see why they'd claim "we didn't take the wheel off, so we're not replacing it". ANY responsible shop examines a bike when it  comes in to make sure everything works and note any damage *before* working on a bike. If they didn't say "hey, your rotor is bent" before changing the tire, how the hell do they claim it was already bent before they did the tire? If it's a single-fire coil, it's basically two coils so it doesn't matter which order they fire in as long as the right plug wire is going to cylinder firing at the top of the compression stroke. You wanna switch the coil wires? Switch the plug wires at the plugs. Have the dealer do the 1K service simply because if anything was not quite right in the build and setup, they'll catch it. After that, do the 5K yourself and save a couple hundred bucks. Your owner's manual describes the service schedule. $2100 for PRINTS!?!? Those are NOT original paintings. Read the "details". They're signed prints. Wait a year and buy them used on ebay for $100. Giclee prints are not "original artwork", and while they may be signed prints, (I'm a painter with a BA in Art, so I know a bit about this), they're only valuable if there's a serious demand. Since they're for sale on ebay, I can't believe the galleries have had much luck selling the originals to anyone except the factory. 

It's like Thomas Kincade prints for sale at the mall. They cost about $40 to make and frame and they're the Beanie Babies of art. These prints are of great original artwork, but they're not $2100 prints. Hell, you could probably find original artwork as good for the same or less. I know a couple people who had warranty issues they didn't even notice that were caught at the 1K service and corrected. For someone who isn't a competent Harley mechanic and doesn't know exactly what to look for, it's worth every dime, provided the dealer isn't a complete dumpster fire. They'd rather fix unnoticed warranty stuff than have it become expensive warranty repairs a month or three later.Might have something to do with the fact that he's super thin, as well as what footgear you're wearing, and the seat on your bike. All these things can make one riding position more or less comfortable. Never regretted a dime I've spent on RedWings. I have one pair right now that I got in the dent&amp;scratch department for $75, and I couldn't actually find the blemish that got them there. My last two pairs lasted 4-6 years of everyday use. Resoled them when needed, but never ever had a problem. Some of the best boots you can buy. The only other brand with as much longevity is Danner, but those can cost twice as much as RedWings. Cool. If there's ANYTHING that you think might not be right about the bike, bring it up when you check the bike in. Any rattles, any noises, anything loose, etc. Original artwork is a clever way of saying "I didn't copy this". It's a giclee PRINT of "original artwork". If it said "original oil painting" rather than "giclee print" that would be another matter entirely. Limited edition prints mean they made prints of an original painting, but someone else owns the painting.They're nice prints of nice paintings. I just don't think a print is $2100 worth of nice unless it comes with an 18 year old Russian hooker and a nice bottle of single malt scotch. For $2100 you could get him two weeks in Tahiti, airfare and hotel includedDavid Mann did every Easyrider Magazine centerfold for something like 20 years. All paintings. Iconic images. IF you can find an original painting, that would be great. If you can only find framed posters, that'll save you about $2000They're not even paintings. They're giclee prints of paintings, and don't have anywhere near the collectible value of an original painting. Call it "to Anchorage and back" and you're OK. There are folks who have tried the Dalton on touring bikes, but they never made it. The road is so fucked up (where it crosses streams it's under 18" of water at times) that I wouldn't do it without an adventure bike like the KTM 650 or BMW GS for that one, and only if I was in much better shape than I'd be in after a 5000 mile ride diagonally across North America. 

I did the Dalton in a 4WD Blazer 20 years ago and I have absolutely no desire to ever do it again on a Harley. Ever. No place to pull over for miles on end. No way to leave your bike in the road as truck traffic is constant both directions. If I was in Anchorage and had to take the Dalton, I'd be on a KTM or in a TerraCross or MRAP or some other purpose-built rough-country truck (yes, you heard it here, I'd rather ride a KTM on in northern Alaska than a Harley).

*If* your bike survives the trip, which it won't, your paint and chrome will be *destroyed* by the time you get back, and that's if you don't get in more trouble than that with mud filling the fins on your front cylinder and head and overheating things til you seize a piston. If you manage to make the trip without foot deep mud and water part of the way, there's nothing but rocks most of the whole way and a LOT of tractor trailer traffic from the oil fields kicking up rocks as you pass them going the other direction. Nothing like a 40mph tennis-ball sized rock in the hand/elbow/face/chest/knee to ruin your day. Besides, it's a 4 day *exhausting* round trip from Anchorage to Deadhorse and back on the *right* bike. Imagine doing it on an 800lb bike with street tires? No thank you. 

The ElectraGlide is so much heavier than the KTM 650 (like 350lbs heavier) and soft dirt roads, rocks, places where the road is underwater and stretches of mud 20 miles at a pop will be a huge problem, especially since packing spare knobbies isn't exactly an option on the EG. 

Ride your bike to Anchorage then rent an adventure bike for the Dalton (makes sure you've reserved it and packed adequate gear that can transfer to the adventure bike). 

[Read this, but pay particular attention to numbers 7 and 9](http://www.motoquest.com/blogs/does-and-donts-of-the-dalton-102)

If you do the south road, I-10 is kinda boring. Honestly, if you're up to it physically, and don't mind getting tires replaced on the way with each oil change, I'd take the Alaska trip, but I would make it to Anchorage instead of Prudhoe Bay.Craigslist under "for rent" and "industrial for rent" I've never had anybody emissions test any of my motorcycles. And those prices I was mentioning are in the bay area within 50 miles of San Francisco. Merced is a bit farther out in the valley and rents there are actually reasonable. She going to the University in Merced?Learning the hard way sucks sometimes, but as long as you actually learn from it, something good comes out of it. 

Also, every time you change a tire, put in a NEW inner tube. Too much opportunity to pinch the tube taking the tire off.You can find a place in the Merced or Atwater areas, which is right next door, for very reasonable prices. Probably half of what things cost in the Bay Area proper.Never heard of meat sweats personally either. I'm 53 years old and talk to people about all kinds of things. Meat sweats? Not onceWell, at least she wouldn't need a car living in SF, But studio apartments START at $2,000/month plus utilities! That's $30,000/year! Show her the Craigslist apartments for rent section for studios in or near SF. Shell change her mind QUICKLY.IF it's from a 1990 and earlier Heritage, it will bolt right up. It's the exact same fender shape (at the front of the fender), same frame, same fender rails and oil tank. The only issue is *where* the rear seat bolt is located.

Seriously, look at aftermarket seats for your bike, and see what "other" models they fit. It's '84-90 "all Softails" usually. If the seat is off a newer Heritage, it *might* have problems with mounting up front. The ONLY time you need ABS is when you *really* need ABS- in utter emergency braking conditions or in hard braking conditions on wet/sand/gravel/mud/corner/etc. There's a great video of ABS/non-ABS comparison floating around. It's a little bit misleading, since they're just hitting the brakes as hard as they can to lock up the wheels, but if you gotta *crush* the brakes, ABS will keep you upright and stop you much faster than a non-abs bike. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dJ_UkAFW6cA&gt; I'm flabbergasted whenever I read about what the yanks pay for health services.

Believe me, so are we. It's fucking insane, but the health-care industry lobby, the malpractice insurance lobby, the medical device lobby, the ambulance lobby, and others make damned sure price never go down. If only there were a socialist running for President...Not denying it. Just never heard of it. It should. Why don't you take your seat *off* the bike, look at the mounting hardware, and compare that to the hardware on the seat you're looking at? I'm guessing you're looking at a seat online and can't just see if it'll bolt up, right? You keep telling yourself that. Most people on motorcycles in general (I'm guessing about 2/3, based on 33 years of observing other riders daily), but a somewhat higher number of those on Harleys (again, based on 33 years of sharing the road with other bikes, most of them living in the hills or near the hills) just don't have a fucking clue about the principles of motorcycle fundamentals, counter-steering, and proper braking/steering techniques. WAY too many people haven't got a clue *at all* how to ride a motorcycle beyond going straight and slowing down far enough in a curve that gravity will handle steering the bike on a banked road, since so many seem horrified that they're going to understeer a curve, and cross over into oncoming traffic. They can't *all* be new riders, and in fact I suspect most of them have been riding a while or even years, but it never occurred to them that there was something *extra* to learn, other than how to use the clutch and shifter and brake lever. The severe *lack* of motorcycle fundamentals comprehension I see on a daily basis fucking astonishes me. It shouldn't, because I've been seeing it for over a quarter century, but it does. 

Seeing people on bikes (all kinds) who clearly have no fucking clue is a daily occurrence here in California, and today was no different. Multiple bikes on the freeway when I was riding today (80F at 3PM) and twice I was in front of or behind a bike getting off the freeway at a cloverleaf (both Japanese "uprights"), once I was getting on the freeway at a 45 degree ramp behind a sport bike (traffic was going 80ish), and once merging onto another freeway with traffic going about 75 and a "Repsol" livery Honda sport bike in front of me. Only *once* (Repsol Honda) did the other bike take the cloverleaf/merge displaying anything at all like a decent understanding of motorcycle principles, and none of the others exited or merged at anything close to a reasonable speed, and getting on the freeway with traffic going 80, with the bike in front of you trying to merge into traffic at 50mph, will put a spot on your seat for sure. Fucking assholes should take a god damned class. 

No, most people buying bikes, let alone those buying Harleys for label identity reasons, seem to not care bikes that handle well, since way too many wouldn't know what to do with one if it was *given* to them. Way too many people do not understand basic motorcycle principles, and it shows. I spent 20 years living either in the Sierra Nevadas or the Trinity Alps and the hills and forests of Humboldt, Mendocino, and Trinity counties, and put about 250,000 of my 400,000+ riding miles on bikes in those conditions, and another 10 years were spent in the SF Bay Area riding the freeways and backroads, back in the 80s and early 90s when there were half as many cars on the road as there are today (according to CalTrans). Even putting 40K on a Road King in the hills of California's north coast with my footboards ground up considerably on both sides, my most common annoyance was someone else on a bike (alone or in a group with Harleys or metric cruisters/tourers) in the hills, *holding up traffic at the front of the line*, with cars backed up behind them. 

No, *most* (not all by any stretch of the imagination) people buying Harleys -and MANY people on import cruisers and sport bikes, too- *for the most part* seem to have zero interest in a bike that can handle aggressively, since what seems like 2/3 of people don't seem to know how to ride a motorcycle beyond changing gears, accelerating and decelerating, and generally driving slow or freaking out trying not understeer every corner they take the bike into. Why do you think I spend so much time pushing Twist of the Wrist and rider safety/education classes? It's because I see a *glaring* lack of understanding of motorcycle principles everywhere, and the sheer number of people who come here saying "I bought a bike and I'm figuring it out as I go" is mind-numbing. I *want* these people to learn how to get the most out of their bikes, how to spend many happy years riding safely but as aggressively as they desire, and getting the most joy they can from riding. Being scared at every curve is not "getting the most" or "getting the most joy" from your motorcycle. Not "us people", "SOME of us people". I've never voted for religious fanatics, science deniers, or war-mongers except by accident while holding my nose and voting *against* anyone calling themselves a conservative. My point, I hope, is that it's not just "the average HD customer", but "the average motorcycle customer". It's just that with far more sport and dual sport bikes out there from import companies, they're going to get a larger share of those people who want to *really* ride a motorcycle. The FXR is, as someone the other day put it, "a rider's motorcycle". I *love* this thing, I think more than I love my Road King, and I've put 60,000+ hard miles on that RK. Yeah, so why buy used from a dealership when 95+% of used bikes for great value are in private hands?&gt;I don't understand why any Harley-inclined buyer would want one.

Because Harley built them for the international "emerging markets, specifically places like India, where they're built. You know you come here about once every 60 days, trumpeting the demise of Harley and their impending doom. Maybe if the economic models in this country managed to fucking pay people a living wage, the young people who love Harleys but can't afford them would be buying them. Blaming the factory every 6 -8 weeks is getting old.

Social Security Administration today reported that MORE THAN HALF OF ALL AMERICANS MAKE LESS THAN $30K/year. Start harping on the billionaires  running corporations and fund managers who get rich at the expense of hardworking employees whose incomes have gone in the shitter steadily since Trickle Down scam artists took over tax policy in the Reagan administration.  The US Senate is even worse. Sparsely populated states elect two Senators, just like the most populous. The Republican majority in the Senate was elected by about 23% of the voting public, with 77% electing the Democratic minority. Pretty sure the numbers are accurate, but I'm on my cell.Nobody said shit about "off limits". This is a personal bitch and gripe by me.Not in northern California. :(Yeah. I bought the FXR because I've wanted one for years, and because since 2007, I've only owned one bike, and that's the first time since 1983 that i haven't had something in the garage to wrench on. Not counting 2002-2007 when I was healing a broken back and had sold my bikes. Just that I've always had a rider and a bike to work on, or two riders suited to different kinds of riding. 

If you do things right, you can find a *nice* donor bike that's *running* for under $3500. Insurance auctions have theft recovery bikes for sale all the time. It's an 800lb touring bike, but it doesn't take "crazy skill", just "basic riding fundamentals, a good understanding of *that* specific bike, and a familiarity with the road you're on."

No video, but if you want to come to northern California and head for the hills some day... But it's not grinding all the time, and once they're ground up far enough, the mounting hardware for the board hits too, and that's a lot harder than the board itself. [This photo was taken a little over two years ago, I think](http://i.imgur.com/v1VL7ZR.jpg). If you drag the lower right corner of the image, you can enlarge it. Look at how thin the back half of the footboard is compared to the front. It won't grind any farther because now it's grinding the hard cast-iron mounting bracket the footboard is mounted to. You can see the cast iron bit showing just a tiny bit below the back 1/3 of the board. There's an optical illusion making it look like it's part of the board, but it's about 6"  inboard and 4" below the exterior edge of the board itself. The boards have adjustable mounting points and I have mine as high as they will go. You can see the hard point below the board in [this pic](http://i.imgur.com/t0ahmho.jpg) and you can just see the flat/straight area that's been ground on it about 30+ degrees from the ground and inline with the corner of the board. 

No idea, since I have *zero* interest in the Street, except academically as another method to keep HD in business. The price point on the Street is still considerably higher than Hero, Royal Enfield, and others. The 750 is right at $7,000 USD (Rs 4,52,000) It's a "premium" directed at the nouveau riche who want a Harley but who don't want a 700-800lb  motorcycle or the insane price tags the imported models cost everywhere but the US. Import tariffs put the Sportster 883 Iron at about $12,000 in India, 10,000 \u20ac in Germany (thanks to Greece and Syria, that's not much more than $11,000 today- 3 years ago it was almost $13,500?!?!?). If you want a Big Twin, you're gonna pay and pay and pay. 

For the buyer, however, it's unfortunate that Harley is so late getting into the international game. Here in the US you can buy a 10 year old bike of just about any model, with under 10K miles on it for 1/3-1/2 the price of what it cost new. There are sooooooo many used bikes on the market that I was looking a 2009 FXDC Dyna earlier this year- it cost $13,000 new in 2009 and I passed on it at $6,600. The bike had only 6,000 miles on it and was pristine, never wrecked, kept indoors, and barely ridden (1K miles/year). It was worth every dime, and the guy sold it 3 days after I said "no thanks", but that's the nature of used Harley buying here in the US. 

Harley sells about a million bikes worldwide every five years. Prior to the 2008 crash, they were selling over 300,000/year! There are a LOT of used Harleys on the market and with more bikes than buyers, it's a buyer's market in a big big way. The rest of the world had yet to catch up to this and you can expect to pay "new" prices for a bike that's 3-4 years old, just like we did here in the US back in the late 90s when demand outstripped production by a large margin. The rule was "you can sell it for what you paid for it, even 5 years from now with reasonable miles on it". That's changed, of course, since Harley got caught up with production and so many people bought Harleys during the Sons of Anarchy outfreakage because they "want a Harley" but never got into riding, so there's a ton of bikes for sale with under 10K  miles on them for 1/3 the price of buying a new one. Actually, that seat is the stock [2008 105th anniversary FLHTCU Ultra Classic seat](http://i.imgur.com/Tbz8E1Y.jpg) but I completely rebuilt the driver's seat cusion and had a local upholstery shop recover it in the original pattern. I did this at a time where I just didn't have the cash for the DG seat and the stock RK seat was driving both me and the wife nuts with pain in short order. But after the reconstruction, it works so well that I have left it on there. My passengers love it and I can put 500+ miles on it in a day without my ass hurting. I don't recommend those seats for most people because I did have to completely rebuild the foam seat structure for the front half and carve that foam to fit me. 

I picked it up with a big tear in it for $40 on eBay with the intention of building it to fit my ass properly. I put it on the bike and rode it for a day and it was clearly too wide on the inner thighs and caused pressure from moment one resulting in pain after about half an hour. The lower back support was *perfect* however, and the wife fell in love with that giant pillow cushion. She rated the stock RK seat as a "2" on a scale of 1-10 and this one as an "8". The only reason it got an "8" instead of a "10" was she said it was missing "something" and if I had installed a [vibrating egg](https://i.ytimg.com/vi/Ir7_rIJPwJk/hqdefault.jpg) in the middle of the foam cushion, she would have given it a "10".  

Back in the 80s I was an upholsterer and learned how to build and rebuild seat cushions and with the newer foam products out there, I was able to build a really nice pad under the upholstery (firm/dense foam core with softer yet still dense foam for the top 3/4"). I carved it it to fit my spectacularly fat ass (electric turkey carving knife works GREAT for carving foam), and then took it to the upholsterer with the old cover as a pattern but instructions to fit the new cover to the pad I had built. 

But only a couple people on the planet have the knowledge and skills to build a seat to fit their ass, so Danny Gray gets my vote every single time if someone is going to buy one. My first two DG seats were on one of my ['48 Panheads](http://i.imgur.com/jOZ3emP.jpg) and my ['69 Shovelhead](http://i.imgur.com/CFZbdZl.jpg). Both of these photos were taken between 1994 and 1996 and Danny Gray was a newish company and I was told that DG himself built the seats. They had pics of the panhead on their website for a while. Don't know if they're still there.  

Sadly, DG doesn't sell a seat for the FXR any longer, and when I called them they said they'd take a look in their storage area to see if there were any seat pans left. There weren't, but if I were to send them a seat, they would build me a seat from scratch on that pan. I've got a really pretty Corbin 2up seat that came on it, but that seat is a complete ass killer. Here's a [pic](http://i.imgur.com/1EqltWm.jpg) from the ad I responded to when I bought the bike. It looks a lot different now, with no sissy bar, different handlebars, saddlebags, a windshield, and the [stock FXR seat- this is just for the seat reference](http://www.hotbikeweb.com/sites/hotbikeweb.com/files/styles/medium_1x_/public/import/page_element_images/1012_hbkp_07_z%2Bhistory_of_the_fxr%2B1985_low_glide.jpg?itok=eb1ROmDT) with no bitch bar. I might send the Corbin seat to them to them and ask them to do their magic to the pad and then cover it, but for now I have the stock "pillow" FXR seat and p-pad on there, and they're super comfortable (Harley built the FXR to *ride*, and their "sell them a pretty bike that needs $3000 of upgrades to make it rideable" hadn't evolved yet). One of these days...Las drogas est\u00e1n muy bueno! For those who don't read Spanish, that means "I'm a good boy but I don't read Spanish" :)My limited Spanish isn't allowing me to understand how this applies to us? Please elaborate? I don't expect you to translate the pages word for word, but if you could give us a gist of the differences between "before" and "new", and what the implications are for Harley owners, it would be greatly appreciated, as some folks I know are planning a trip to Mexico City and points south this winter.Your "bad Spanglish" is wonderful. Spanglish, as I'm sure you know, is spoken by Spanish speakers living in English speaking countries, where many many words in English have no direct translation, particularly phrases from advertising and American pop culture. "Bad Spanglish", on the other hand, is spoken only by American tourists in Spanish speaking countries. You put the word "el" in front of every noun, an put the letter "o" on the end of most words, and VOILA! You have Bad Spanglish. "No el toucho el caro". Oh yeah, and you speak more loudly and more slowly than normal, when people obviously don't understand you.Priceless.Don't forget all the really cool "my 883 Iron is more custom than yours" debates we can have over a nice half-caff, low-fat, 136 degree hazelnut latte, and the "you should put the things on *your* bike that *I* like" discussions that the cranberry scones make a perfect accent for.  Hey Bro, where's your grinder? https://vimeo.com/115733204Probably not scams, but probably not paying Harley, either. When I get home ill see if I don't have a .pdf for the '09 Dyna. No .pdf on my laptop but I'll see if someone I know doesn't have one. Might be two or three days before they get back to me, since checking email daily is not on of these guys' strong points. Should be the same bike except for the size of the cylinder bores, pistons, and rings. Tuning details would be a bit different for the EFI, but that's a different manual. I need one for a 2015 now. Gonna post a request thread here in a bit. Damn, one more excuse for la policia to fuck with people. I know they really don't give a shit about probable cause, but now it's "I pulled him over for riding between cars and he tried to escape then pulled a gun. The reason he was shot in the back 6 times is because he kept spinning around trying to point his gun at me but I was faster". Good luck, man.Thanks. Never seen filedropper before. Sneaky of them- they make it look like I have to sign up for a free trial, but it downloads anyway. Hey, it looks like I have a .pdf for a 2009 Dyna service manual on my laptop. Now I need a 2015 Dyna manual. Good friend needs one in the next 48 hours. Can't find one. Thanks. I don't even know if there is a .pdf 2015 out there ANYwhere, but I told a friend I'd look for one. I can't find one, but I'm still hoping someone here has one. Some people are man enough to ride their own bikes and not give a shit what other people think. I wore pink hair ties in my ponytail for years. Funny. No one gave shit, or at least no one ever fucking SAID anything. Funny how they can build *that* for what Harley charges for a slug of a CVO.  But honestly, I couldn't spend that kind of money on a bike. For $40,000 I can find a REALLY nice 1940 Ford Coupe with a Chevy small block, ProTouring EFI/6speed auto, and a nice interior... oh yeah, AND build a really nice Twin Cam FXR.:-) Ya know, I think people like this should just pay me  half of what they were going to pay for their bike, and I'll put a life size, high quality e photograph of their dream bike on the wall of their living room with the wheels touching the floor. That way, they feel great about not having to sell their bikes just  6-7 years later for half of what they paid for it (they were going to be out that money anyway), they get a nice bike to look at forever, and I get lots of money, minus the cost of the photograph, of course.The way I  I figure it, I'll be doing them a favor.A little to the left... farther... there ya go. Oh that feels good.:-)Good to hear. [AAA Premier](http://www.aaa.com/aaa/045/pioneer/membership/premier/benefits.htm) has some amazing benefits that cover you if you break down (collision is something else entirely)- you'll get one 200 mile tow per calendar year, three 100 mile tows (all to the destination of your choice, unlike insurance "towing coverage" which is usually "to the nearest place of repair"), it'll reimburse you for one day of car rental if your have to tow your car (non-collison), and something with trip-interruption insurance. 

Best roadside service plan to have, especially if you ride more than around town. No, I don't expect Harleys to break down, but a flat tire or anything else that goes wrong, but with AAA Premier you got nothing to worry about if id does. Good to see someone who rides their bike enough that they lose track of how many oil changes have been done. Pretty soon you're going to run out of fingers to count them on. 

How many miles each year do you put on your bike?Oh, man, good luck. It's gotta suck. I just won't ever see it as an "either/or proposition" and will always believe there's a middle way where both parties can be happy. Good luck. Holy shit. As your cousin (not really, but lookit mah username), I say it's time we go out back, dig a hole, and put Red and Snowflake in said hole. 

On a serious note (well, one more likely to be followed through on, anyway) people like this infuriate me. Good luck, cousin. There's gonna be a huge blowup, but it is NOW TIME TO STOP THIS INSANITY! Boundaries have been pushed daily by Red, and you and the wifey need to set some FIRM boundaries and STICK TO THEM. Don't let Red "negotiate a better position". It's YOUR life and YOUR wife and Red has decided she gets to choose how you live. 

Good luck Cuz. Damn. I was just talking to an AAA tow driver two days ago and he was unaware of those changes. Jeezus. Why can't good things last?!?! (the answer to "why do they....?" or "why don't they....?" is ALWAYS "money"). Nope, in California at least, it's still 200 and motorcycles included https://calstate.aaa.com/membershipApparently what you describe is the "AAA Plus" here in CA. And yes, Premier is $30 more, but I'm not sure that's any different than it's been for a while. That's one thing we did in the old days- a big old chain and padlock with the chain wrapped across the front of the freeway pegs. Noisy as hell, so guys would wrap the chain in fabric electrician's tape. 

Another guy had a set of leg irons that he fished through the spokes of his rear wheel and clamped to the frame on either side (rigid, but it'll work on a swingarm, too). Then there were the guys who used handcuffs with one end on the frame and the other on the fork tube- ghetto fork lock, but the chain was butter to a tiny bolt cutter and too many people have handcuff keys..

Every single bike is going to be so different from the next bike that it's impossible to say "a '49 is worth...." or " a '62 is worth...." with out seeing the bike itself. If you can get a bunch of pics, that's a start.

Are either of these bikes restored? Are they still all-original or have things been repaired/replaced/upgraded over the years? An original condition Pan with 25K on it *might* be worth $14K if it's pristine and everything is original condition. If he's asking more for the '62, I suspect it's because it's in more original condition though.

Can you post pics?Did you have that agreed upon budget in writing? Stick to your guns on that one. "I told you I want to spend only X on this and would not agree to spending more". But, if they said "it'll cost right around X dollars", and you said "sounds good, but call me if anything comes up" that's gonna give them wiggle room. 

Why the hell did they have the bike four months? I can build a bike from scratch, including building the engine and transmission from bare cases, lacing spoke wheels, painting every piece of sheet metal, and so forth and so on. Hell, I could probably build a frame jig, cut tubing, and build a *frame* from scratch in that time, too.

What the hell were they doing that took so damned long? What was going to take *two* months in the first place?You could always do something like [this](https://bikecafeonline.files.wordpress.com/2008/05/bike-locks.jpg) or [this](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/6b/29/4d/6b294d3ec0c595845922e305b0a711ae.jpg).Finance companies don't use *these* trackers. They use hard-wired trackers that draw their current from the car's electrical system. *These* trackers need to be recharged, and they're not going to go visit someone and replace it with a fully charged on every three weeks. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xos2MnVxe-cThe '62 is in much more collectible condition with much more hard to find stuff on it, like the original saddlebags, windshield, and the buddy seat.... BUT it's also likely to have lots of little reproduction parts on it. This is not a museum bike, and not a True restoration, but it's a complete, rideable, Panhead in really nice condition. I suspect this bike was an original condition barn find and the owner painted the sheet metal, replaced a few parts, painted others, silver (original for motor bits), and reassembled it. This bike is the most original of the two, and is therefor more valuable. 

The '49 is also in very "complete" condition, but the fort tubes are 2" over stock, and *many* things on that bike are going to be reproduction or aftermarket, including (HIGH probability) fenders, trim, tail light, seat, fork nacelle and headlight bucket. I suspect this was originally a sound daily rider or garage project that only needed original looking parts to return it to original '49 appearance, and this was done. The likely aftermarket/repro parts is why this bike is considerably less expensive than the '62. If they were original parts, this bike would be worth closer to $20,000 on today's market. 

Both could be called "good candidates for restorations", but the '62 is the only one that could be restored without hunting for a thousand little things. The '49 could more accurately be called a "tribute bike", that *looks* like the '49 Pan it was originally, but isn't due to the lack of original parts (again, I don't have proof, but there's just too many things on that bike that look way too knew, rather than refinished or restored and the price indicates this too). 

Neither is going to be museum quality work, and they both look like daily drivers. If you want a Panhead and don't care about how fast it is, the '62 will be much more comfortable (swingarm frame), heavier, and slower, unless the engine has been modded a bit for performance. The '49 is 100lbs lighter, and a bit quicker with a similar motor, but it's got a rigid frame and will require considerably more maintenance weekly to make sure things aren't falling off the bike. 

Do you know if the '49 is an FL or an EL? FL is 74 cubic inches and the EL is 61 inches. The '62 will be an FL or FLH, as they only built the 74" motor in '62.

The '49 *looks* like it might still be a 6 volt generator electrical system. If it is, batteries, ignition coils, ignition condensors and light bulbs (headlight, tail lamp, turn signals, and dashboard lamps) are available, but you're gonna be hanging if something fails when you're out on a road trip, since most auto parts stores don't carry 6V stuff at all. Napa Auto may be an exception, as the last time I needed a 6V headlight or tail light bulb, they had them in stock as late as 1999 (you ask for points, condenser, outer high/low beam, and tail light bulbs for a '56 Chevy pickup, since the parts are identical). Generators, relays, and batteries will need to be ordered from vintage shops or the internet. The '62 has been converted to 12 volt system (still generator) and the '49 may have been, too. I'd need a better image of the left side of the engine up front on the '49 to know for sure. 

I'd think the '62 is definitely more valuable, and definitely going to be more impressive visually. The '49 would be the bike for you if you *like* light-weight rigid frame bikes, and unless all that stuff is original that I think it aftermarket, I'd be riding it and slowly modding things to fit my riding style and so on, until it becomes something much more to my taste visually. Both bike would require considerable work to truly "restore" them, including replacing the electrical systems with the original 6 volt systems (dash, tail, head, and turn lights, coil, relay, generator and so on), complete disassembly, refinishing, and reassembly of every damned thing on the bike, not to mention trying to find original parts in good enough condition to restore if parts have been replaced with aftermarket over the years. 

Not sure either is going to be worth what the seller is asking though, however he'd have better luck getting what he's asking if he as in LA. Try offering him $10,000 for the '49 (if all the numbers match including engine belly numbers and it's truly a '49 fame and transmission- there's ways to tell), and $13,000 for the '62 if the belly numbers on the motor match and the frame is truly a '62). If you wave cash under his nose, and say "here's *thirteen thousand dollars*. It's yours if you sell me the '62", you might be surprised. Sellers *expect* to take a hit on asking price, so they inflate asking price accordingly. Not sure he's expecting *that* much of a hit, but it is what it is. It's the 200 miles tow that was in dispute, and AAA California's website says Premier still has a 200 mile tow and three 100 mile tows per calendar year. It used to be a crime (usury) to charge more than 6% interest in this country. Bank and finance lobbies made sure that changed a long time ago. 10% was considered "loan sharking". 29.5%? Take the fucking BUS. Tracking a shipping container generally means you don't *need* it to be awake. Tracking a person in a car, if it only wakes up every 4 hours, you've missed everything done on Friday night between 8PM and midnight, and it would only tell you where she was at midnight. If you're gonna track a car, you need an "always on" that maybe has a program that puts it to sleep if it hasn't moved in a while. Don't know if they do this, because it would have to be awake in some way to recognize the car moved, but it occurs to me as a way to save battery life. Repo men are PAID by the finance company, usually under contract. The finance company pays X dollars per repo, but the guys doing the repossessions are usually independent contractors, just like bail bondsmen "work" for the court and tow truck drivers "work" for the highway patrol. The hotter temps can't be accurate, simply because on a 100 degree day, the asphalt is generally around 140-150 degrees, and the air 4 feet above the road surface is NOT only 5 degrees hotter than the ambient air temps. I haven't taken a thermometer with me to test, but it's reasonable to assume the air is 120-125 on a new asphalt road, particularly if there's a hill or cliff face on one side of the road, working as a reflector. Not to mention the convection action of the 140-150 degree heat coming off the road surface. Or more accurately the heat coming off the 140-150 degree asphalt road surface...For someone who claims to have [three degrees "including a masters"](https://www.reddit.com/r/Portland/comments/33kun0/why_i_left_portland/cv43063), you're pretty fucking stupid.

Why is Honda still in business if Toyota makes such a good car? Seriously? That should be simple to anyone with half a brain- Not all bikes are designed to do the same thing, as someone who knew *anything* about motorcycles would know, and different bikes appeal to different people. You don't buy a race bike if you have no interest in racing and you don't buy a cruiser or touring bike if you want to be dragging your knee all the time. Do you think the ONLY reason someone would buy a bike is the reason YOU would buy a bike? Geezus. The same is True for cars. You don't buy a Dodge Challenger if you want a car to act like a Nissan GT-R, and vice versa. Also, if you knew ANYthing about Harleys, rather than just coming here to ask asshole questions like "If Harley is so good, why haven't they put everyone else out of business, huh?" you'd know that the used Harley market is FLOODED and Harleys have *shit* resale. 

There's ZERO intelligence or knowledge in the horrible premises of this question. You wanna try acting like an adult and as a better question? OP [claims to have three degrees including a Masters](https://www.reddit.com/r/Portland/comments/33kun0/why_i_left_portland/cv43063). The premises in this question are indicative of either a functioning moron or a troll or both. I'd start at ebay for both [T-bars](http://www.ebay.com/sch/i.html?_from=R40&amp;_trksid=p2047675.m570.l1313.TR0.TRC0.H0.X14%22+t+handlebars.TRS0&amp;_nkw=14%22+t+handlebars&amp;_sacat=0) and [MX bars](http://www.ebay.com/sch/i.html?_odkw=14%22+mx+bars&amp;_osacat=0&amp;_from=R40&amp;_trksid=p2045573.m570.l1313.TR0.TRC0.H0.X14%22+mx+bars+harley.TRS0&amp;_nkw=14%22+mx+bars+harley&amp;_sacat=0). There's a few different 14" MX bars on there, nice ones for about $100 less, and the bars I got on there are pretty nicely made.

You're paying a LOT for the name, but the WCTB bars will definitely be made properly. But for $270 you ought to be able to get him a *really* nice set of bars AND an evening at a strip club, private dance included. 

LA Choppers, Burly, Zombie Performance and others sell nice T-bars, but I don't know about the 14" size. But their bars are nice stuff, too. Can't help you with the "bungs". What some people do is buy plain bars and mount the gauges to an [external bracket](http://www.hdforums.com/forum/attachments/dyna-glide-models/93624d1265355818-tall-drag-bars-dsc00109.jpg) or a setup made of tall risers and "drag bars" or ["MX bars"](http://s223.photobucket.com/user/gartec/media/dynachopper3.jpg.html) separately. If the tach and speedo are mounted to his handlebar riser clamp now, they'll mount to any set of risers that take the stock top clamp. 

You'll also want to know whether or not he would like to run his wiring internally, since bars that are made *for* internal wiring are somewhat different than those that aren't, and not all can be modified for internal wires (if they have solid risers, it's a no-go). 

You might be better off putting cash in an envelope marked "For Handlebars ONLY! Any other use will result in an incurable case of celibacy".I like riding in hot weather and do so often. I put 50spf sunblock on ALL exposed skin, wear light leather gloves, a white cotton t-shit under a loose cotton long sleeve shirt or Levis road vest, and loose but *heavy* leather chaps on my legs (large air gap insulation and leather doesn't transfer heat well, so I don't feel any heat from the air-cooled motor on the inside of my legs in traffic or in town, or the direct sun on the top of my thighs- for some reason I can't get others to believe how comfortable they are in 100\u00b0F weather). The sun block is a UV filter/reflector so it makes the sun signifIcantly less intense on exposed skin. I always have two liters of water in my safdlebags, replacing it at gas stations as I consume it. 

This summer, I had occasion to measure road surface temps in the Sierra Nevada mountains using a digital pyrometer I have for measuring cylinder head temps. I didn't bring a digital thermometer, but I should have, as I've only ever breathed air close to as hot working in a bronze foundry with gas forges designed for melting bronze at 2800\u00b0F. National Weather Service told my phone the temp in Angels Camp was 103\u00b0F when I stopped for an iced tea and some air conditioning, but I suspect it was a few degrees hotter at the time (I ride in hot weather a LOT).

I had been up there the week earlier and the temp was reported as 101 when I stopped in Angels Camp that day, it was so much hotter coming down the hill on Highway 4 that my air-cooled 2008 Road King was experiencing noticeable power loss at 75-80mph on the hottest stretches.

So the next time I went up the hill a week later, I packed my pyrometer in the saddlebag out of curiosity. NWS said it was "only" going to be 95\u00b0 Angels Camp, so it seemed like a good day to measure the road temp and I didn't worry about motor issues that day. It turned out it was even hotter (103\u00b0 by my phone) when I stopped that day for iced tea before heading back towards the Bay but I decided to stop and measure anyway.

Coming down the hill I passed through several cuts in the terrain, and the air temps increased so significantly that it went from "hot as hell" to "I just put my face in an oven" until I had passed back out of the cuts. I'd never felt air this hot on the bike before, even in summer in  Arizona.

I stopped on the shoulder to measure the road suface temp on the downhill stretch of California Highway 4 Between Copperopolis and the valley floor on the way to Farmington, as I entered one of the cuts where the road bed passed through a finger of land. There was an engineered grade of about 45\u00b0 on both sides, starting about 8 feet from the edge of the asphalt rising to a height of about 40' on one side and 25' on the other.

The road surface was in direct sunlight on my side of the road, and I didnt shut the bike off as I was worried I wouldn't be able to get it started again. I was only stopped for less than a minute, but it was time enough to get off the bike, get the pyrometer out of the bag, turn it on and put the probe on the asphalt, put it back in the bag and get back on the bike. 

The road surface was 148\u00b0F. I measured twice to be certain. There was no wind at all and breathing was really uncomfortable. I suspect the air temp was close to 130\u00b0F, but it felt like an oven and I'm never doing that again. Ever.

Is that specific enough? :-)

 That's fucking priceless.I'm 53 and still learning to adult too. I still don't have a clue what I want to be when I grow up, either. Good luck.When I was 8 years old, I was with my family visiting relatives in the Shenandoah valley (1970ish, so still mostly rural). We were out at the old "family home" with its small 18th and 19th.century family cemetery, the building that used to be the "slave quarters" (no shit), and the "crick" that ran past the house about 50' downhill in back.

I was walking with my folks and my mom's great uncle down the dirt road that ran between the house and the creek (two sunken dirt tire paths with grass growing between them, really) and since I was an 8 year old kid, I was trotting along about 10' in front of them... when I saw a dull black stick in one of the tire tracks about 7 or 8 feet in front of me. Being a kid, I made a beeline for the stick. 

My 87 year old great uncle, who must have seen it at the same time I did, moved fast enough that he closed the distance between us and grabbed me and picked me up as I was about three feet away from what turned out to be a 4' cottonmouth. He nope me the fuck outta there for me. We were apparently about half an hour from the nearest hospital and as a small kid, it could have ended badly. &gt;I expect to be able to sell my FXDL for close to what I paid for it for years to come,

This is very interesting, and I really hope you respond to my question in detail. I've encountered this widespread belief that Harleys have a great resale value, over and over and over again. Back in the late 90s, when Harley had a hard time keeping up with demand, the reality was that you could sell your bike for exactly what you paid for it, even 5 years later. Todays, something else is very True, and the used Harley marked is *flooded* with like-new, low-miles pristine bikes that owners are unable to sell for even half of what they paid for them, 6 or 7 years after they were new.  

Can you please explain why you are under this impression? Is it because the prices *listed* on Craigslist are so high, or was this something you've been told by someone when you bought your bike, or what your friends and acquaintances tell you? Did you sell a bike 15 years ago before Harley had caught up with demand and still believe the used bike market is the same as it was then? Is it some conclusion you've drawn based on prices at dealers, online listing prices, or something else entirely?

It's a widespread belief, and the number of early 2000s Dynas listed on Craigslist for more than they cost new is astonishing. 

I'm not trying to embarrass you with this question. I'm really hoping for enlightenment on why so many people believe this. If this bursts your bubble about used bike value, you have my apology for that, but I'd really love some insight as to where this belief comes from and why soooooo many bikes are listed on CL and ebay for as much or more than the bikes cost new.

Please? Sorry about your loss. That sucks. Can you please post more pics of this bike? The one pic is so dark it's really hard to see. The bicentennial FX was a great looking bike. 

Again, sorry for your loss. Ride safe. Start with fresh tires and expect to change your rear at least once during the trip if it's cross country. If you're doing coast to coast and back, you can expect to change a front before you get home, too. 

Don't be afraid to stop and buy a windshield. Long hours fighting high speed wind is tiring as hell. You'll never regret it.

But rain gear including goggles if yoy dont eear a full face with a shield.. It doesn't take up much space.

Other commenters have it right on the money: a comfortable seat makes all the distance between 300 miles per day and 500-700+ miles per day. 

Plus 1 on the foam earplugs. Hearing damage is very real and cumulative and long hours in the saddle are a real danger to your hearing. I buy tapered 3M foam earplugs by the hundred on Amazon for about $10. 

Pack water. Dehydration can kill you, both with physical issues and with mental fatigue affecting reaction time and judgement.

Don't forget oil changes on the way. Most bike shops will give "road people" priority for repairs and service. Dealers too.

Have AAA Premier road service. Hell, have it anyway. It'll cover a 200 mile tow and three 100 mile tows each calendar year. If something breaks in the middle of nowhere, it can be the difference between getting the bike to a dealer three counties over and a $400 towing bill.

Go to www.motorcycleroads.com and look at the areas you're visiting and plan the best routes. 

BUY A DISC ROTOR LOCK AND USE IT ON YOUR REAR BRAKE ROTOR EVERY TIME YOU WALK AWAY FROM YOUR BIKE!!!!!! Way too many travelers gave their bikes stolen from motel parking lots. Do NOT keep your spare key fob anywhere but in your pocket. People have been known to walk up and start a bike and ride off because the key fob was in someone's luggage. Happened to someone here less than a month ago. Do NO eVe luggage on the bike overnight. Ever. If you are staying in motels, try to get downstairs rooms and park in front of your room with the window open at night. If it's cold out, use the heater. If you get stuck in an upstairs room, park the bike as close to the motel night manager's window or the lobby door as possible, and LOCK UP YOUR BIKE.

Go online and look at discussions about which states have particularly assholeish state police and highway patrol and keep your speed adjusted accordingly. 

If you're packing a gun without a CCW, do not leave it on your bike when you can't see the bike. If you have a CCW, wear it. But a holster that's comfortable on the bike or carry something small enough to fit in a coat or vest "piece pocket". If you don't have a CCW, and you can't deal with a jail stay and impound charges for the bike, it might be better to leave your gun at home. I've never need one in the last 25 years or so (I did a couple times back in the 80s but those were situations of my own making). If you're going places as a tourist like museums and historical sites, make sure you know the relevant carry laws there, as you dont want to leave a gun strapped to the sissy bar while you're spending 3 hours watching the latest IMAX film.

Have fun. Take yime to SEE things. Visit the world's largest ball of twine. See Car Henge. Go to the National Gallery and the National Air and Space Museum. 

Ride safe. 
Your '03 what? How many miles? '03 Dynas with under 30K miles are selling for $5K *today*. '03 Street Glides for $6K, Road Kings, the same. 883s $2500-3000, 1200s $3000-3500. If a bike has more than about 25K miles on it, it's considerably harder to sell unless it's the lowest price bike of that model within 150 miles, and even then, once you get over 40K miles, nothing except fire sale prices will result in a sale in most cities in the country, since there's so many identical bikes with under 20K miles on them for sale for reasonable prices. Why would anyone pay for a bike with twice (or more) as many miles on it unless the price was over $1000 less than the bike with 15K miles that's listed for a reasonable price.

How many miles? What model? Are there any *top shelf* performance mods (nothing else adds value, unless the bike has less than 10K miles on it, and even then it's only about 10 cents on the dollar for add-ons, and only if they've been kept pristine and aren't scratched/pitted up from washing/polishing/weather.

The ONLY exception seems to be the Road Glide since so many people see the guys in the big outlaw clubs, and inner city folks love them, increasing demand. Every other bike (except maybe the XR1200) is going to be priced at about the same price as every other bike that vintage.  

By the way, people travel to buy used bikes all the time. The cost of a $100 shuttle flight with riding gear in a carry on can increase the pool of available bike a thousand fold. Ah saw that it was the '03 FXDL. In 5 years, you'll be lucky to sell that bike for $4000- 4500, but I doubt it'll go below that, unless the miles are really high. That seems to be the bottom for Dynas, no matter how old, provided they're in nice, running condition. When did you buy it and what did you pay for it? I was under the impression from your original comment that you bought it new.Well, there's a [2007 FXDL with ONLY 5000 miles on it in the Boston area that's been on CL for *a month](http://boston.craigslist.org/gbs/mcy/5238673711.html) listed for $7,000, with SE xhaust, a helmet and jacket included. The fact that it's been up for a month means it's WAY overpriced, I wouldn't pay more than $5000 for this bike, MAYBE $5,500. If your bike is 4 years older, what do you think your bike, probably with more miles on it, will *sell* for today (rather than what it will sit on Craigslist with no offers)?

Not doing this to bring bad news, but don't every buy a Harley as an "investment". It's not. 20 years ago it was, but once Harley got caught up with production by Y2K and then the crash in 2008 and the Sons of Ikea outfreakage putting a million bikes in peoples' garages that they never really got into riding, and you're gonna just have to decide that you love your bike and want to keep it forever. :)Yup. Can't do a leather jacket at those temps without massive vents, but I NEVER feel the motor heat on my legs. What most people don't realize, especially those selling chaps, is that chaps are jot supposed to fit snugly. They NEED to be too big on the legs for heat and cold insulation, and especially so the back of the knees don't bind and cause discomfort.

My chaps are heavier than most and appear to be two sizes too big. With leather inner thigh shields on the bike between my upper thighs and the reat exhaust and head, I can sit at a traffic light in Lodi on a 100\u00b0 day and not feel the motor heat on my legs. Sun either.

Thin chaps transfer way too much heat (and shed heat way too fast in wind/cold weather) and you will feel most of the sun on the top of your legs.

When it's too hot for a leather jacket, I switch to a *heavy* leather road vest, and once it gets above 90-95, I switch to a Levis cutoff. Great insulation and wicking action snd provides a minimum of armor against road rash.

Hope this is useful.Oh, I'm not comfortable at 105-110. I draw the line on planned rides at forecast 101-102\u00b0. The slathering on of 50spf sun block, and reapplication every time I stop, along with heavy hydration (minimum 1 liter per hour) and cotton on top and I'm fine at 100-104. I responded to another comment in detail about the heavy leather chaps. It's worth a read. Yeah, those cuts on Highway 4 were like a convection oven. Fortunately they're only 100 yards or so wide at a stretch.I haul 275-285lbs around every day, so I'm used to it. :-)Ah. Sounds about right. Too often people come here (and elsewhere) thinking their 2003 Dyna is worth $12,000. Go to any California Craigslist page and you'll see several bikes of this vintage with insane price tags because people seem to think the seat of the bike is stuffed with $100 bills or something. 

Don't be too sure about the metrics. Ever since gas prices hit $4-$5 in California a couple years ago, even though prices have dropped considerably since then, $1000 metrics were suddenly $3000 metrics, and $3000 metrics were suddenly $4500 metrics, simply because of fuel economy. A friend bought a 1980s Suzuki 650 upright back in 2006 for $2000. In 2011, he sold it for $4,000, as prices were going through the roof. As long as gas prices continue to fluctuate, you're gonna see high fuel mileage bikes bring premium prices. 

I've never bought and sold metrics, so I can't speak for most models and crotch rockets certainly don't hold their value because so many get wrecked and rebuilt, but for pristine, original condition bikes from the 70s, 80s, and 90s, people are paying a premium for reliability, lack of traffic constraints, and fuel economy alone. IT's only a single extra layer, but HEAVY leather and LOTS of space between the leather and the legs. Leather doesn't transfer heat well at all, unless it's touching the heat source (like a jacket and lining on your back in hot weather). Most peoples' chaps and riding leathers are way too snug on the legs and way too thin. 

I pack two liters of water between layered riding gear in the left saddlebag. It stays relatively cool, and there's no exhaust underneath to heat the bag. By having stuff below and above it, it insulates the water bottles so I end up having a nice cool liter of water each time I stop. You'll sweat out that much on a 100 degree day in an hour, but you won't feel it because it'll evaporate before it makes your clothes wet.

By the way, I LOVE my FXR. I feel like a traitor because I like it more for under 200 mile rides than the Road King. Just bought it in July and finally got all the seals and such replaced and every bolt LocTited (it sat for 20 years), rebuilt the master cylinders and flushed the fluids, swapped the 70 tooth pulley for a 65, and swapped on new bars. Now that it's tight and solid, isn't turning 4K rpm at 80mph anymore, and gets much better gas mileage. Also, I don't worry about anything falling off the bike since I've turned just about every nut and bolt on everything except engine and transmission internals. 

Any 30 year old bike I bought, no matter how pretty was going to get this treatment, especially since it was built 20 years ago and promptly placed in the guy's car collection in a "barn" that was nicer than my house, and probably never ridden in all that time. He put new Metzelers on it and a fluid service before selling it, but all that time sitting meant I couldn't trust anything with certainty and the seals were getting tired and drying out. Except for the Road King, I've built every older bike I owned, and there was a surprising lack of trust I felt because I didn't know the bike intimately. No longer. I've put about 4K miles on it since August, 1000 in the last week alone, and it's solid. 

I'm finally ready to take it to the hills. I'm a bit annoyed by fuel capacity at 3.8 gallons after 8 years with a 6 gallon tank, but with the 65T rear pulley, I've brought it up from 30mpg on a long ride at 75mph between gas stops with the 70T pulley to 36mpg at the same speed, which adds 20 miles between stops, but seriously, gas every 115 miles? I feel like I'm on a Sportster! All it really needs now is paint. Just posted newer pics. Still gotta paint it. I have the original receipt from Bob Dron's Harley for $6800!If I ever break this motor, I'll find a donor TC-103 bike with a 6 speed and go to town on the frame (I have a shop nearby that does nothing but FXRs, including frame mods for TC motors).Oh, I fell in love with the 1125R the moment it was released, and the latest ERB bikes right before folding were something I was looking forward to hitting the used market in a few years. That fucking fringe makes my anus pucker every time I see it! Wow. It turns out those original bars were 6" WIDER than the 16" apes on the Road King, and I bought this bike as a lane-splitter. Didn't go with T-bars because I didn't want my speedo and tach between me and things I need to see on the road. These base allowed me the same geometry with the speedo and tach still mounted to the handlebar risers right at the triple clamp. 

And it's gonna be Dupont Centari Pitch Black #99 catalyzed enamel. I still have most of a gallon plus all the primers, catalyst, and other things from when I painted all my bikes in the 80s and 90s. Yeah, I know everyone does powdercoat and epoxy and lacquer, but I love catalyzed enamel, even if California doesn't allow people to sell or use it any longer. The 2up Corbin that was on there was fucking PAINFUL. I called Danny Gray and they didn't have any seats, nor did they have any old seat pans in storage (they looked). But they said if I send them the Corbin seat, they'll build me a seat on the pan. I'm gonna do that next after paint. Have you seen EBR's newer bikes? Also Rotax motors, but 160hp. :)The speedo says "Police" above the odometer, tach has a fuel gauge above the rpm sweep and the tank has a volt meter on it above the filler cap. The bike sat for so long under florescent lights that the volt meter face is bleached gray except where the needle sat on the pin. There's a nice black needle silhouette under it that I get to stare at when the bike is running. Did you really just say "dank as hell"? Wow. It'll be "dope as fuck" too. :):-) I *think* that's supposed to be a comment on me having an identifiable writing style. A couple other people here, including one English teacher, have pointed out that I have a distinct writing style. Although I guess it could be that very few other people will take 18 pages to answer a simple question with a simple answer.

My first thought when reading your comment was "is that because of my verbose, pedantic, overly detailed writing style, or the fact most three syllable words are spelled correctly?"

Spent most of my life with a safe full of guns here. Lots of friends have carry permits. Just certain laws are different and the state thinks that certain huns are somehow more dangerous than others. Silly, I know, but do a google search for how many guns were sold in California this year. You'll be surprised.I take THAT as a compliment, even if it's a bit of an exaggeration. There's a few others who know more than I do about bikes built after 1984, and a couple who know about older bikes well enough. Most of them don't like writing though, or have a life (since the divorce 18 months ago, I've had a lot more time to write). But thanks. That matters.Nicely done. Do you have a pic of it from the sides? Would love to see some. They don't allow any catalyzed enamel at all. Acrylic lacquer either, but that only means you can't buy it in the paint stores. No one is going to kick in your doors and make you stop spraying it unless you own a body shop and CAL OSHA inspects nThey don't allow any catalyzed enamel at all. Acrylic lacquer either, but that only means you can't buy it in the paint stores. No one is going to kick in your doors and make you stop spraying it unless you own a body shop and CAL OSHA inspects nThe only people I have ever heard saying that they aren't real Harleys are people who own them who think people believe they aren't real Harleys. If you could find more than one comment in the last 2 years here on this sub, I would be very surprised.Pointing out (accurately) that it's a starter bike isn't a jab, nor is it a veiled claim that it's somehow not a real Harley, anymore than pointing out that most riders will outgrow an 883 within three months of buying it. HAH! Well food for thought- people thrilled that they just bought a Street or an 883 are probably creaming their pants that they finally own a HARLEY!!!!!! Try not to piss in their porridge until they've at least had time to do an oil change maybe? They'll figure it out for themselves, eventually... unless it turns out to be exactly the bike for them. :)&gt; When it comes to what people can do I'm very liberal but when it comes to what the government can do I'm very conservative.

That's called being a thinking human being. There's more than a few of us out there. My political views would probably be best described as "social democrat" in the German sense (no, not National Socialist, silly). I believe in individual rights being paramount, but I've also read Rousseau's Social Contract and agree with most of his points. I like the WHOLE Bill of Rights, not just the Second Amendment, and there's a LOT of people who feel the same way as I do here in Cali. Conservative medial just does everything they can to make it sound like everyone here is a member of PETA and chasing rainbows. :) By the way, that was some cool rainbows I saw last week before the windowpane had worn off. Which comments, exactly, do you think are disparaging? The one where someone says "wait til you ride your first Big Twin?" that's *encouraging*, not disparaging. The one where YOU said "I would have opted for a Sportster instead... there's something about the styling I don't like"? That's valid personal opinion and makes no disparagement of the bike or its owner. Sure, it's kinda tacky to shit on someone's parade when the parade just started, but some people just can't get over the fact that people can get by without their negative opinion. Other than that, I don't see a single negative comment, and those aren't disparaging or "thinly veiled" comments that it's not a "real Harley", unless you mean *your* comment, at which time, you're wrong. It's got a Harley badge on it and came from their design labs. Doesn't look like others, but it'll bring a LOT of new customers to the company, and may well save the product line. Yes, and it's usually engineering. I've gone on at length about what makes a Harley so different from other V-twin touring bikes and cruisers, and they'll always be True so long as Harley continues to build V-twins on a common crankpin. Meaning now that you're ONE OF US, you should begin saving for the next bike that makes you ONE OF FEWER OF US (those who own more than one Harley). Then when you have two bikes, one for around town and one for long-haul riding, you should begin saving for the next bike that makes you ONE OF VERY FEW OF US (those who have three or more Harleys, and can look at the rest of the world and say "I don't care what you throw at me. I'll always have more Harleys than you do and THEY MAKE ME HAPPY!!!".

Welcome to the tribe. 

Have you taken a rider safety class yet? If not, *sign up today*! It'll save your life. Go to the wiki tab at the top of the page and scroll down to the New Riders section and spend the 90 minutes watching the movie linked there. The skills you'll learn watching that movie with both save your life and exponentially increase your motorcycle riding skills and your enjoyment on the road.

Ride safe! I remember the first time I got on a Harley that was MINE! I thought "FUCK! This thing is falling apart! What the fuck did I just buy?!?!?" 

:)Meh, who knows, maybe he's the one guy who found an Ironhead that was put together correctly by its previous owner... Nah, Prolly not.I agree with you 100% about health care. Fortunately, I live in an Obamacare state and me and the wife have FULL coverage through Kaiser for $400/month with a $20 copay. I was paying $1000/month to keep insurance with my back injury before the ACA. I have EXACTLY the same coverage and added the wife (now ex) at the same time, for $600/month *less*. It's not perfect, but it's a start. Looks GREAT! Can we see the other side of the bike, too?!?V-Twin is a Harley parts aftermarket seller, somewhere between Drag Specialties and Colony. They have everything from tires and wheels, rebuild kits for everything, handlebars, controls, brakes, and so on to gas tanks, tank badges, transmission parts, Knucklehead gasket sets, and Twin Cam stuff. I've bought a lot of stuff from V-twin over the years. In fact, I just bought a rear wheel pulley spacer last week. Everything is perfectly serviceable, so long as it's installed properly. The chrome is pretty, and things fit properly.  For most people working on their own bikes, V-twin makes perfectly serviceable parts for most Harleys on the road. The only people who talk shit are the people who think $600 for a Roland Sands cam cover is "normal"It's fine on the freeway, and great for a first bike. But keep in mind it's not a touring bike. It's designed for around town and short hop rides and does that perfectly. It'll GO on the freeway and you can GO long distances on it, but there are bikes designed to do that which will do it a lot better (just as they'll do it a lot better than a Sportster, which does what it's designed for, exceptionally well). 

If you're buying a first bike, maybe you should look into buying a used bike. You can save a *lot* of money, have a shitload of different options to choose from, and for the same price as a new Street 750, you could get into a low-miles, pristine Dyna from 2010-2012, or for half that price, a low-miles, pristine 1200 Sportster from the mid-late 2000s. 

Would you be planning on riding just in town, or do you think you'll get the bug like the rest of us and want to head for the open road on your days off, racking up the miles on weekends with bugs in your teeth? (that means you were smiling while riding). &gt; I can't get over how much better it is than my old gixxer.

That's awesome to hear. Which GSXR did you have, and what is it about the Street that you love so much more (aside from the fact that *it's a fucking HARLEY!*?) :)&gt;My wife is already sick of me obsessing over my bike. 

Did you get a passenger seat for the bike? If not, you should. She may fall in love, too. If she doesn't, you wouldn't be the first guy whose wife thinks of herself as a "weekend widow to a Harley". But try to get her involved. You never know. SHE might be the one to talk about "the optimal number of Harleys is N+1, with N beign the number of Harleys you own now". :)Have you read the "buying a used Harley?" link on the sidebar? You should. You'll be surprised at how much money you'll save buying used, and how much bike you can get for very little money. I'm patient. :) Looks great though. I really like the fact that the bike looks like it was put together *correctly*. This is a bike that you're gonna *need* to do weekly eyeball maintenance to, if just to make sure things aren't coming loose. Every time you find a loose nut or bolt, don't just tighten it. Take it off and add blue LocTite 243, and reassemble and you'll never have to tighten that bolt again. Too many older bikes, especially those bike with the motor hard mounted to the frame, can shake apart over time if people aren't staying on top of things. This bike looks like it was put together by someone who really cared about Harleys, so it may already be done, but it's better to be safe than sorry.

Pretty bike. Loves me some Shovelheads. 

That's gonna have to be my next purchase, since I can find a "needs TLC" daily rider here in California for about $3000-3500, take it apart and put it together the way I want for not too much money. 

Ride safe!Sorry to hear. Look into Danny Gray seats. You won't be sorry. Memphis Shades sells an inexpensive detachable windshield that works perfectly and looks like the Harley one. 

Glad you made it home safely. I think I'm going to turn my comment into a sidebar link. Make sure you get one with a minimum 14" windshield, otherwise it'll just keep a little bit of air off your chest, and not perform like it should. Any reason why you don't want a windshield? By the way, avoid Coneley. Too expensive and not really well finished inside. Good to hear. Not EVERYone wants a bike they're gonna have to drag their knees to get the best out of. I LIKE sitting upright. I LIKE a 6 speed transmission. And I LOVE me some Harley Davidson motorcycles. I've owned Harleys since December 1982 and I'm on my 8th and 9th bikes now. Got on my first Harley and never looked back. Never bought anything else, either. Nice on the air cleaner cover. I love having friends with machine/fab shops. Don't any longer, since the Bay Area is just too damned expensive for many such places (and my bikes have been *reliable* and haven't needed shit for 8 years), but in the old days, it was "head over the Jim's machine shop with a 12 pack at the end of the work day and spend the evening making shit". I miss that. Don't worry. Black catalyzed enamel is in her future.You, too, can own an early 90s FXR for about $5,000 or a bit more is someone has done some really nice things to it. What part of the country are you in?Thank you. I agree. I.... I... can't keep the  turquoise. It's faux marble with a hot pink pinstripe. Yeah, the tank decal isn't a decal. It's hand pinstriped lettering and graphics, but it looks like 1996 puked on my bike. Just yesterday, someone asked "is the Miami Vice bike yours?" and while I don't give a shit what most people thinks, I love shiny black paint with lots of chrome and polished aluminum. Black catalyzed enamel is going on this winter. It's also linked as a sidebar link, as is the "for new riders or relatively new riders who want to improve their knowledge of motorcycle fundamentals" link.Good to know. I was beginning to wonder about your Y-Chromosome Foundation membership and whether or not I should recommend to the Board that you be censured and possibly expelled. :)Really pretty. I like shiny black motorcycles. I understand. One thing I've found over the years is that *some* things that are popular with the poser crowd, really *are* useful, like the knuckledusters, DayMaker/LED headlights, T-bars for splitting lanes, etc. But let us see if if you find a fairing you like. The FXDX fairing with a tall windscreen sounds like exactly what you're looking for.... if you can find one.  If you're not going to drain the tank, get a bottle of fuel stabilizer for winter storage. As stated by others, get a battery tender and get the wheels off the ground and strap it to the bike jack with ratcheting tie downs. Plug the exhaust with steel wool from the paint section at the hardware store to keep critters from nesting in there or storing acorns (#0000 steel wool won't scratch the chrome or finish on the tips and critters won't chew through it like cloth or paper).

Then go buy cold weather gear and a windshield, rain gear and goggles, and het the bike out and ride it when it's not raining or snowing. :-)One other thing to add.... buy thermal.underwear, leather chaps, gauntlet gloves, silk glove liners, and a fleece gaiter for your neck and face, and don't worry about how cold it gets. :-)You say Blockhead, I say Evo. PotAYto paTAHto.  Let's just say Dyna. :-)What city are you in? Those prices may be what yoy "see", but have you read the Wiki about buying a used Harley? It's also a link on the sidebar. 

$3000 will get you a nice 1200 Sportster. Save another$500-$750 and you can get a really nice 1200 Sportster or a running Shovelhead. Make it anothe $1000 and you can find a rideable mid-1990s Dyna. All if you know how to look for used Harleys That link will show you how to look.  It's a buyer's market and its *flooded* with low miles bikes that people can't sell. Overpriced bikes don't sell unless someone comes along and pays too mu ch because they haven't done their homework.

What city?Just saw your other message. What city are you in?:) Yup, painting it myself. Nope, no pinstripe, unless an old pinstripe buddy is around somewhere. Ooooh, spicy. :)Good to hear. I LOVE my 16s. Most comfortable riding position I know. Glad you like em. YouTube is useful.Hop a shuttle to Dallas with riding gear in your backpack. Ride em home. 

http://dallas.craigslist.org/ftw/mcd/5278298563.html Offer $5000 cash.

http://dallas.craigslist.org/dal/mcy/5244393680.html Offer $4800. Been up a month. No takers.
Cool. Late 80s? How'd we convince you to get that bike? Just curious? I know we're like "Sportster central" here sometimes, but did you post about what bike to buy, etc?Nice. ThanksCool. I actually wrote most of these without looking at that. I'll take a look later and see if I need to modify...He's right, it WILL run a LOT better with muffler pipes. Could be warped rotor. When you grab the brakes, at higher speed, do you feel vibration through the bars (warped rotor will translate to side to side vibration at the handlebars- not wild, but annoying)?Is there an adjuster in the middle of the cable or at the cable stop down near the transmission? Did that back off? The clutch hub adjuster nut may have come loose under the derby cover and may have backed the adjuster out there. When my bike was only 4 months old the dealer had to replace both rotors because they warped. When you get new rotors, &amp; I don't think they will warranty them because of the age, get floating rotors.Of the cable end is locked in place at the cable drum in the lever, and the adjuster is set right in the clutch disc, it's POSSIBLE, but not likely, that the cable has stretched, but doesn't do that so fast. Clutch hub nut is supposed to be torqued to 45-60ft/lbs with red LocTite on it. IF the previous owner did the clutch himself, it's possible the clutch hub nut has backed off. [Click on the download prompt](https://www.scribd.com/doc/233530061/Hd-1984-1998-Flh-Flht-Fxr-Fxsb-Fxef-Service-Manual).What the fuck?!?!?I was able to just open it and read it or download it without paying.It's a whole manualMake sure your caliper bolts are secure now- the ones that hold them to your fork legs. It should be free. Can you read it in the browser without downloading?The whole thing.Ah. Was looking at that first pic and thinking... "ummm...... where?"Try it again. If you paid the $9, it should download a WHOLE service manual. It's not the factory manual, but it is complete. The index is on page 739Reload the page and try it. I may have screwed up the link. But it's got 939 pagesGlad it's working. Index pg 739 I think.  Whoever wrote this interviews one guy who works on Hondas and comes to the conclusion that Harleys are only old white guy bikes? Expert, huh? 

He should actually go somewhere that there's a bunch of Harleys and see *exactly* how many people under 40 and even under 30 are riding them. Here in northern California, I'd say it's 80% &lt;40, 20% &gt;40. That may be just those *on the road*, and there may be a bunch of old white guys whose bikes sit in the garage, but there's a ton of young, active riders within 100 miles of me. Most of them very young. Yeah, it's worth it, but like the other commenter said, there are other, less expensive products out there. You should make this a question for the sub. Submit a text post and ask. Lots of people will give you the naames and vendors of alternative products they have purchased.Yes, but two things are critical- the correct tools and the Harley *factory* service manual (oh yeah, and reading *everything* carefully, twice, *then* following the steps in the service manual to the letter). If you have the right tools (good ft/lb and in/lb torque wrenches- cheap these days, 12 point sockets, allen wrenches (allen sockets are great, too), socket set with several extensions, valve spring compressor, end wrench set) you can do this so long as you follow the Harley *factory* service manual letter by letter. 

The service manual is a great way to learn how to work on your bike, but you can NOT skip steps. Things like checking end gap on piston rings, torquing head/cylinder bolts in correct sequence and steps, installing pushrods and allowing lifters to "bleed down", installing intake manifold seals, and replacing exhaust seals and installing exhaust clamps in the *correct* order, are all critical to the bike running correctly when you're done. But that's all in the service manual. 

I was lucky enough to get detailed instruction from a couple old bikers 30 years ago about the correct way to do things (and more importantly, showing me the results when others did things incorrectly), and my knowledge was *all* related to pre-Evo bikes, but I've been able to do everything that doesn't include electronic diagnostics on my 2008 Road King, without having to call anyone. All by following the service manual. 

It helps to have a proper bike lift (Handy makes the best), so you can put your work in front of you without having to sit on the floor or kneel down, but a good bike jack will do in a pinch, provided you tie the bike to the jack with ratcheting tie downs and don't try to move it when it's on the jack (good chance of knocking the whole shebang over). Nicely done. It's so gratifying when you pick up the last wrench and turn the key and push the start button and everything works perfectly. You can get a perfectly good, low-miles Dyna from the early-mid-2000s for $5000 in any state in the Union. Sounds awesome. I'm just really partial to being able to ride a bike onto a lift 4" off the ground, and raise it up 3' so I can stand up straight while I work on things. Can you post a pic of the stand?That will cost you much more in the long run for a less reliable bike than buying a rideable Dyna or later model Evo Sportster (which you can get for $2000-2500 for a late 90s, and $2500-3000 for an early-mid 2000s 1200cc Sportster).

If you want a Harley, *buy one you can ride now*. Getting an older, cheaper "project" on the road reliably almost always costs more than buying a running, rideable bike, especially if you're not an experience Harley mechanic with lots of spare parts lying around.

Get the project AFTER you have a bike you can ride. Anything else is begging to a) spend more money than you have to, and b) be not riding a lot longer than you expected. The old Sportsters had many many many shortcomings in engineering and most bikes out there today have been fucked up by broke-ass wannabe bikers doing this without the right tools or knowledge. I wouldn't touch an Ironhead Sportster for more than $1000 *if it was running and rideable*. I suspect you think it would end up *looking* like a fun project. But I've built, rebuilt, and repaired a LOT of 1970s Sportsters, and the *vast* majority of them have been butchered in ways you won't find out about until you try getting it together. It's not a great around town bike until it's running and rideable and there are so few that don't have worn out transmission bearings, improperly assembled transmissions and clutches (you can put the tranny and clutch together wrong in several ways that will still work, but will end up never working well, clutch will drag, and eventually you blow the bottom of the transmission case out). If you want a 1970s project, get a 1970s Shovelhead. You can find a rideable Shovel that needs help, but runs and is rideable, for about $3000-3500 in most places. Have you ever ridden a bike with a "bobber" seat? I think you mean a Bates style solo saddle, like the one on my first [1948 Panhead](http://i.imgur.com/WPAT6t8.jpg), but these days, who knows. One thing about solo saddles, they're the worst designed seat if you wanna ride fast, since there's *zero* lower back support to keep you in the seat as you accelerate. Every bike I built after this one had a Danny Gray "King/Queen" or what we call a "2 up" seat today, with good back support like [this one](http://i.imgur.com/jOZ3emP.jpg) and [this one](http://i.imgur.com/CFZbdZl.jpg). ANY Harley will look good with apehangers, if they're set up correctly for a comfortable riding position. The big mistake people new to setting up bikes make is to build things to *look* a certain way but with zero regard to whether or not that look causes discomfort *and* (because it's unavoidable with an uncomfortable riding position) increased reaction time to hazards that pop up as you ride. If you're in the optimal riding position (notice, ALL my bikes are set up with the handlebar grips in just about the same place- that's because it's the right riding posture for me), your reaction time is faster, you're able to ride farther, and without the inevitable upper back pain and fatigue having your hands above your shoulders and your arms stretched all the way straight. 

Set your bike up to *ride* the way you want, *then* worry about whether or not it looks the way you want. You will probably find that comfort is way more important than those extra 3" of handlebar and tilting them forward. Every time I see a bike like that, I'm pretty damned sure it's the rider's first bike or at least his first set of apes. What part of the country are you in? First, read the "Buying a used HArley?" link on the sidebar or in the Wiki info. Then go looking for a 1970s Shovelhead that someone has listed for $4500-5000 and offer him $3000 after showing me the ad and letting me tell you whether or not it's gonna be a nightmare. Shovels are better engineered bikes than Ironheads, but will require just as much attention to detail, just as much LocTite on every nut and bolt, and just as much regular maintenance. It's just that there are far more options for putting things together, since just about every external part from 1936 to 1983 will bolt right on, and aftermarket companies like V-Twin, Colony, and Drag Specialties make everything you might need (and there's a ton of decent used stuff on eBay). Or you can buy a [running Dyna](http://sfbay.craigslist.org/sfc/mcy/5276115701.html) for about $4000-4500 already set up nicely. Asking price has little to do with sale price on older Harleys, even when they say "no low ballers"- if they want to sell the bike, eventually they'll have to take an offer below what they're asking, even when the asking price is this low. You can buy a 2005 Dyna for $5K with under 20K miles on it. Why pay as much for one 7 years older?[Here's a $3500-3700 Shovelhead that would be a great starter bike](http://goldcountry.craigslist.org/mcy/5268692869.html). Again, that's what it will SELL for. :) In northern California, my cold-weather prep is long johns and glove liners (it gets down to freezing around here many nights).

If any bike is going to sit for a long while, getting the wheels off the ground keeps tires from deforming as the cold causes the air in the tires to contract, lowering pressure. Cold rubber is far less pliable than warm rubber, so really co